https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Timeline_of_investigations_into_Trump_and_Russia_(2019%E2%80%932020)
Timeline of investigations into Trump and Russia (2019–2020) - Wikipedia
Timeline of investigations into Trump and Russia (2019–2020) From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia Jump to navigation Jump to search Wikimedia list article This article is part of a series aboutDonald Trump President of the United States Incumbent Presidency Transition Inauguration Timeline Executive actions proclamations pardons Trips 2017 2018 2019 2020 international North Korea summits Singapore Hanoi DMZ Helsinki summit Shutdowns Jan 2018 2018–2019 Polls Protests Death of Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi Death of Qasem Soleimani Coronavirus pandemic Appointments Cabinet formation Ambassadors Federal judges Gorsuch Kavanaugh Supreme Court candidates Executives U.S. Attorneys Dismissals Comey Policies Economy tax cuts tariffs China trade war Environment Paris withdrawal Foreign policy Iran deal Jerusalem Golan Peace plan Immigration travel ban wall family separation migrant detentions troop deployments national emergency Infrastructure Lawsuits Social issues cannabis Space Impeachment Early efforts Trump–Ukraine scandal Inquiry and hearings Senate trial Presidential campaigns 2000 primaries 2016 election primaries endorsements rallies convention debates Never Trump movement people sexual misconduct allegations Access Hollywood tape wiretapping allegations Spygate 2020 election primaries endorsements rallies convention Controversies involving Russia Business projects in Russia Election interference timeline until July 2016 July 2016–election day transition period threads Associates' links with Russian officials Steele dossier Trump Tower meeting Classified information disclosure Special Counsel investigation Crossfire Hurricane charges Mueller Report Barr letter Timeline transition period Jan–Jun 2017 Jul–Dec 2017 Jan–Jun 2018 Jul–Dec 2018 2019–2020 Business and personal Business career The Trump Organization wealth tax returns Media career The Apprentice Books Filmography Eponyms Family Foundation Golf Honors In popular culture SNL parodies Legal affairs Stormy Daniels Nicknames Racial views Residences Social media Veracity v t e It has been suggested that this article be split into articles titled Timeline of investigations into Trump and Russia (2019) and Timeline of investigations into Trump and Russia (2020). (Discuss) (April 2020) This is a timeline of events in 2019 and 2020 related to investigations into links between associates of Donald Trump and Russian officials that are suspected of being inappropriate, relating to the Russian interference in the 2016 United States elections. It follows the timeline of Russian interference in the 2016 United States elections, both before and after July 2016, until November 8, 2016 election day, the transition, the first and second halves of 2017, and the first and second halves of 2018. These events are related to, but distinct from, Russian interference in the 2020 United States elections. Contents 1 Relevant individuals and organizations 1.1 A–E 1.2 F–M 1.3 N–R 1.4 S–Z 2 2019 2.1 January 2.2 February 2.3 March 2.4 April 2.5 May 2.6 June 2.7 July 2.8 August 2.9 September 2.10 October 2.11 November 2.12 December 3 2020 3.1 January 3.2 February 3.3 March 3.4 April 4 See also 5 References 6 Further reading 7 External links Relevant individuals and organizations[edit] This section is transcluded from Timeline of Russian interference in the 2016 United States elections. (edit | history) This is a list of individuals and organizations that have been involved in the events related to either the election interference that Russia conducted against the 2016 U.S. elections and/or the resulting investigations into suspected inappropriate links between associates of Donald Trump and Russian officials. Seth Abramson estimated more than 400 people could be listed here.[1]:3 A–E[edit] Aras Agalarov, Azerbaijani-Russian billionaire oligarch and President of the Crocus Group [ru], close to both Trump and Vladimir Putin Emin Agalarov, Russian pop singer, and son of Aras Zainab Ahmad, associate of Robert Mueller Rinat Akhmetshin, Russian-American lobbyist and former Soviet counterintelligence officer[2] who emigrated to the U.S. in 1994[3] Mohammed bin Zayed Al Nahyan, Crown Prince of the United Arab Emirates Justin Amash, U.S. Representative for Michigan's 3rd congressional district, first Republican to call for Donald Trump's impeachment, became an Independent July 4, 2019 Greg Andres, associate of Robert Mueller Tevfik Arif, Soviet-born Turkish real estate developer and investor, founder of the Bayrock Group Andrii Artemenko, Ukrainian member of parliament Julian Assange, founder of WikiLeaks Arron Banks, primary funder and co-founder of Leave.EU campaign Stephen K. Bannon, Breitbart News chairman (2012–2016), Trump campaign CEO (August–November 2016), and White House Chief Strategist (January–August 2017) William Barr, United States Attorney General (1990–1991, and again since February 2019), head of the United States Department of Justice (DoJ) John R. Bolton, National Security Advisor (April 2018 – September 2019) John O. Brennan, Director of the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) (2013–2017) Richard Burr, North Carolina Senator (R), chairman of the Senate Intelligence Committee Maria Butina, founder of "Right to Bear Arms [ru]" and associate of Alexander Torshin Steve Calk, banker who helped Paul Manafort and Rick Gates steal and launder money Cambridge Analytica, a now defunct political consulting, data mining, and analysis firm that worked for Trump's campaign; its parent company was SCL Group Michael Caputo, former chief of communications in New York for the Trump Campaign, contracted to perform public relations work for Putin in 2000[4] James Clapper, Director of National Intelligence (DNI) (2010–2017) Hillary Clinton, 2016 Democratic presidential nominee, Secretary of State (2009–2013), First Lady of the United States (1993–2001) Sam Clovis, former co-chairman and policy adviser for the Trump campaign Dan Coats, Director of National Intelligence (since March 2017) Michael Cohen, Donald Trump's personal attorney (2006–2018) Columbus Nova, the American investment arm of Viktor Vekselberg's business empire James B. Comey, 7th Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) (2013–2017) Concord Management and Consulting, accused of funding a troll farm that interfered in the 2016 election Rafael Correa, former Ecuadorian president Jerome Corsi, American political commentator and associate of Roger Stone Gregory Craig, former Obama White House counsel Randy Credico, American perennial political candidate Rick Dearborn, White House Deputy Chief of Staff (January 20, 2017 – March 16, 2018) and executive director of Trump's presidential transition team Oleg Deripaska, Russian oligarch, aluminum magnate with close ties to Putin Kirill Dmitriev, CEO of the Russian Direct Investment Fund Annie Donaldson, former Deputy White House Counsel Michael Dreeben, associate of Robert Mueller Eric A. Dubelier, former Federal prosecutor and attorney for Concord Management and Consulting Yuri Dubinin, Ambassador of the Soviet Union to the United States (1986–1990) Electronic Privacy Information Center, DC-based non-profit that filed FOIA lawsuit for release of complete Mueller Report T. S. Ellis III, a United States District Judge of the Eastern District of Virginia presiding over Paul Manafort's trial in Virginia. He was appointed by Ronald Reagan in 1987 and took senior status in 2007. Paul Erickson, Republican activist involved in several Republican presidential campaigns and romantic partner of Maria Butina F–M[edit] Nigel Farage, leader of UKIP (2006–2009, 2010–2016), leader of The Brexit Party (since its founding in 2018) and a Member of the European Parliament (since 1999) Dianne Feinstein, California Senator (D), member of the Senate Intelligence Committee (chairwoman, 2009–2015) and ranking member of the Senate Judiciary Committee Michael T. Flynn, Director of the Defense Intelligence Agency (2012–2014), National Security Advisor (January–February 2017) Rick Gates, deputy to Manafort during the Trump campaign Rudy Giuliani, Mayor of New York City (1994–2001), and personal attorney for President Trump (since April 2018) Andrew D. Goldstein, associate of Robert Mueller Rob Goldstone, British publicist of Russian singer Emin Agalarov J. D. Gordon, Trump transition team member, and Director of National Security for the Trump campaign (since March 2016) Chuck Grassley, Iowa Senator (R), chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee (2015–2019), and President pro tempore of the United States Senate (since 2019) Guccifer 2.0, a hacker alias used by the Russian Main Intelligence Directorate (GRU) Stefan Halper, FBI informant Hope Hicks, press secretary for the Trump campaign and White House Communications Director (August 2017 – February 2018) Beryl A. Howell, Chief United States District Judge for the District Court for the District of Columbia Internet Research Agency (IRA), a Russian entity charged with coordinating online propaganda efforts, finances managed by Khusyaynova, funded by Prigozhin Andrew Intrater, Columbus Nova CEO, cousin of Viktor Vekselberg Frederick Intrater, brother of Columbus Nova CEO Andrew Intrater, cousin of Viktor Vekselberg Anton Inyutsyn, Russian Deputy Minister of Energy Amy Berman Jackson, U.S. District Court Judge in the District of Columbia overseeing one of Mueller's cases against Paul Manafort Boris Johnson, Prime Minister of the United Kingdom (since July 2019) Jones Day, law firm that worked for the Trump campaign Irakly "Ike" Kaveladze, Georgian-American senior vice president at the Crocus Group Bijan Kian, also known as Bijan Rafiekian, business partner of Michael Flynn and part of the Trump transition Konstantin V. Kilimnik, Paul Manafort's right-hand man in Kiev, Ukraine, alleged Russian intelligence operative[5] Sergey Kislyak, Russian ambassador to the United States (2008–2017) Elena Alekseevna Khusyaynova, Russian accountant who managed social media troll operation finances (including the IRA) which interfere in 2016 elections and 2018 midterm elections, called "Project Lakhta" Simon Kukes, Russian-American businessman and associate of Vekselberg, German Khan, Len Blavatnik, Mikhail Fridman, and Vyacheslav Pavlovsky [ru] with ties to Russian businesses and the Russian government Jared Kushner, real estate investor, son-in-law and Senior Advisor to President Trump Corey Lewandowski, former manager of Trump's primary election campaign (until June 2016) Jessie K. Liu, attorney involved in the Roger Stone case Paul Manafort, political consultant and former lobbyist for Viktor Yanukovych, campaign manager and chairman of the Trump campaign (June–August 2016), and Trump convention manager (March 2016) Simona Mangiante, Italian lawyer and wife of George Papadopoulos (since March 2018)[6] Andrew McCabe, Deputy (February 2016 – January 2018) and Acting Director of the FBI (May–August 2017) Mitch McConnell, Kentucky Senator (R) and Senate Majority Leader K. T. McFarland, political commentator and served as Deputy National Security Advisor under Michael Flynn for the first four months of the Trump administration Donald McGahn, White House Counsel to President Trump (January 2017 – October 2018) Amit Mehta, District Judge of the District Court for the District of Columbia Joseph Mifsud, Maltese academic and former diplomat for the Maltese government connected with Russian politicians and George Papadopoulos Andrew Miller, Roger Stone's associate Andrey Molchanov, member of the Federation Council of Russia (since 2008) Robert S. Mueller III, 6th FBI Director (2001–2013), appointed special counsel for the Russian interference investigation N–R[edit] George Nader, businessman and lobbyist who acted as the Trump campaign's liaison to the United Arab Emirates Jerrold Nadler, Congressman (D-NY), chairman of the House Judiciary Committee (since January 2019) Paul M. Nakasone, Commander of United States Cyber Command (since May 2018) National Rifle Association, commonly known as the NRA Richard Neal, Congressman (D-MA), chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee (since January 2019) Kirstjen Nielsen, Secretary of Homeland Security (December 2017 – April 2019) Alexander Nix, former CEO of Cambridge Analytica Sam Nunberg, former political advisor to Trump campaign Devin Nunes, Congressman (R-CA), ranking member (since 2019) and chairman of the House Intelligence Committee (2015–18) Barack Obama, 44th President of the United States (2009–2017) Bruce Ohr, director of the Organized Crime Drug Enforcement Task Force (2014–2017) and Associate Deputy Attorney General (2017) Carter Page, oil industry consultant, former Trump campaign advisor on foreign policy George Papadopoulos, former advisor to the Trump campaign on foreign policy W. Samuel Patten, a lobbyist and associate of Paul Manafort, senior consultant for SCL Group Mike Pence, 48th Vice President of the United States (since January 2017) Dmitry Peskov, Putin's Press Secretary, and diplomat Mike Pompeo, Secretary of State (since April 2018); CIA director (January 2017 – March 2018) Reince Priebus, Trump's first White House Chief of Staff, former chairman of the Republican National Committee Yevgeny Prigozhin, Russian oligarch who funded the IRA and owns "Concord Management and Consulting" and "Concord Catering", called "Putin’s chef" Erik Prince, chairman of Frontier Services Group, brother of Trump Administration Education Secretary Betsy DeVos, and founder of private military company Academi (formerly known as "Blackwater") Vladimir Putin, 2nd and 4th President of Russia James L. Quarles, associate of Robert Mueller Edgardo Ramos, District Judge of the District Court for the Southern District of New York Michele Reagan, Arizona Secretary of State (January 2015 – January 2019) Jeannie Rhee, associate of Robert Mueller Susan Rice, National Security Advisor (2013–2017) Michael S. Rogers, Director of the National Security Agency (NSA) (2014–2018) Dmitry Rogozin, Deputy Prime Minister of Russia (2011–2018) Dana Rohrabacher, Congressman (R-CA) (1989–2019) Rod Rosenstein, Deputy Attorney General, acting Attorney General for Russia–Trump investigations Wilbur Ross, 39th United States Secretary of Commerce (since February 2017) Marco Rubio, member of the Senate Intelligence Committee, Republican candidate for president in 2016 Paul Ryan, Speaker of the U.S. House of Representatives (2015–2018) S–Z[edit] Bernie Sanders, 2016 Democratic primary presidential candidate, Vermont Senator (I) (since 2007) Sarah Huckabee Sanders, White House Press Secretary (July 2017 – June 2019) Felix Sater, Russian-American former mobster, real estate developer, and former managing director of Bayrock Group LLC Adam B. Schiff, Congressman (D-CA), Chairman of the House Intelligence Committee (since 2019), and ranking member (2015-2018) Keith Schiller, former Deputy Assistant and concurrent Director of Oval Office Operations, and longtime personal body guard to Trump SCL Group, parent company of Cambridge Analytica Jay Sekulow, chief counsel at the American Center for Law & Justice, former personal attorney of Donald Trump Jeff Sessions, United States Attorney General (February 2017 – November 2018), Alabama Senator (R) (1997–2017), member of the Center for the National Interest's advisory council (2016)[7] Cody Shearer, political activist and former journalist, author of the "Shearer memo/dossier" that Steele passed on to the FBI Dimitri Simes, publisher of The National Interest and CEO of think tank Center for the National Interest (CNI) Glenn R. Simpson, co-founder of Fusion GPS, who hired Steele to compile damaging information on Trump and Russia Skadden, New York City-based international law firm Peter W. Smith, Republican operative and Illinois financier who had ties to Michael Flynn as early as 2015 Gordon Sondland, United States Ambassador to the European Union (since June 2018) Sean Spicer, White House Press Secretary (January–July 2017) and White House Director of Communications (June–July 2017) Christopher Steele, former British MI6 intelligence officer, author of dossier on Trump and Russia Jill Stein, Green Party nominee in the 2016 United States presidential election Roger Stone, political consultant, staffer to President Richard Nixon (1972–1974), business partner of Manafort (1980s) Peter Strzok, FBI agent removed from the investigation in August 2017 Rex Tillerson, 69th United States Secretary of State (February 2017 – March 2018), and CEO of ExxonMobil (2006–2017) Ivan Timofeev, program director of the Kremlin-sponsored Valdai Discussion Club Alexander Torshin, Russian Senator from Mari El Republic (2001–2015) and Deputy Governor of the Central Bank of Russia (2015–2018) Anthony Trenga, District Judge of the District Court for the Eastern District of Virginia Donald Trump, 45th President of the United States (since January 2017), real estate developer (1971–2016) Donald Trump Jr., Executive Director of The Trump Organization, son of Donald Trump Eric Trump, Executive Vice President of The Trump Organization, son of Donald Trump Ivana Trump, first wife of Donald Trump Ivanka Trump, Advisor to the President (since March 2017), daughter of Donald Trump Alex van der Zwaan, Dutch attorney guilty of making false statements to the FBI Viktor Vekselberg, Russian oligarch Natalia Veselnitskaya, Russian attorney, best known for lobbying against the Magnitsky Act Kurt Volker, US Special Representative for Ukraine Negotiations (July 2017 – September 2019) Reggie Walton, District Judge of the District Court for the District of Columbia Jennifer Williams, advisor to Mike Pence on European and Russian affairs Allen Weisselberg, Chief Financial Officer of The Trump Organization Andrew Weissmann, associate of Robert Mueller Matthew Whitaker, acting US Attorney General (November 2018 – February 2019) Andy Wigmore, director of communications for Leave.EU and close associate of Arron Banks Michael Wolff, journalist and author of Fire and Fury about the Trump White House Christopher A. Wray, Director of the FBI (since August 2017) Alexander Yakovenko, Russian ambassador to the United Kingdom (since 2011) Viktor Yanukovych, President of Ukraine (2010–2014) Aaron Zebley, associate of Robert Mueller Volodymyr Zelensky, President of Ukraine (since May 2019) 2019[edit] January[edit] January 2: The foreign company fighting a grand jury subpoena filed under seal its reply to Mueller's brief to the Supreme Court.[8] Alston & Bird is an involved law firm.[9] January 3: The 116th United States Congress convenes with the House under Democratic control. Congressman Brad Sherman refiles articles of impeachment against Trump. The article charges Trump with obstructing justice by firing James Comey.[10] Jerome Corsi asks U.S. District Court Judge Richard J. Leon to take his December 10, 2018, lawsuit against Mueller.[11][12] Corsi claims the FBI and Mueller's team used "illegal, unconstitutional surveillance" in a "politically-motivated" criminal investigation against him.[11] Judge Leon accuses Corsi's lawyer of "judge shopping" and grants a Justice Department motion to randomly assign the case to another judge.[11] January 4: District Judge Beryl A. Howell extends the term of Mueller's grand jury in Washington, D.C., for an unknown amount of time. The grand jury's term was due to expire on January 5.[13] January 7: D.C. District Judge Dabney L. Friedrich strongly rebukes the attorneys for Concord Management and Consulting for repeatedly making personal attacks on Mueller's team. The rebuke was triggered by a January 4 filing that questions the trustworthiness of Mueller's office. Friedrich called Concord's recent filings "unprofessional, inappropriate, and ineffective," and said their "relentless personal attacks" would not affect her decision.[14] D.C. District Court of Appeals decision against a "Corporation" from "Country A" January 8: The US Attorney for the Southern District of New York (SDNY) indicts Natalia Veselnitskaya, known for her participation in the meeting in the Trump Tower with top campaign officials on June 9, 2016, for obstruction of justice in an unrelated case.[15] The prosecution alleges that while defending Russian investment company Prevezon Holdings in a New York court, she helped Russian Prosecutor General Yuri Chaika fabricate evidence supporting Prevezon's defense.[16] Paul Manafort's attorneys file response to Mueller's accusations of malfeasance to the DC judge.[17] Portions of the filing that were meant to be redacted are still readable because of incorrectly applied formatting in the document. The redacted portions reveal that prosecutors accused Manafort of lying because he denied and then admitted when prompted that he met with Kilimnik in Madrid, discussed a proposed Ukrainian peace plan with Kilimnik on several occasions, and shared polling data with Kilimnik while working for the Trump campaign.[18] The New York Times reports that while Manafort worked for the Trump campaign he provided Kilimnik with internal polling data for Kilimnik to pass on to Ukrainian oligarchs Serhiy Lyovochkin and Rinat Akhmetov, both of whom Manafort previously did work for in Ukraine.[19] The Supreme Court removes without comment a temporary stay in the legal battle by a "Corporation" from "Country A" fighting a grand jury subpoena. The stay had paused the accrual of fines by the company while it appealed the District Court of Appeals decision from December 18, 2018. This is believed to be the first U.S. Supreme Court decision related to the Mueller investigation.[20] The D.C. Circuit Court of Appeals (D.C. Cir.) issues its full opinion in the appeal by a "Corporation" from "Country A" against a grand jury subpoena. The judges write, "[the company] failed to satisfy its burden of showing that Country A's law would prohibit complying with the subpoena, we agree with the district court that enforcing the subpoena is neither unreasonable nor oppressive." The company immediately appeals the decision to the Supreme Court.[20] January 10: The first Russia-related hearing of the newly Democratic majority House takes place: Treasury Secretary Steven Mnuchin testifies in a closed-door hearing on the Treasury Department's decision to ease sanctions on companies aligned with Oleg Deripaska.[21] After the hearing, Speaker Nancy Pelosi calls it "one of the worst classified briefings we've received from the Trump administration". She says they spent "most of the time reading an unclassified document". Other Democrats echoed Pelosi.[22] January 11: Mother Jones reports that the NRA appears to have coordinated ad buys with Republican candidates in at least three U.S. Senate races. Like the scheme reportedly used by the NRA and the Trump campaign, National Media Research, Planning and Placement (NMRPP) CFO Jon Ferrell placed scores of ad buys on behalf of the three senate campaigns and the NRA to air ads within minutes of each other on the same local television stations. The three senate campaigns were Senator Richard Burr's 2016 reelection campaign in North Carolina, Missouri Attorney General Josh Hawley's successful 2018 campaign to unseat Missouri Senator Claire McCaskill, and the unsuccessful 2018 campaign by Montana state auditor Matt Rosendale to unseat Montana Senator Jon Tester.[23] The New York Times reports that the FBI opened counterintelligence and criminal investigations against Trump a few days after he fired Comey in May 2017. They were alarmed by Trump's actions and concerned that he may have been working for Russia against American interests. The investigations were eventually combined and taken over by Mueller.[24] Giuliani tells The Hill that Trump's legal team should be allowed to make corrections to Mueller's final report before it is seen by Congress or the public.[25] Play media Trump states on January 14, 2019, "I never worked for Russia and you know that answer better than anybody. I never worked for Russia. Not only did I never work for Russia I think it's a disgrace that you even asked that question." January 12: The Washington Post reports that Trump ordered his translator for the second Putin meeting at the G20 summit in Hamburg on July 7, 2017, to hand over their notes and not discuss the meeting. The Hamburg meeting was one of five Trump-Putin interactions where no detailed records exist.[26] Trump tells Jeanine Pirro on Justice with Judge Jeanine that Cohen made a plea deal to protect his father-in-law from prosecution.[27] The Mueller report refers to his statements on Cohen in the interview as evidence of witness intimidation.[28]:152, 154, 156 January 14: The New York Times reports on the unusually large expenses claimed by the Trump inauguration fund.[29] The Daily Beast reports that Mueller's office and the SDNY are investigating a breakfast meeting involving Flynn, Nunes, Turkish Foreign Minister Mevlüt Çavuşoğlu, and 50–60 other foreign officials at the Trump International Hotel in Washington, D.C., on January 18, 2017. This line of inquiry is part of their investigations into the Trump inauguration fund.[30][31] FBI special agent Jeffrey Weiland's statement on Manafort's breach of his plea agreement. January 15: Mueller's team requests a delay in Richard Gates' sentencing because he is still helping with their investigations.[32] Mueller's team files FBI special agent Jeffrey Weyland's partially redacted statement detailing the ways in which they believe Manafort lied to them, including about his contacts with Trump administration officials and his work to help people get positions in the administration. 157 pages of mostly redacted exhibits are included in the filing. They allege Manafort made contradictory statements to the Mueller team on several occasions as well as to the grand jury contradicting himself, other witnesses, and documents.[33] William Barr appears before the Senate Judiciary Committee for his confirmation hearing to become the next Attorney General. Barr refuses to commit to recusing himself from the Mueller investigation or release Mueller's eventual report. He also states that he would not fire Mueller if asked to do so by Trump without good cause. Barr circulated a memo among Trump administration members in 2018 in which he criticized the Mueller investigation.[34] Judge Howell imposes $50,000 a day fines on the foreign company fighting a grand jury subpoena from Mueller for not complying with the subpoena.[35] Skadden, Arps, Slate Meagher & Flom settlement agreement January 17: The Justice Department announces that Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom agreed to pay the U.S. government $4.6 million and retroactively register as a foreign agent for the work they performed for Manafort and the Ukrainian government. $4.6 million is the amount of money Skadden received from the Ukrainian Ministry of Justice and Manafort's offshore bank accounts. In the settlement agreement, which details the actions taken by Skadden on the behalf of Manafort and Ukraine, attorney and former White House counsel Gregory B. Craig is referred to as "Partner-1".[36] BuzzFeed News reports that Cohen gave Trump, Trump Jr., and Ivanka Trump regular and "very detailed" updates about the Trump Tower Moscow project during the 2016 campaign, including that he was discussing the project with Russian government officials. They also report that Cohen told Mueller's team that Trump directed him to lie to Congress about the project.[37] January 18: Mueller spokesman Peter Carr refutes some of the information in the January 17 BuzzFeed News article that claimed Trump directed Cohen to lie to Congress. He says, "BuzzFeed's description of specific statements to the special counsel's office, and characterization of documents and testimony obtained by this office, regarding Cohen's congressional testimony are not accurate". BuzzFeed top editor Ben Smith responds, "We stand by our reporting and the sources who informed it, and we urge the Special Counsel to make clear what he’s disputing".[38] Mueller's team interviews Bannon for the fourth and final time.[28]:18 Trump tweets that Cohen lied to reduce his sentence, and finishes with, "Watch father-in-law!"[39] The Mueller Report refers to this tweet as evidence of witness intimidation.[28]:152, 154, 156 January 20: Giuliani tells Chuck Todd on Meet the Press that the Trump Tower Moscow project continued through October or November 2016.[40] His statement confirms what Cohen told Mueller's team about the project.[28]:152 January 21: In a New York Times interview, Giuliani quotes Trump as saying discussions about the Trump Tower Moscow project were "going on from the day I announced to the day I won."[41] His statement confirms what Cohen told Mueller's team about the project.[28]:152 Giuliani walks back his recent statements on the Trump Tower Moscow project. He issues a public statement saying, "My recent statements about discussions during the 2016 campaign between Michael Cohen and candidate Donald Trump about a potential Trump Moscow 'project' were hypothetical and not based on conversations I had with the president.[42][28]:152 Trump's personal counsel also sends a letter to Mueller's team stating that Giuliani's public comments "were not intended to suggest nor did they reflect knowledge of the existence or timing of conversations beyond that contained in the President's [written responses to the Special Counsel's Office]."[28]:152–153 January 22: The Supreme Court grants a motion from the "Corporation" from "Country A" to file its appeal under seal in its case challenging a subpoena from Mueller's grand jury. A redacted version of the petition will be made public.[43] January 23: Cohen delays his Congressional testimony, citing threats to his family.[44] Senate Intelligence Committee subpoenas Cohen to testify in closed session on February 12.[45] Mueller's team submits followup questions to Trump about the extent of his involvement in the Trump Tower Moscow project.[28]:150–151 January 25: Trump campaign associate Roger Stone is arrested by the FBI in Fort Lauderdale, Florida, on 7 counts of indictments; one count of obstruction of an official proceeding, five counts of false statements, and one count of witness tampering.[46][47] January 28: Roger Stone indictment for one count of obstruction of an official proceeding, five counts of false statements, and one count of witness tampering Acting Attorney General Matthew Whitaker announces that the Special Counsel investigation is "close to being completed".[48] Stone pleads not guilty in DC courtroom. Judge T. S. Ellis of the District Court for the Eastern District of Virginia (E.D. Va.) postpones Manafort's February 8 sentencing date to an unspecified date, pending resolution of a dispute in his separate case before the DC District Court (D.D.C.).[49] January 29: Mueller's team interviews former Associate Attorney General Rachel Brand.[28]:108 January 30: As part of the prosecution of Concord Management and Consulting, a court filing states that Russians leaked confidential evidence collected by the Mueller investigation.[50] February[edit] Early February: The unnamed foreign company fighting a grand jury subpoena from Mueller gives the Mueller investigation documents totaling around 950 pages, many of which were translated into English. Judge Howell stops the daily fines imposed on the company.[35] February 1: Stone appears in court. The judge warns she may impose a gag order.[51] A court filing by Mueller's prosecutors reveals that the FBI seized "voluminous and complex" evidence from Stone's home in Florida, containing emails and financial records.[52] February 4: During a closed-door DC District Court hearing, Mueller prosecutor Andrew Weissmann tells judge Amy Berman Jackson that Manafort's lying to investigators about his communications with Konstantin Kilimnik "goes, I think, very much to the heart of what the special counsel's office is investigating" suggesting that Mueller's office continues to examine a possible agreement between Russia and the Trump campaign.[53] Federal prosecutors in Manhattan subpoena documents concerning donors and finances from Trump's inaugural committee. Investigators are particularly interested in potential conspiracy to defraud the U.S., mail fraud, wire fraud, false statements, election fraud, foreign donations, and money laundering.[54] Federal prosecutors in the Southern District of New York request interviews with executives at the Trump Organization.[55][56] BuzzFeed News reports that Akhmetshin received suspicious payments before and after the Trump Tower meeting totaling $500,000 from Denis Katsyv. Wells Fargo and Bank of America reported the payments to the U.S. Treasury Department, and the reports were passed on to Mueller's team.[57] February 5: Thomas J. Barrack Jr., chairman of Trump's inaugural committee, confirms to the Associated Press that he was interviewed by the Mueller team in 2017, but says he was not a target of the investigation.[58] The Democratic-controlled House Intelligence Committee votes to refer dozens of witness testimony transcripts and thousands of other documents to Mueller's office. Committee Republicans had blocked Democrat efforts to release the documents to Mueller's office when Republicans controlled the Committee in 2018.[59] February 6: Trump's personal counsel declines to provide Mueller's team with the additional information about the extent of Trump's involvement in the Trump Tower Moscow project that they requested on January 23.[28]:151 February 8: The House Judiciary Committee holds a hearing on Acting Attorney General Matthew Whitaker, focusing primarily on the Mueller probe and his relation to it.[60][61] February 11: Cohen's testimony under subpoena before a closed session of the Senate Intelligence Committee is postponed a third time, at Cohen's request, to an unspecified date.[62] February 13: Judge rules that Manafort 'intentionally' lied to the FBI, special counsel and grand jury, negating his plea agreement, including his contacts with his Russian associate during the campaign and later.[63] CNN reports Tyler McGaughey, the husband of William Barr's youngest daughter, was hired by White House Counsel's office, whose work intersects with the Russia investigation. Walter Shaub, the former director of the United States Office of Government Ethics, said McGaughey's beeline for the White House was "concerning."[64][65] Date for the trial of Michael Flynn's business partner Bijan Kian, the second of a Mueller derived case, is set for July 15.[66] Mueller's team interviews Chris Christie.[28]:38–39, 70, 87, 121 February 14: Mueller's team interviews Gordon the final of four times since August 7, 2017.[67]:125–127 William Barr is confirmed as Attorney General by the U.S. Senate.[68] Flynn sends outspoken Mueller critic Republican Representative Matt Gaetz images of a bald eagle and an American flag with no accompanying text. In May, the Twitter direct message is revealed in a court filing as evidence of Flynn's outreach to Mueller critics while he was cooperating with the Mueller investigation.[69] February 15: U.S. District Judge Amy Berman imposes a limited restriction on the kind of public statement Roger Stone can make about his court proceedings in order to ensure a fair trial and "to maintain the dignity and seriousness of the courthouse and these proceedings." Stone, his lawyers, and his witnesses are banned from making public statements as they enter or exit the courthouse.[70] Sarah Huckabee Sanders confirms to the press that she is "happy to voluntarily" sit for an interview with Mueller's investigators and says that the President urged her to "fully cooperate."[71] The New Jersey Attorney General subpoenas the Trump inaugural committee for records relating to fundraising events and "solicitations" conducted in New Jersey, copies of ledgers, tax forms, contracts and "all documents related to any benefits provided to donors."[72] February 17: The Guardian reports that Brittany Kaiser, former business development director of SCL Group, the parent company of Cambridge Analytica, was subpoenaed by Robert Mueller. Her spokesman said she was cooperating fully with his investigation. She is the first person with links to both Brexit and the Trump campaign known to have been questioned by Mueller.[73] February 20: Judge William Pauley grants Cohen's request to postpone his prison surrender date from March 6 to May 6 so he can further recover from recent shoulder surgery.[74] Cohen agrees to testify before open session of House Oversight Committee on February 27.[75] February 21: Senate Intelligence Committee reportedly pursuing David Geovanis for questioning.[76] The D.C. Circuit Court of Appeals ruling that Mueller was legally appointed February 26: Cohen testifies in closed session before the Senate Intelligence Committee.[77] A three-judge panel of the D.C. Circuit Court of Appeals rules that Mueller was legally appointed. The judges let stand a July 31, 2018, lower court ruling ordering Andrew Miller, a former aide to Roger Stone, to obey a grand jury subpoena from Mueller. The case was brought by Miller in an attempt to avoid testifying before Mueller's grand jury.[78][79] February 27: Cohen testifies before open session of House Oversight Committee.[80] February 28: Cohen testifies in closed session before the House Intelligence Committee.[81] House Oversight Committee chairman Elijah Cummings states his intention to interview Trump Jr., Ivanka Trump and Trump Organization CFO Allen Weisselberg. House Intelligence Committee chairman Adam Schiff states he will call Weisselberg to testify.[82] In the Concord Management case, Mueller's team argues that over three million documents should not be exported to Russia under discovery rules.[83] Mueller's team interviews McGahn for the final of six times.[28]:84-87 March[edit] March 4: House Judiciary Committee sends letters seeking information and documents from 81 organizations and individuals associated with Trump.[84] March 6: Cohen gives additional testimony before House Intelligence Committee.[82] March 7: Manafort is sentenced by Judge T. S. Ellis III (of E.D. Va.) to 47 months in prison in Virginia for tax evasion and bank fraud,[85] "far lighter than the 19- to 24-year prison term recommended under sentencing guidelines".[86] March 12: Mueller prosecutors and Mike Flynn jointly requested and received a 90-day extension for his sentencing, originally scheduled for March 18, stating that his cooperation with the Mueller investigation was complete but he may cooperate further in the prosecution of his former business partner, Bijan Kian, scheduled to begin in July.[87] March 13: Manafort is sentenced in DC District Court (D.D.C.) to 73 months in prison, thirty of which to be served concurrently with his previous sentence in Virginia. The length of his federal prison sentences is expected to total 7.5 years.[88] Minutes after his sentencing, New York State announced that Manafort had been charged with 16 state felonies, including residential mortgage fraud.[89] March 18: Propublica reports federal authorities raided Republican fundraiser Elliott Broidy's office in July 2018, seeking materials related to foreign officials dealings with Trump administration associates, including Gates and Nader, regarding conspiracy, money laundering, and crimes associated with illegal lobbying on behalf of foreign officials.[90][91] Michael Cohen search warrants March 19: The Michael Cohen search warrants are unsealed by a federal judge in New York.[92] Mueller's team interviews Cohen for the seventh and final time.[28]:137–138, 142, 146–147 Letter from U.S. Attorney General William Barr announcing his receipt of the Mueller Report March 20: Ukrainian Prosecutor General Yuriy Lutsenko tells John Solomon in an interview on Hill.TV that his office is investigating claims that the National Anti-Corruption Bureau of Ukraine attempted to interfere in the 2016 U.S. election to help Clinton.[93] He also claims the U.S. ambassador to Ukraine Marie Yovanovitch gave him a "do not prosecute" list at their first meeting after he took office in 2016, which the State Department denies as "an outright fabrication."[94] March 22: Mueller concluded the Special Counsel investigation and has submitted his long-anticipated report to Attorney General William Barr.[95] Barr stated that he may be able to give details regarding the report as soon as the weekend (March 23–24) to Congress.[96] Mueller's prosecutors identified 272 contacts between the Trump team and Russia-linked operatives.[97] The Electronic Privacy Information Center (EPIC) files a lawsuit under the U.S. Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) attempting to compel the Justice Department to release a copy of the Mueller Report.[98] Letter from Attorney General William P. Barr on March 24, 2019, to leaders of the House and Senate judiciary committees with the summary of the investigation. March 24: Attorney General William Barr releases a four-page letter to Congress highlighting the key findings by the Special Counsel's final report. Barr stated that there is not sufficient evidence that Trump obstructed justice or colluded with Russia, but did not exonerate him on obstruction.[99][100] March 25: House Intelligence Committee testimony from former Trump business associate Felix Sater, who worked with Cohen on Trump Tower Moscow project, previously scheduled for March 27, is postponed to undetermined date.[101] The U.S. Supreme Court declines to hear an appeal by the unidentified company fighting a Mueller grand jury subpoena. Mueller has transferred the case to the Washington, D.C., U.S. Attorney's office.[102] Letter from Robert Mueller III to William P. Barr objecting to Barr's characterization of the conclusions of the Mueller Report. March 27: Assistant U.S. attorney David Goodhand tells Judge Howell that Mueller's grand jury is still active and is "continuing robustly". He made the declaration in a hearing on the unidentified foreign government-owned company's fight against a grand jury subpoena.[103] In a joint letter, the House intelligence committee demands that Mueller "must" brief them and provide "all materials, regardless of form and classification, obtained or produced".[104][105][106] Rep. Rashida Tlaib (D-MI) introduces H.Res.257, authorizing an impeachment investigation. It is referred to the House Rules Committee.[107] Mueller sends Barr a letter in which he asserts that Barr's March 24 letter "did not fully capture the context, nature, and substance of this Office's work and conclusions" leading to "public confusion about critical aspects of the results of our investigation".[108] March 28: U.S. District Judge Tanya S. Chutkan sets Butina's sentencing hearing for April 26 after Assistant U.S. Attorney Erik Kenerson tells the court that prosecutors are ready.[109] Jared Kushner meets with the Senate Intelligence Committee.[110][111] Letter from Attorney General William P. Barr on March 29 to the chairs of the House and Senate Judiciary Committees March 29: EPIC files a motion requesting a preliminary injunction that would force the Justice Department to expedite EPIC's FOIA request for the Mueller Report. The judge schedules a hearing for April 9.[112] Barr sends a subsequent letter to Senator Lindsey Graham and Congressman Nadler informing them that he expects the redacted form of the Mueller Report will be given to Congress in mid-April at the latest. He also clarifies that his March 24 letter provided a summary of the nearly 400-page report's "principal conclusions" and was not intended to be a summary of the entire report. He also states that there are no plans for the White House to review the report before it is delivered to Congress.[113] April[edit] Court order keeping name of company secret while grand jury is active Spring: Giuliani consults with Manafort via Manafort's lawyer on the existence of the Ukrainian "black ledger" as part of his investigation into whether the ledger was fabricated with the assistance of the U.S. government in order to help Clinton win the 2016 presidential election. Manafort tells Giuliani that the ledger didn't exist.[114] April 1: Judge Howell rejects a request from the Reporters Committee for Freedom of the Press to unseal the name of the company fighting a Mueller grand jury subpoena, but agrees to let them see edited versions of briefs and pleadings in the court battle. She also leaves open the possibility of unsealing the name when the grand jury is finished with their investigation.[115] April 2: EPIC announces that the Justice Department agreed to expedite its FOIA request for the Mueller Report after the group filed suit in federal court on March 22 and requested expedited service on March 29.[116][112] April 3: The House Judiciary Committee votes 24–17 to authorize committee chairman Nadler to issue subpoenas for the unredacted version of the Mueller Report and any exhibits, underlying evidence, or other materials prepared for the investigation.[117] The House Ways and Means Committee chairman Richard Neal formally requests copies of Trump's personal and business tax returns covering 2013 to 2018 from the IRS, and sets April 10 as the deadline for the response. By law, the committee has the authority to see anyone's confidential tax returns.[118][119] The New York Times reports that some of Mueller's investigators expressed concerns that attorney general Barr is downplaying the findings of their report.[120] April 5: Trump attorney William S. Consovoy sends a letter to Treasury Department general counsel Brent J. McIntosh that calls Neal's request for Trump's tax returns a "gross abuse of power" and urges the department to wait for a legal opinion from the Justice Department before turning over any of Trump's tax information.[121] A Justice Department court filing in response to EPIC's March 29 expedited FOIA request for the Mueller Report states that the department is processing 415 requests regarding the Mueller investigation, and that 198 of the requests came after Barr's March 22 announcement that the investigation was over.[122] A three-judge panel of the U.S. Court of Appeals for the D.C. Circuit rules in a split decision[123] that grand jury materials can only be disclosed to prosecutors, defendants, and other grand juries as mandated by the Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure, and to the U.S. House of Representatives as authorized by a 1974 ruling by U.S. District Judge John J. Sirica. Sirica's ruling said that a House oversight investigation "in this setting acts simply as another grand jury". While the Appeals Court ruling is in a case unrelated to the Mueller investigation, its decision is expected to affect any legal actions the House may undertake to acquire the Mueller Report and any supporting grand jury material.[124] The Senate Intelligence Committee sends letter to Walter Soriano and owner of USG Security Ltd based in Britain for his communication with Manafort and Flynn, Psy-Group/Wikistrat, and Black Cube, Orbis Business Intelligence (a firm co-founded by Christopher Steele). Soriano has links to Deripaska.[125] April 7: Giuliani tells Howard Kurtz on MediaBuzz that he learned a few months before that a group of people in Ukraine colluded with the Clinton campaign during the 2016 Presidential election to help Clinton. He states that he wants the Ukraine government to investigate.[126] April 8: Prosecutors from the U.S. attorney's office in Washington, D.C., file their sentencing recommendations for Patten in federal court in advance of his April 12 sentencing hearing. They say that Patten committed to being a witness against Manafort in his second trial, which was cancelled when Manafort pleaded guilty, and met with prosecutors several times to explain documents and answer questions. They cite his "substantial assistance" as the basis for recommending a lenient sentence. In a separate filing, Patten's lawyers ask for a sentence of probation and insist he did not know Kilimnik was connected to Russian intelligence even though they owned a company together. Kilimnik is identified as "Person A" in the prosecutor's filings and named directly in Patten's filings.[127][128] The FBI reveals in a court filing that Comey was a witness in the Mueller investigation and that his memos on his meetings with Trump were of interest in the investigation. The filing was part of a court case brought by CNN about a FOIA request for Comey's memos.[129] Nunes files a $150 million lawsuit against The McClatchy Company, owner of the Fresno Bee, in Virginia state court in which he claims that a McClatchy reporter conspired with a political operative to interfere with the House Intelligence Committee's investigations of the Clinton campaign and Russian election interference.[130][131][132] April 9: In a hearing that begins half an hour before Barr testifies before Congress, U.S. District Court Judge Reggie Walton denies EPIC's March 29 request for an injunction to expedite the release of the Mueller Report.[122] Barr appears before the House Appropriations Committee for a hearing on the Justice Department budget, and members ask him about the Mueller Report. He says no one outside the Justice Department read his March 24 letter about the Mueller Report before it was sent to Congress, but then later clarifies that the White House was told about the letter when it was sent, and the letter may have been read to them over the phone. He also says that Mueller and his team declined an opportunity to review the letter before it was sent. He declined to answer when asked if he consulted the White House before releasing the letter, saying, "I've said what I'm going to say about the report today." He tells the committee that he expects to send the redacted report to the House Judiciary Committee within a week with color coded redactions so that people can tell what kind of material was redacted, but refuses to give Congress the full unredacted report and says it is up to Congress to ask a court for the grand jury material.[133][134] U.S. Treasury Secretary Steven Mnuchin tells two congressional committees that White House lawyers had an "informational" discussion with Treasury department lawyers about a potential request for Trump's tax returns before Congress formally requested them. He tells the committees that he thinks such discussions are appropriate, but emphasizes that he will not take direction from Trump on whether or not to release the tax returns to Congress. He says, "We would not ever ask for the White House’s permission on this, nor did they give us permission."[135] April 10: Mnuchin sends a letter to the House Ways and Means Committee in which he states that the Treasury Department will miss the Committee's April 10 deadline for receiving Trump's tax returns because he is going to consult with the Justice Department about the legality of their April 3 request. He writes, "The Committee’s request raises serious issues concerning the constitutional scope of congressional investigative authority, the legitimacy of the asserted legislative purpose, and the constitutional rights of American citizens".[136] Barr tells the Senate Appropriations Committee that Mueller did not ask him or Congress to determine whether Trump obstructed justice. He tells the committee, "I don't know whether Bob Mueller supported my conclusion." He again states that he expected to release the Mueller Report within a week. He also tells the committee that the government spied on the Trump campaign, but then later says, "I am not saying that improper surveillance occurred. I'm saying that I'm concerned about it and looking into it, that's all."[137] The Wall Street Journal reports that the U.S. Attorney's office for SDNY interviewed Hope Hicks and Keith Schiller after learning about phone calls they each had with David Pecker shortly after American Media, Inc.'s payment to Karen McDougal was revealed in November 2016. The Journal also reports that SDNY investigators have a recording of a phone call between Michael Cohen and McDougal's lawyer, Keith Davidson.[138][139] Republican Representative Matt Gaetz introduces a bill that would remove Schiff from his position as chairman of the House Intelligence Committee and strip him of his security clearance. The move comes amid increasing partisan attacks on Schiff by Republican lawmakers and the President.[140] Gregory Craig indictment April 11: Former Obama White House counsel Gregory Craig is indicted for lying to the Justice Department's Foreign Agents Registration Act (FARA) Unit.[141][142] He is accused of lying about the work he and his former law firm, Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom, did for Manafort and the Ukrainian government.[141][142] The investigation of Craig was started by Mueller's team, then moved to SDNY, and was finally moved to the U.S. Attorney's office for the District of Columbia.[141][142] According to the indictment, Craig and other members of the law firm discussed FARA registration in February 2012, told the Ministry of Justice of Ukraine in August 2012 that their work would not require FARA registration, received subsequent legal advice that the firm needed to register their work under FARA, and then altered and backdated documents to hide the nature of their work and avoid registration.[141] Craig is not charged for failing to register under FARA because the statute of limitations has expired.[142] April 12: Patten is sentenced to three years of probation, 500 hours of community service, and fined $5,000 by Judge Jackson. The judge notes Patten's assistance to prosecutors, acceptance of blame, and that he didn't try to enrich himself as reasons for the lenient sentence. She says his cooperation is the main reason he avoided prison time for lying to Congress.[143] The Washington Post reports that researchers at Clemson University found the IRA sent thousands of tweets during the 2016 election campaign in an attempt to drive Bernie Sanders supporters away from Hillary Clinton and towards Donald Trump.[144] Craig appears in federal court in Washington, D.C., and pleads not guilty after being indicted the day before.[145] He is released on personal recognizance.[146] Andrew Miller's lawyers file a petition with the D.C. Court of Appeals asking the court to compel prosecutors to declare whether they are still pursuing grand jury testimony from Miller and, if they are, to accept an appeal to the full court of the court's three-judge ruling against Miller in February. They argue that the case is moot since Stone has been indicted and "Mueller's authority expired".[147] Letter from Richard Neal to Charles Rettig demanding Trump's tax returns by April 23 April 13: Neal sends a letter to IRS Commissioner Charles Rettig demanding Trump's tax returns by end of business on April 23. The letter lays out a legal argument citing judicial precedents showing he has the authority to demand the documents and the Treasury Department does not have the authority to refuse.[148] April 15: The House Intelligence and Financial Services committees issue subpoenas to Deutsche Bank, JPMorgan Chase, Bank of America, and Citigroup demanding documents related to Trump and possible money laundering by people in Russia and Eastern Europe.[149] April 17: The New York Times reports that there have been numerous conversations between White House lawyers and the Justice Department about the contents of Muller's report.[150] Along with the four banks reported subpoenaed April 15, additionally Morgan Stanley, Wells Fargo & Co, Capital One Financial Corp., Royal Bank of Canada, and Toronto Dominion Bank are subpoenaed in Trump finance probe.[151][152] Nadler says that he will subpoena the unredacted report.[153] Judge Howell rules the foreign company fighting a grand jury subpoena from Mueller is no longer in contempt. Earlier, Mueller transferred the investigatory thread involving the company to the D.C. U.S. Attorney's office.[35] Report on the Investigation Into Russian Interference in the 2016 Presidential Election (2019) — initial release with redactions by Barr April 18: Barr holds a press conference about the special counsel's report, Report on the Investigation into Russian Interference in the 2016 Presidential Election (the Mueller Report). The redacted report was released around 11 A.M. EDT.[154][155] The report couldn't recommend criminal charges,[150] due to the DoJ's Office of Legal Counsel (OLC) policy created in the wake of the Watergate scandal saying that a sitting president is unindictable. The Speaker of the House schedules a conference call with the leadership of Congress on whether or not to begin formal impeachment proceedings the following Monday.[156] April 19: Nadler issues a subpoena demanding delivery of the full version of the Mueller Report to the House Judiciary Committee by May 1.[157] Politico reports that the 2020 Trump Campaign fired Jones Day, Don McGahn's law firm, at least partly in retaliation over McGahn's cooperation with Mueller. Their new lawyer is Nathan Groth, a former lawyer for Scott Walker and the Republican National Committee (RNC). The campaign claims it is a cost-savings move, and Jones Day declines to comment.[158] April 22: Nadler issues a subpoena to McGahn demanding that he provide the House Judiciary Committee with documents by May 7 and testify before the committee on May 21.[159] The House Democratic leadership tells fellow House Democrats in a conference call that House committees will investigate Trump without holding impeachment hearings. The call follows a letter from Pelosi to fellow House Democrats in which she claims the House can hold Trump accountable without impeachment hearings.[160] Trump sues Cummings in attempt to block the House Oversight Chairman's subpoena of longtime accounting firm for the Trump family and businesses, Mazars USA.[161][162] Secretary Mnuchin's response to Chairman Neal regarding the production of Trump's tax returns April 23: Mnuchin sends Neal a letter expressing "some of the legal concerns" the administration has with his request for Trump's tax returns. He says a decision will not be made on producing the returns until the Treasury Department receives a legal opinion from the Justice Department on May 6. The letter, which reads like a legal brief, calls into question the legality of the request and says it is politically motivated. IRS Commissioner Rettig sends a separate letter to Neal in which he says Justice Department review is "beyond the scope of internal revenue laws," leaving him unsure of what to do. Earlier in the day, White House spokesman Hogan Gidley says the Trump administration will reject requests for Trump's returns because of Trump's claim he is under audit.[163] No law actually prevents tax returns from being released due to an audit, as emphasized by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue.[164][165] Former White House personnel security director Carl Kline skips a House Oversight Committee hearing on White House security procedures. He was instructed to do so by White House deputy counsel Michael M. Purpura in a letter that says the subpoena issued by the committee ordering Kline to testify "unconstitutionally encroaches on fundamental executive branch interests." Kline's attorney, Robert Driscoll, told the committee that Kline would follow the instructions of the branch of government that employs him. He is currently an employee of the Defense Department, which is part of the executive branch. Chairman Cummings announces that the committee will begin contempt of Congress proceedings against Kline.[166] Manafort transfers to federal prison.[167] Lawyers for Giorgi Rtskhiladze send a letter to Barr demanding a correction to a footnote in the Mueller Report (Volume II, pp. 27–28, footnote 112)[28] that selectively quotes from a text message exchange between Rtskhiladze and Cohen about compromising tapes of Trump from his 2013 visit to Moscow. The letter asserts that the tapes were rumors and provides a screenshot of the text messages in context.[168] April 24: Facebook discloses in a quarterly earnings report that it set aside $3 billion to cover legal expenses related to Cambridge Analytica, and that it expects a $3–$5 billion fine from the FTC for its actions involving the firm, though no settlement has been reached.[169] April 25: The Privacy Commissioner of Canada and the Information and Privacy Commissioner for British Columbia release a joint report on the findings of their investigation into Facebook's interactions with Cambridge Analytica and the resulting abuses of user privacy. They conclude that Facebook broke Canadian privacy laws and has been uncooperative in finding solutions that would prevent future violations despite the company's public statements to the contrary.[170] April 26: Maria Butina is sentenced to 18 months of prison on charges of conspiracy.[171] Senate Intelligence Committee member Marco Rubio tells The New York Times that Russian hackers gained access to a Florida county election system in 2016 and were "in a position" to change voter registration data, but the affected county was never told because it was discovered through an intelligence operation. Rubio says that he can't reveal more because his position on the committee prevents him from sharing classified information.[172] April 30: A letter by Mueller objecting to Barr's characterization of his report is leaked to the press.[173] May[edit] May 1: Attorney General Barr testifies before the Senate Judiciary committee on the Mueller Report.[174] Assistant Attorney General Stephen Boyd sends Nadler a letter informing him that the Department of Justice will not provide the House Judiciary Committee with an unredacted copy of the Mueller Report as demanded by a Committee subpoena.[175] May 2: Barr fails to appear at a House Judiciary Committee hearing. The Department of Justice informed Nadler the day before that Barr objected to the committee's plan to have committee staff attorneys ask questions. Nadler ends the hearing early with a warning that Barr will be held in contempt of Congress if he does not provide the full Mueller Report and underlying evidence to the Committee.[175] May 5: Trump tweets "Bob Mueller should not testify".[176][177] Secretary Mnuchin Response to Chairman Neal in which he refuses to release Trump's tax returns to Congress May 6: Cohen begins his prison sentence.[74] Barr refuses to comply with House subpoena of unredacted Mueller Report. Contempt citation scheduled for 48 hours later.[178] US Treasury Secretary Steven Mnuchin refuses to give Trump's tax returns to the House Ways and Means Committee.[179][180] May 7: CNN reports Mueller tried to block the release of Comey's contemporaneous memos over concerns that Trump and other witnesses would change their stories after reading them.[181] May 8: Trump asserts executive privilege over the full, unredacted Mueller Report.[182][183][184][185][186] The US House Committee on the Judiciary votes to hold US AG Barr in contempt of Congress after he failed to comply with a subpoena ordering him to provide them with the full, unredacted version of the Mueller Report last week. The full House will vote on the measure in the near future.[187] The Senate Intelligence Committee, chaired by Republican Richard Burr, subpoenas Trump Jr. to answer questions about his previous testimony related to the Russia investigation, particularly the Trump Tower Moscow project and his Russian contacts.[188][189][190] May 9: The New York Times reports that Giuliani and lawyer Victoria Toensing will be traveling to Kiev within a few days to investigate the origins of the Mueller investigation. He is seeking a meeting with incoming president Zelensky to discuss alleged Ukrainian interference in the 2016 presidential election to help Clinton. He tells the Times that he is seeking information that "will be very, very helpful to my client, and may turn out to be helpful to my government." Lev Parnas is helping with the arrangements in Kiev.[191] Trump–Ukraine scandal A request by U.S. president Trump (right) to Ukrainian president Zelensky (left) to investigate Joe Biden and his son sparked the scandal. Events List Presidency of Donald Trump 2019 Ukrainian presidential election Impeachment inquiry against Donald Trump Impeachment of Donald Trump Impeachment trial of Donald Trump 2020 U.S. presidential election Foreign interference in the 2020 United States elections People White House President Donald Trump John Bolton Pam Bondi Tom Bossert Pat Cipollone Fiona Hill Charles Kupperman Mick Mulvaney Mike Pence Tony Sayegh Justice Department Michael Atkinson William Barr State Department Ulrich Brechbuhl Catherine Croft David Hale David Holmes George Kent Steve Linick Michael McKinley Mike Pompeo Philip Reeker Gordon Sondland Bill Taylor Kurt Volker Jennifer Williams Marie Yovanovitch Defense Department Laura Cooper Kathryn L. Wheelbarger National Security Council John Eisenberg Tim Morrison Alexander Vindman Intelligence Joseph Maguire Congress Nancy Pelosi Adam Schiff Lindsey Graham Devin Nunes Pete Sessions Kashyap Patel Elise Stefanik Jim Jordan Ukrainians Volodymyr Zelensky Andriy Bohdan Dmytro Firtash Serhiy Leshchenko Mykola Zlochevsky Yuriy Lutsenko Surrogates Rudy Giuliani Jay Sekulow Scholars Noah Feldman Michael Gerhardt Pamela S. Karlan Jonathan Turley Related Hunter Biden Joe Biden Igor Fruman Amos Hochstein Lev Parnas Rick Perry John Solomon Russell Vought Mark Zaid Companies List Burisma CrowdStrike Naftogaz Conspiracy theories List Conspiracy theories related to the Trump–Ukraine scandal Russia investigation origins counter-narrative Spygate v t e May 10: It is reported that according to two people briefed, White House officials asked at least twice in the previous month for McGahn to publicly say he never believed the president obstructed justice.[192] House Ways and Means Committee chairman Neal subpoenas Treasury department and IRS for Trump's tax returns.[193] It is reported Trump's personal lawyer Rudy Giuliani is encouraging the government of Ukraine to pursue an investigation into Joe Biden's son Hunter Biden and Hunter's involvement in a gas company Burisma Holdings owned by a Ukrainian oligarch Mykola Zlochevsky to try to discredit Mueller's investigation and undermine the case against Paul Manafort. In September the Trump–Ukraine scandal grows.[194][195] Giuliani announces that he cancelled his trip to Kiev amid reports that he is trying to influence the Ukrainian government to help Trump win re-election.[196] May 13: Barr appoints U.S. Attorney for the District of Connecticut John Durham to lead an "investigation into the investigators", and any potential criminality that may have occurred in the initiation of the FBI's Crossfire Hurricane investigation and Special Counsel investigations.[197][198][199] Richard Pinedo completes his term of imprisonment.[200] May 14: Mueller investigation's sentencing for Rick Gates was due,[201] but is postponed due to Gates continuing cooperation, particularly in regards to the Stone trial preparation.[202] Hearing for Trump's bid to block Congress' demand on his financial records from Mazars USA,[203][204] occurs.[205] Republican Florida Governor Ron DeSantis announces Russians hacked voting databases in two Florida counties prior to the 2016 presidential election and no election results were compromised.[206][207][208] Trump Jr. agrees to give "limited" testimony in a private interview in mid-June to the Senate Intelligence Committee.[209] May 15: In a letter to House Judiciary Committee chairman Jerry Nadler, White House counsel Pat Cipollone states the White House will not comply with the Committee's March 4 letters requesting information and documents, asserting the request was designed "not to further a legitimate legislative purpose, but rather to conduct a pseudo law enforcement investigation on matters that were already the subject of the Special Counsel's long-running investigation and are outside the constitutional authority of the legislative branch."[210][211] May 16: Barr denies he is blocking Mueller's testimony to Congress.[212] U.S. District Judge Emmet G. Sullivan orders the government to make public by May 31 the redacted portions of the Mueller report related to Flynn, transcripts of a 2016 phone call between Flynn and Kislyak, and a voicemail left by Trump's lawyer John M. Dowd for Flynn's lawyer. Sullivan further orders that he be provided with copies of the recordings to review in chambers.[213] May 17: Treasury Secretary Steven Mnuchin and IRS Commissioner Charles Rettig defy the May 10 subpoena of Trump's tax returns.[214] May 18: Republican U.S. Representative Justin Amash tweets "Few members of Congress have read the [Mueller] report", while becoming the first GOP congressperson calling for Trump's impeachment.[215][216][217] May 19: It is reported anti-money launders at Deutsche Bank AG recommended in 2016 and 2017 transactions involving Trump and Kushner-controlled entities be reported to a unit of the Treasury Department that polices financial crimes. The report is denied by the Bank that it prevented Trump transactions from being flagged.[218][219][220] May 20: It is reported Russians linked to 2016 U.S. election interference discussed plans to promote unrest and even violence inside the U.S. as recently as 2018.[221] Judge Amit Mehta of the United States District Court for the District of Columbia rules that accounting firm Mazars USA must comply with a subpoena issued by the House Oversight Committee to turn over Trump's financial records.[222][223][224][225][226] It is reported Cohen told lawmakers earlier this year that one of Trump's personal attorneys Jay Sekulow told Cohen to lie to Congress by saying the Trump Tower Moscow deal ended nearly six months before they actually ended on January 31, 2016; and suggested he might be pardoned if he helped "shut down" the Russia investigation.[227][228] May 21: House Judiciary subpoenas Hicks and former Deputy White House Counsel Annie Donaldson in regards to their actions during the special counsel investigation.[229] At Trump's direction, McGahn fails to appear at hearing in front of the House Judiciary Committee per subpoena.[230][231][232][233] It is reported that according to a confidential draft legal memo written by IRS staffers the IRS must honor congressional requests for Trump's tax returns unless Trump invokes executive privilege.[234][235] Trump's former Secretary of State Rex Tillerson met with the House Foreign Affairs Committee in a closed-door private session, during which he talked about his attempts to tackle Russian interference in the 2016 election.[236] May 22: The DoJ agrees to provide the House Intelligence Committee with intelligence files from the Mueller investigation.[237][238][239] It is reported, per unsealed search warrants, Cohen communicated more than 1,000 times during eight months with the Intrater with ties to Vekselberg, regarding plans to give Flynn a proposal to lift sanctions against Russia.[240] Judge Edgardo Ramos of the SDNY rejected the Trump suit against Deutsche Bank, ruling the bank must comply with congressional subpoenas.[241][242] May 23: Trump orders intelligence community to fully cooperate with Barr's investigation into 2016 surveillance, and granted Barr "full and complete" authority to declassify any classified information pertaining to the investigation.[243] May 29: Mueller addresses the nation on the Russia probe and its results,[244] stating that "If we had had confidence that the President clearly did not commit a crime, we would have said so" and that “the Constitution requires a process other than the criminal justice system to formally accuse a sitting president of wrongdoing,” while also stating his investigation made the "conclusion that there was insufficient evidence to charge" on conspiracy with Russia. May 31: Federal prosecutors refuse to comply with a court order to release redacted sections of Mueller report in regards to Flynn and with other relevant materials, saying that they're "unnecessary," and thus Judge Emmet G. Sullivan shouldn't have them.[245] After a year of trying to avoid testimony, Ex-Stone aide Andrew Miller finally testifies before what was the Mueller grand jury.[246] Stone appears in court to get his case dismissed and fails.[246] June[edit] Early June: Steele is interviewed for 16 hours by Michael E. Horowitz-led DoJ Inspector General.[247][248] June 3: House Judiciary committee announces a series of hearings related to the Mueller Report titled "Presidential Obstruction and Other Crimes".[249] June 4: Hicks and Donaldson are instructed by the Trump Administration to defy congressional subpoenas.[250] Judge Sullivan rules that the government no longer needs to make public the Flynn-Kislyak transcripts or provide to him the recordings of Flynn, Kislyak and Dowd after prosecutors refused to do so on May 31.[251] June 6: Flynn fires Covington & Burling attorneys Robert Kelner and Stephen Anthony, who had negotiated his plea deal.[252] The 2017 audio of the voicemail of former Trump attorney John M. Dowd's voicemail to the lawyer of Flynn was released.[253] June 10: House Judiciary committee hearing "Lessons from the Mueller Report: Presidential Obstruction and Other Crimes" is scheduled, with John Dean as a witness.[249] June 12: Flynn hires Sidney Powell as his new attorney, who had previously urged him to withdraw his guilty plea.[254] June 13: House Intelligence Committee subpoenas Flynn and Gates.[255] June 16: Airing this date, in George Stephanopoulos' 20/20 interview he asks Trump "Your campaign this time around, if foreigners, if Russia, if China, if someone else offers you information on opponents, should they accept it or should they call the FBI?" and Trump suggests he doesn't consider it interference.[256] June 19: Hicks testifies before the House Judiciary Committee in closed doors testimony.[257] June 24: Regarding a potential violation of the Presidential Records Act, the House Oversight Committee chairman demands notes taken by an aide, present during a meeting between Putin and Trump during the 2017 G20 Hamburg summit which was previously undisclosed.[258] Donaldson and the House Judiciary agree to receive her testimony.[259] Flynn's sentencing is delayed to allow his new lawyer more time to study the case documents.[260] July[edit] July 8: The White House blocks former chief of staff to ex-White House counsel McGahn Annie Donaldson, whose contemporaneous notes are cited 65 times in the Mueller report, from answering 212 questions about potential obstruction of justice by Trump.[261] July 9: It is reported the DoJ is attempting to discourage Aaron Zebley and James L. Quarles, two of Robert Mueller's deputies, from testifying before Congress.[262] July 11: The House Judiciary Committee is scheduled to vote on authorizing subpoenas for 12 of Robert Mueller's witnesses; including Kushner, Sessions, Rosenstein, Flynn, Kelly, Lewandowski, as well as Dylan Howard and David Pecker, two executives at American Media, Inc., and Keith Davidson, an attorney who previously represented Stormy Daniels.[263][264] July 15: The trial of Bijan Kian, Flynn's business partner, begins in federal court in Alexandria, Virginia. Kian is accused of acting as an unregistered agent of the Turkish government while a member of the Trump transition team.[265] July 16: Former Ecuadorian President Rafael Correa tells CNN that his government knew in 2016, that Assange was interfering in the U.S. election.[266] The Ukrainian Sixth Administrative Court of Appeals overturns the December 12, 2018 ruling by the Kiev Administrative District Court, that National Anti-Corruption Bureau director Artem Sytnyk and member of the Ukrainian Parliament Serhiy Leshchenko acted illegally when they revealed that Manafort's name and signature were in Yanukovych's "black ledger".[267] July 18: ABC News reports that the Trump administration is again invoking executive privilege to block intelligence committees from seeing classified Mueller documents.[268] July 21: On Fox News Sunday, Chairman Nadler says: "The [Mueller] report presents very substantial evidence that the president is guilty of high crimes and misdemeanors ..."[269][270][271] July 23: Kian is found guilty of illegally lobbying for Turkey and conspiring with Flynn and Alptekin to cover up his activities. Federal Judge Anthony J. Trenga announces he will rule on September 5 whether he will throw out the convictions for lack of evidence. Sentencing is set for October 18.[272][273] July 24: Mueller testifies before the House Intelligence and Judiciary Committees.[274][275] Mueller reiterated his concern over foreign interference in U.S. elections, which he considered a serious threat.[276] Senate Republican Cindy Hyde-Smith blocks two election security bills and a cybersecurity measure.[277][278] Mitch McConnell blocks the two election security measures.[279] Senate Intelligence Committee report on Russian Active Measures Campaigns and Interference in the 2016 U.S. Election Volume 1 A memorandum with a non-verbatim record of the call between Trump and Zelensky released by the White House. As such, it is not a transcript of the call. July 25: House Oversight and Reform Committee votes to subpoena senior White House officials' communications via private email accounts and messaging applications.[280] Senate Intelligence report on Russian interference in the 2016 election made public.[281] The report found the Russian government directed extensive activity, beginning in at least 2014 and carrying into at least 2017, against U.S. election infrastructure at the state and local level. The report recommends additional funding through Congress for states to improve election security once the $380 million appropriated in 2018 is spent.[282][283][284][285] Trump calls President of Ukraine Volodymyr Zelensky, which later in September sparks the Trump–Ukraine scandal.[286] Vice President Mike Pence's representative Keith Kellogg,[287] and US Secretary of State Mike Pompeo were on the call.[288] Approximately 90 minutes after Trump's call, senior budget official Michael Duffey tells Pentagon officials that Trump is personally interested in the Ukraine aid and has ordered the hold himself.[289][290][291][292][293][294] In the phone call, Trump asks Zelensky to investigate CrowdStrike, the company that investigated the 2016 DNC server break-in by the GRU, and makes reference to a server allegedly located in Ukraine. He tells Zelensky to contact Barr for more details. This is widely interpreted by the press as a reference to debunked conspiracy theories propagated by Russian media and Roger Stone, among others, that say the reason the DNC didn't give the server to the FBI for analysis is because it is located in Ukraine. The same conspiracy theories also claim the company is owned by a wealthy Ukrainian.[295] July 26: Senate Intelligence Committee's new report on election interference concluded Russia probably targeted the election systems in all 50 states in the 2016 elections.[296][297] House Judiciary Committee asks judge Beryl Howell to unseal Mueller's secret grand jury evidence.[298][299][300][301] Trump calls Boris Johnson to congratulate him on becoming the new Prime Minister of the UK. On the call, he asks Johnson to help him discredit the Mueller investigation.[302] July 30: U.S. District Judge John Koeltl dismisses the DNC's April 20, 2018, lawsuit accusing the Trump campaign and WikiLeaks of working with Russia to disseminate stolen DNC documents. Judge Koetl said the dissemination was protected by the First Amendment because they were not involved in stealing the material. The DNC suit alleged that only Russia was involved in the theft.[303] August[edit] August 2: Giuliani meets with Zelensky aide Andrey Yermak [Wikidata] in Madrid to discuss the investigations of Zlochevsky and of Ukrainian interference in the 2016 election that Trump wants the Ukrainian government to pursue.[304] August 6: Judge Jackson dismisses one of the charges against Gregory Craig. She writes that there is ambiguity over whether the FARA statute applies to a document Craig wrote in 2013 that contains materially false information.[305][306] Strzok files suit against the FBI and the DOJ over his firing. His complaint asserts that he was denied due process under the 5th amendment because he wasn't given the opportunity to appeal his discharge, and that the release of his text messages violated the Privacy Act. The complaint argues that his firing was politically motivated because it ignored a recommendation from the Office of Professional Responsibility that he be demoted or suspended without pay for 60 days.[307] August 7: House Judiciary Committee sues McGahn to testify before Congress, claiming he is the "most important witness, other than the president," regarding their investigation into possible obstruction of justice by Trump.[308][309][310] McCabe files suit against the FBI and the Justice Department over his firing. His complaint asserts that he was illegally demoted and fired as part of a plan by Trump to remove people who are not loyal to him.[311] August 8: Per the request for House Financial Services and the House Intelligence Committees; Bank of America, Citigroup, Deutsche Bank AG, JPMorgan Chase, Morgan Stanley, and Wells Fargo turn over documents relating to Russians who may have had dealings with the Trump Organization, and/or Trump and his family. Some of the banks also turned over documents to New York state investigators.[312][313][314] For the first time publicly, Nadler states the panel is conducting an impeachment inquiry into Trump.[315] The FBI releases its 302 reports[316] on interviews with Bruce Ohr. The interviews were conducted from November 21, 2016, through May 15, 2017.[317] A redacted version of the whistleblower complaint August 12: A whistleblower in the U.S. intelligence community files a complaint alleging "the President of the United States is using the power of his office to solicit interference from a foreign country in the 2020 U.S. election."[318][319] August 13: Around this date, US ambassador to the European Union Gordon D. Sondland and U.S. State Department special envoy to Ukraine Kurt D. Volker work on drafting a statement for the Ukrainian president that commits Ukraine to investigating Hunter Biden and interference by Ukrainians in the 2016 U.S. election. Giuliani and a top aide to the Ukrainian president are aware of the statement. The Ukrainian government never releases the statement, and it is unclear whether they received it.[320][321] August 15: The House Judiciary Committee issues subpoenas to Lewandowski and Rick Dearborn to testify before the committee on September 17.[322] It is reported Trump is considering invoking executive privilege again, despite Lewandowski having never worked in the White House.[323] Gregory B. Craig's trial begins in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia. He is accused of lying to federal investigators about the work Skadden performed for Manafort and Viktor Yanukovych.[324] August 22: Giuliani confirms the State Department assisted his efforts in pressing the government of Ukraine to probe Democratic opponents of president Trump, regarding Manafort information release.[325] August 26: The House Judiciary Committee subpoenas Rob Porter.[326] September[edit] September 4: Craig is acquitted on all counts.[327] September 9: The House Judiciary committee releases formal parameters of its impeachment investigation.[328][329] It is reported the House Intelligence committee is accusing Flynn of failing to comply with its subpoena.[330][331] It is reported the House Intelligence, Oversight and Foreign Affairs committees are investigating reported efforts by Trump and Giuliani "to pressure the government of Ukraine to assist" Trump's re-election campaign.[332][333] It is reported a former senior Russian official, who was a top CIA asset, and was instrumental to the agency's conclusion that Putin orchestrated the interference in the 2016 presidential election, was extracted from inside Russia in 2017, due to concern over Trump's disclosures of classified information, possibly endangering the asset.[334][335][336] September 11: The House Judiciary Committee approves a resolution defining the rules for its impeachment investigation into Trump.[337][338][339][340] September 12: Judge Trenga considers ruling on Kian's convictions for lack of evidence.[341] Funding was released to Ukraine. See Trump–Ukraine scandal.[342][343][344][345] September 17: Trump orders Dearborn and Rob Porter not to testify at a House Judiciary Committee hearing about Trump's possible obstruction of justice.[346][347][348] Lewandowski refuses to answer dozens of questions about potential obstruction of justice during the House Judiciary Committee hearing "Presidential Obstruction of Justice and Abuse of Power."[349][350][351][352] September 18: The House Intelligence committee has demanded Flynn provide requested documents by this date.[330][331] September 19: After repeatedly blocking Democratic efforts to bring election security legislation to the floor, including a measure that would have authorized funding to update voting equipment, McConnell says he will now back a measure to provide states with an additional $250 million in election security funding.[353][354] Giuliani tells Chris Cuomo on CNN's Cuomo Prime Time that he asked the Ukrainian government to investigate Ukrainian interference in the 2016 election to benefit Clinton. He denies asking Ukraine to investigate Hunter Biden, then admits doing so after further questioning.[355] September 20: It is reported Trump pressured the President of Ukraine eight times to investigate Hunter Biden.[342][343][344][345] September 23: Flynn's lawyer Powell informs the House Intelligence Committee that Flynn will invoke his Fifth Amendment rights instead of testifying before the committee.[356] She writes, Flynn "will not appear before your committee on September 25, 2019 to be paraded, harassed or disparaged for doing so."[357] Bolton tells House Foreign Affairs Committee Chairman Eliot Engel in a phone call that he should "look into the recall of Ambassador Marie Yovanovitch." Later, Engel informs his colleagues on the Oversight, Intelligence, and Foreign Affairs Committees of the conversation.[358] September 24: Judge Trenga overturns the jury verdict against Kian. He rules that there was insufficient evidence to support a guilty verdict.[359] Speaker Pelosi announces the initiation of formal impeachment proceedings by the U.S. House of Representatives against President Trump.[360] September 25: The House Intelligence committee has demanded Flynn appear to testify this day,[330][331] prior to September 23 pleading the Fifth. It is reported Trump urged President Zelensky to "do us a favor" and "look into" potential corruption by Trump's political opponent's son per the White House readout of the July 25 call.[361] Trump responds to an AP reporter at a press conference at the U.N. that he believes Clinton's "missing" emails could be in Ukraine.[362][363] The White House releases a "rough transcript" of the July 35 Trump–Zelinski phone call.[364] September 26: Acting Director of National Intelligence Joseph Maguire testifies before the House Intelligence Committee about why he blocked the whistleblower complaint from being delivered to Congress.[365] The House Intelligence Committee releases an unclassified version of the whistleblower complaint.[366] September 27: The Democratic minority of the Senate Finance Committee releases a report which finds that the NRA acted as a "foreign asset" to Russia ahead of 2016 election.[367][368][369] The report presents detailed evidence of NRA officials' interactions with Russian nationals that bring into question the tax-exempt status of the NRA, including many details of the December 2015 Moscow trip that internal documents show was an official NRA function despite subsequent public denials.[370][369] House Democrats decide on a strategy to narrow the impeachment inquiry to focus on Donald Trump's phone call with Ukraine's president Volodymyr Zelensky.[371][372][373] Three House committees (Intelligence, Oversight and Foreign Affairs) issue subpoenas to Secretary of State Mike Pompeo and five other State Department officials to produce documents relating to the Ukraine phone call.[374] Senators Grassley and Ron Jonson send a letter to the Justice Department as a followup to Grassley's July 20, 2017, letter calling for an investigation into alleged coordination between Alexandra Chalupa and the Ukrainian government to interfere in the 2016 election. They again cite the January 11, 2017 Politico report on alleged Ukrainian interference as evidence.[375][376] Barr and Durham have at least two meetings with Italian intelligence officials in Rome. They are shown evidence on Mifsud and listen to a recording of him being deposed when he reportedly applied for police protection. Public records show Mifsud gave a deposition to justify his application for police protection after he left Link Campus University, but after Barr and Durham's meetings, two intelligence sources tell ANSA that Mifsud did not apply for police protection.[377][378][379] September 30: The House Oversight Committee issue a subpoena to Trump's personal attorney, Rudy Giuliani, as well as to three of Giuliani's associates, for documents relating to the Ukraine call.[380] It is reported Trump may have lied to Mueller about his knowledge of his campaign's contacts with WikiLeaks, citing the grand jury redactions in the Mueller Report.[381] October[edit] October 1: Washington, DC federal judge orders the DoJ to produce 500 pages of memos documenting what witnesses told Mueller's office and the FBI during their investigation, requiring the DoJ to produce their first set of documents by November 1.[382] Italian newspaper il Foglio publishes a photo of Mifsud in Switzerland with a copy of the Swiss newspaper Zürichsee-Zeitung dated May 21, 2018, as proof that he is still alive. Mifsud has not been seen since October 2017.[383] Pompeo informs the chairmen of the House Foreign Affairs, Intelligence, and Oversight and Reform committees that the five State Department officials scheduled to be deposed in the House impeachment inquiry over the next two weeks will not appear.[384] He characterizes the depositions as "an attempt to intimidate, bully, and treat improperly, the distinguished professionals of the Department of State."[385] October 2: Senator Graham sends an official letter to Prime Ministers Scott Morrison of Australia, Giuseppe Conte of Italy, and Boris Johnson of the U.K. asking them to assist Barr in his investigation of the Trump–Russia dossier (Steele dossier), Mifsud, and Australian diplomat Alexander Downer.[386][387] Australian ambassador to the U.S. Joe Hockey responds that his government already offered assistance to Barr in May and strongly rejects Graham's characterization of Downer as working for the FBI to spy on Papadopoulos.[388][387] State Department Inspector General Steve Linick delivers a "packet of propaganda and disinformation" to House impeachment investigators promoting conspiracy theories about former U.S. ambassador to Ukraine Marie Yovanovich. The State Department received the packet in the Spring, allegedly from the White House. Giuliani tells CNN that he is the source of the material.[389] October 3: House impeachment investigators depose Volker.[390] He tells the investigators that he warned Giuliani that Ukrainian claims about Bidens' alleged misconduct were not credible.[391] October 4: Pompeo misses the deadline for providing documents to the House impeachment inquery. At a press conference with the foeign minister of Greece, he tells reporters that he sent a letter as "our initial response to the document request. We’ll obviously do all the things we’re required to do by law."[392] House impeachment investigators depose Intelligence Community Inspector General Michael Atkinson.[393] October 7: U.S. SDNY Federal Judge Victor Marrero rules that the President is not immune from investigation and prosecution by state prosecutors while in office regardless of any legal opinions by the Justice Department. Marrero calls Trump's argument "repugnant to the nation’s governmental structure and constitutional values."[394] This is considered to be the first ruling on the Justice Department memos that claim the President is immune from prosecution while in office.[395] Deputy Assistant Secretary of State George P. Kent fails to appear for his scheduled voluntary deposition with the House impeachment investigators.[396] John Dowd, in is capacity as legal counsel for Lev Parnas and Igor Fruman, tells the Miami Herald that his clients will ignore House subpoenas for documents and skip their scheduled voluntary depositions with House impeachment investigators.[397] Senate Intelligence Committee report on Russian Active Measures Campaigns and Interference in the 2016 U.S. Election Volume 2 October 8: The Senate Intelligence Committee releases volume two of its report on Russian interference in the 2016 U.S. elections.[398] Cipollone sends a letter to Speaker Pelosi, Chairman Schiff, Chairman Cummings, and Chairman Eliot Engel informing them that the White House will not cooperate with the House impeachment inquiry.[399][400] The White House blocks Sondland's volantary deposition with House impeachment investigators hours before the scheduled time.[396] State Department counselor T. Ulrich Brechbuhl fails to appear for his voulntary deposition with House impeachment investigators.[396] October 9: Parnas and Fruman are arrested at Dulles International Airport holding one-way tickets to Frankfurt on Lufthansa Airlines.[401] October 10: The Washington Post reports that former Italian prime minister Matteo Renzi and Link Campus University are both suing Papadopoulos for libel because of his public statements accusing Renzi and the university of helping Obama orchestrate Mifsud's activities. Renzi is asking for $1 million.[378] Federal prosecutors unseal an indictment accusing Parnas, Fruman, David Correia, and Andrey Kukushkin of violating campaign finance laws in 2018 to funnel money from a Russian national to political action committees (PACs) and campaigns supporting Trump, West Virginia Attorney General Patrick Morrisey, and state and federal candidates in Nevada, New York, and other states.[402] The indictment alleges a contribution to one Congressman was made in exchange for pressure to remove Ambassador Yovanovitch from her post in Ukraine.[401][403] In the indictment, Yovanovitch is identified as "Ambassador",[401] Nevada gubernetorial candidate Adam Lexalt as "Candidate-1",[404] Nevada state attorney general candidate Wes Duncan as "Candidate-2",[404] Trump's main super-PAC America First Action as "Committee-1",[405] Morissey's PAC 35th Inc. as "Committee-2",[406] House Minority Leader Kevin McCarthy's joint fundraising committee Protect the House as "Committee-3",[407] and U.S. Representative Pete Sessions as "Congressman-1".[408] Parnas misses his voluntary deposition with House impeachment investigators.[396] The White House tells Yavonovitch not to appear for her House deposition.[409] Career diplomat Michael McKinley resigns from the State Department over Trump's attacks on Yovanovitch. His latest position was senior advisor to Secretary of State Pompeo.[410][411] October 11: House impeachment investigators depose Marie Yovanovitch.[412][413][409][414] Trump repeats his assertion that because he is president, he cannot be investigated by any prosecutor.[415] Fruman skips his voluntary deposition with House impeachment investigators.[396] October 14: House impeachment investigators cancel Giliuani associate Semyon Kislin's scheduled deposition after he reaches a cooperation agreement with the House Intelligence Committee.[416] Sondland misses the deadline for providing subpoenaed documents to House impeachment investigators. His attorneys say he us unable to produce the documents without permission from the State Department.[396] House impeachment investigators depose former National Security Council official Fiona Hill.[417][418] October 15: Deadline for Giuliani to comply with House Oversight Committee subpoena,[380] passes with Giuliani stating he won't comply with a congressional subpoena.[419][420] Pence says he will not comply with a document request regarding Trump's July 25 call with Zelensky from House impeachment investigators.[421][422] The Office of Management and Budget (OMB) states it won't comply with a congressional subpoena over documents, which were requested October 7, about withholding military aid to Ukraine. The acting budget director Russell Vought refuses to testify on October 25.[423][424] House impeachment investigators depose senior State Department official George Kent.[425][426] October 16: House impeachment investigators depose McKinley.[427][411] October 17: Acting White House chief of staff Mick Mulvaney tells reporters at a White House press conference that Trump withheld $400 million of military aid to Ukraine in order to force them to investigate "corruption related to the DNC server." He defends the move as "absolutely appropriate."[428][429] House impeachment investigators depose Sondland.[430][431] House Ovesight and Reform Committee Chairman Elijah Cummings dies from "complications concerning longstanding health challenges." He chaired one of the three House committees conducting the impeachment inquiry.[432] October 18: Kian is scheduled for sentencing,[272] prior to September 24 overturning. Assistant Secretary of Energy Melissa F. Burnison informs House impeachment investigators that the Department of Energy will not produce the documents subpoenaed from Secretary Rick Perry, citing Cipollone's October 8 letter calling the subpoenaes invalid.[433][434] October 21: House impeachment investigators postpone the depositions scheduled for October 24–25 because of a scheduling conflict with Congressman Cumming's memorial services.[435] October 22: House impeachment investigators depose William B. Taylor Jr..[436][437][438][439] October 23: House Republicans barge into the secure room in the basement of the Capitol building used by the House committees conducting the impeachment inquiry to depose witnesses. They refuse to leave for five hours as they protest the deposition process. There presence violates House rules because they bring electronic devices into a room secured for discussing highly sensitive or classified information.[440] House impeachment investigators depose deputy assistant secretary of defense for Russia, Ukraine and Eurasia Laura Cooper after the unauthorized Republican protesters clear out of the secure room.[441][440] October 25: Butina is released from federal prison in Florida and deported to Russia.[442][443] Judge Howell orders the Justice Department to hand over to the House Judiciary Committee all of the grand jury materials referenced in the Mueller report, as well as any grand jury redactions in the Mueller report itself, by October 30.[444] She rules that an impeachment resolution voted on by the full House has never been required for House committees to perform an impeachment investigation.[445] The House subpoenas OMB officials Michael Duffey and Russell Vought, and Brechbuhl to testify in the impeachment inquiry on November 5 and 6.[446] Former Deputy National Security Advisor Charles Kupperman files suit asking for guidance from a federal court on whether he should comply with a Congressional subpoena issued by the impeachment inquiry or follow the White House's instructions to ignore it.[447] October 26: House impeachment investigators depose Philip T. Reeker, the acting under secretary in charge of European and Eurasian Affairs.[448][449] October 27: Kupperman skips his scheduled deposition with House impeachment investigators.[450] October 28: Alexander Vindman releases his opening statement for his deposition the next day.[451] October 29: House impeachment investigators depose Lieutenant Colonel Alexander Vindman.[452][453] October 30: The Court order to turn over Mueller's secret grand jury evidence to the House Judiciary Committee, which Attorney General William Barr had withheld, is stayed during appeal.[454] House impeachment investigators depose State Department Ukraine expert Catherine Croft and foreign service officer Christopher Anderson.[455][456][457] Acting assistant secretary for international security affairs Kathryn Wheelbarger misses her rescheduled deposition.[396] October 31: House impeachment investigators depose National Security Council Russia and Europe Director Tim Morrison.[458][459] The House passes a resolution putting in place formal rules for the impeachment process.[460] In a hearing on McGahn's challenge to a Congressional subpoena for testimony, Judge Ketanji Brown Jackson calls the Trump administration's claim that McGahn cannot be compelled to testify a "peculiar" argument threatening the checks and balances in the Constitution.[461] In the Kupperman case, Judge Richard J. Leon sets December 10 as an expedited hearing date.[461] November[edit] November 1: The OLC issues an opinion stating that Executive Branch employees cannot be compelled to testify before Congress without the assistance of counsel from the agencies for which they work.[462][463] U.S. Department of Energy press secretary Shaylyn Hynes announces that Secretary Rick Perry will not participate in impeachment depositions, saying he "will not partake in a secret star chamber inquisition where agency counsel is forbidden to be present."[464] November 2: The DoJ starts to produce memos documenting what witnesses told Mueller's office and the FBI during their investigation.[465][466] November 4: Four White House officials fail to appear to give subpoenaed Congressional testimony for the impeachment inquiry: John Eisenberg, Michael Ellis, Robert Blair, and Brian McCormack. The four were ordered not to testify by the White House, which claims the subpoenas are not valid. The White House also claims Eisenberg has blanket immunity from being forced to appear.[467][468] Parnas's attorney Joseph A. Bondy announces that Parnas is ready to assist the House impeachment inquiry with testimony and documents.[469] November 5: Trial of Roger Stone begins.[470][471] Duffey and National Security Council (NSC) director of international energy and environment Wells Griffith fail to appear for their depositions in the impeachment inquiry.[472][473] November 6: Opening arguments in the Stone trial.[474] Under Secretary of State David Hale is deposed in the impeachment inquiry.[475][476] Vought and Brechbuhl fail to appear for their depositions.[477][478][446] November 7: Credico testifies for the prosecution in the Stone trial.[479] National security aide to Pence and State Department employee Jennifer Williams is deposed in the impeachment inquiry.[480][481] John Bolton skips his voluntary deposition.[482] November 8: Credico and Bannon testify in Stone's trial.[483][484][485] Mulvaney refuses to testify before Congress for the impeachment inquiry. His outside counsel William Pittard informs the investigating committees one minute before his scheduled deposition that he was directed by the White House not to testify.[486][487] Bolton's attorney Charles Cooper informs House general counsel Douglas Letter that Bolton has a lot to tell about Ukraine but will not testify unless he receives a subpoena.[482] OMB official Mark Sandy fails to appear for his deposition in the impeachment inquiry.[396] November 12: Gates testifies in Stone's trial. The prosecution rests its case before lunch. The defense plays one hour of a recording of Stone's testimony before the House Intelligence Committee, then rests without calling any witnesses.[488][489] The Republican staff of the House Intelligence, Oversight, and Foreign Affairs Committees circulates a memo[490] among Republican members of the committees to update them on "key points of evidence" from the closed-door impeachment hearings that bolster Trump's defense.[490][491] A subsection of the background information section discusses what they describe as interference by senior Ukrainian government officials in the 2016 U.S. election.[490][491] November 13: The prosecution and defense make closing arguments in the Roger Stone trial.[492] Taylor and Kent testify in the first public impeachment hearing before the House Intelligence Committee.[493] November 15: The jury convicts Stone on all seven counts brought by Special Counsel Robert Mueller of lying to Congress: obstruction of proceedings, five counts of false statements, and one count of witness tampering about his efforts to learn about the anti-secrecy group WikiLeaks' release of hacked Democratic emails in the 2016 presidential election.[494][495][496] Former Ambassador Yovanovitch testifies in a public impeachment hearing before the House Intelligence Committee.[497] House impeachment investigators depose U.S. Embassy in Ukraine official David Holmes.[498][499] The White House releases a "memorandum of telephone conversation", also referred to as a "rough transcript," of the July 25 phone call with Zelinski.[500][501] November 16: House impeachment investigators depose OMB official Mark Sandy.[502][503] November 18: It is reported that the House of Representatives is investigating whether Trump lied to Special Counsel Robert Mueller.[504][505] The D.C. Circuit Court of Appeals schedules arguments for access by House for unredacted Mueller Grand Jury materials. House counsel Douglas Letter argues that the House needs it immediately for the impeachment probe.[506] Paul Erickson pleads guilty to federal wire fraud and money laundering charges. One charge includes transferring $1,000 of an investor's money to Maria Butina.[507] November 19: U.S. District Court Judge Ketanji Brown Jackson announces that she will issue a ruling on November 25 on whether McGahn must honor a subpoena and testify before Congress. The announcement comes after House counsel Doug Letter files a request[508] to expedite the decision so that McGahn's testimony can be used in the impeachment investigation.[509] Vindman, Williams, Volker, and Morrison testify in public impeachment hearings before the House Intelligence Committee.[510][511] November 20: Speaking at an economic forum in Moscow, Putin says, "Thank God nobody is accusing us anymore of interfering in U.S. elections.... Now they're accusing Ukraine. Well, let them sort this out among themselves."[512] Sondland, Cooper, and Hale testify in public impeachment hearings before the House Intelligence Committee.[513][514] November 21: According to a leaked copy of the justice department Inspector General's report on the origins of the Russia investigation, a former low-level FBI lawyer is under criminal investigation by the Justice Department for allegedly altering documents in 2016 related to the FISA Court-approved surveillance of Carter Page.[515][516] In the same leaked document, the Inspector General's report exonerates the FBI of any possible wrongdoing in the origin of the Russia probe.[517] David Holmes and Fiona Hill testify in a public impeachment hearing before the House Intelligence Committee.[518] Hill tells the Committee that the narrative pushed by its Republican members that Ukraine, not Russia, interfered in the 2016 U.S. election "is a fictional narrative that has been perpetrated and propagated by the Russian security services themselves."[519] D.C. District Court ruling ordering Don McGahn to follow a Congressional subpoena to appear before the House Judiciary Committee November 25: Judge Jackson rules that McGahn must testify.[520] November 26: Nadler invites Trump or his counsel to participate in the House Judiciary Committee's first impeachment hearing scheduled for December 4.[521][522] November 27: Federal appeals court stays Judge Jackson's ruling regarding whether McGahn must comply with a House subpoena. Schedules oral arguments for January.[523][524] November 29: Nadler informs Trump that he must decide by December 6 whether or not to participate in the House Judiciary Committee's impeachment hearings after that date.[525][526] December[edit] Report of Evidence in the Democrats' Impeachment Inquiry in the House of Representatives – the Republican response to the impeachment inquiry December 1: Cipollone rejects Nadler's offer for Trump or is attorneys to participate in the December 4 House Judiciary Committee impeachment hearing, calling the entire impeachment process unfair.[527] December 2: The House Intelligence Committee circulates among members its draft report on the impeachment investigation.[528][529][530] Judge Ketanji Brown Jackson refuses to extend stay on the McGahn case.[531] Republican members of the House Intelligence, Oversight, and Foreign Affairs committees release their own report[532] on the impeachment inquiry that calls Schiff unfair and claims that Ukraine interfered in the 2016 U.S. election.[533] The Trump-Ukraine Impeachment Inquiry Report released by the House Intelligence Committee December 3: The House Intelligence Committee votes 13–9 along party lines to release the report[534] on their impeachment inquiry.[535] The DoJ unseals an indictment[536] against Nader and several American straw donors for 2016 donations to Clinton, other Democrats, and the Trump inauguration on behalf of U.A.E. Crown Prince Mohammed bin Zayed al-Nahyan (MbZ). The indictment alleges Nader reimbursed the others for $3.5 million in donations in their names.[537][538] December 4: Leaked IG report draft shows that U.S. Attorney John Durham, who had been conducting an investigation into the origins of the Russia probe told Horowitz that he had found no evidence of any wrongdoing and that right-wing conspiracy theories were merely that.[539] The House Judiciary Committee holds its first impeachment hearing. The hearing focuses on what is considered impeachable, with testimony provided by four constitutional law professors: Noah Feldman, Pamela Karlan, Michael Gerhardt, and Jonathan Turley.[540] December 5: Pelosi asks House committee chairs to prepare articles of impeachment against President Trump.[541] December 6: Cipollone rejects Nadler's invitation for Trump or his attorneys to participate in the House Judiciary Committee's impeachment hearings, writing, "House Democrats have wasted enough of America’s time with this charade.[542] You should end this inquiry now and not waste even more time with additional hearings."[543] DoJ Inspector General report – Review of Four FISA Applications and Other Aspects of the FBI's Crossfire Hurricane Investigation December 9: The DoJ Inspector General Horowitz's report on the Russia investigation is released, confirming previously leaked exonerations.[544] House Intelligence Committee staffers present to the House Judiciary Committee the case for the impeachment of the President.[545] During the hearing, Daniel S. Goldman claimed "Trump's persistent and continuing effort to coerce a foreign country to help him cheat to win an election is a clear and present danger to our free and fair elections and to our national security."[546][547] December 10: House Judiciary Committee introduced two articles of impeachment against Trump, charging him with abuse of power and obstruction of the impeachment inquiry.[548][549] Trump castigates FBI Director Wray on Twitter for supporting the conclusions of the DoJ IG report.[550][551] At a hearing in the Kupperman case, House lawyers move to dismiss his lawsuit asking for guidance on whether he should comply with Congressional subpoenas. They assure Judge Leon that they have dropped his subpoena and will not be calling him to testify in the future. Kupperman's lawyer asks the judge to continue the case so that Kupperman can get a definitive answer.[552] December 11: The Senate Judiciary Committee holds hearings on the DoJ IG report.[553] The House Judiciary Committee begins debating the articles of impeachment.[554] December 12: The House Judiciary Committee continues debating the articles of impeachment for 14 hours, with the Democrat majority voting down Republican amendments that would have diluted the articles.[555] December 13: House Judiciary Committee approves articles of impeachment against President Trump on a partisan vote.[556] The Supreme Court grants certiorari on Presidential immunity in criminal cases.[557] December 16: Mike Flynn's sentencing is rescheduled after U.S. District Judge Emmet G. Sullivan D.C. dismissed Flynn's motion to find prosecutors in contempt.[558] The House Judiciary Committee files a supplemental brief in the U.S. Court of Appeals for the D.C. Circuit regarding the committee's suit to access Mueller grand jury material.[559] December 17: Rick Gates sentenced to 45 days in jail and three years probation.[560] The House Rules Committee debates and approves the rules for the House impeachment debate and vote.[561] December 18: The House votes to pass both articles of impeachment against President Trump, making him only the third President in American history to have been impeached.[562] December 20: Justice Department claims that McGahn case is moot now that impeachment has been done.[563] December 23: In reply, the House's counsel states that further impeachment articles are possible and thus the suit "In re: Don McGahn" is not moot.[564] December 24: Deadline for written arguments in the Justice Department's appeal of the lawsuit over access by House impeachment investigators to the Mueller Grand Jury evidence and to force the testimony of McGahn.[506] December 30: The Bolton/Kupperman case is dismissed as moot.[565] 2020[edit] January[edit] Early January: Prosecutors recommended Flynn serve up to six months in jail; which is overruled on Jan. 29, when new a sentencing recommendation asks for only probation for Flynn.[566] January 3: Oral arguments in the House's suit against the Justice Department over access to unredacted grand jury testimony in the Mueller probe.[506] and in the McGahn case.[523] The possibility of gun battles is discussed.[567] January 4: Mueller records show that Manafort admits to link from Russian intelligence to origins of Ukraine investigation.[568] January 7: Prosecutors recommend prison time for Flynn.[569] January 14: Flynn asks to withdraw his guilty plea.[570] January 15: The House votes to send the articles of impeachment to the Senate.[571] Pelosi signs the articles of impeachment, and the House managers formally deliver the articles to the Senate.[572] January 16: The impeachment trial of Donald Trump begins with the swearing in of Chief Justice John Roberts and 99 of the 100 Senators. The Senators then unanimously vote to issue a summons requiring President Trump respond in writing by the evening of Saturday, January 18, to the charges against him. The Senate then adjourns until the morning of January 20.[573] Flynn sentencing is postponed yet again after he asks to withdraw his guilty plea.[574] February[edit] February 5: Barr issues new restrictions on investigations into politically sensitive individuals or entities, including requiring he approve any inquiry into a presidential candidate or campaign.[575][576] Wray warns of Russia's continuing "information warfare" against the US heading into the 2020 election.[577] Donald Trump is acquitted on both impeachment charges by the Senate.[578][579] February 7: Alexander Vindman fired,[580] and his brother Yevgeny is escorted out of the White House and removed from his position.[581] Trump fires Sondland.[582] February 10: Judge indefinitely postpones Flynn sentencing.[583] In a sentencing memo filing, federal prosecutors recommend Stone serve 7–9 years.[584] Schumer calls on all 74 inspectors general to investigate retaliation against whistleblowers who report presidential misconduct, after the firing of Lt. Col. Alexander Vindman.[585][586][587] February 11: Senator Marsha Blackburn (R-Tenn.) blocks three election security bills.[588] Under Trump's pressure, the DoJ abruptly moves to seek a shorter prison sentence for Stone.[589] February 12: Trump defends Stone in a series of tweets while attacking federal judge Amy Berman Jackson and the prosecutors involved in the case, and confirms that Barr intervened in Stone's sentencing recommendation. Trump also implies Judge Jackson is biased because of her role in the sentencing of Manafort and dismissal of a lawsuit against Hillary Clinton.[590][591] Trump withdraws Jessie K. Liu's nomination to become the Treasury Department's terrorism and financial crimes undersecretary because of her office's handling of the Stone and Flynn cases.[592][593][594][595] All four federal prosecutors resign from Stone's case after Barr's Justice Department announced that it planned to reduce its own sentencing recommendation.[596][597][598][599] It is reported Judge Jackson denied Stone's request for a new trial.[600] Jessie K. Liu resigns.[601][602] February 14: It is reported Barr has assigned outside prosecutors, including Jeffrey Jensen and prosecutors from the office of the Deputy Attorney General, to review the handling of cases against involving former Trump national security adviser Michael Flynn and the Blackwater founder Erik Prince. It is also reported Flynn case federal prosecutors have been pressured by senior DoJ officials to recommend a lighter sentence for Flynn than they had previously proposed.[603][604][566][605] February 17: More than 2,000 DoJ officials and former prosecutors call for Barr's resignation.[606] February 18: The Washington Post reports that the Federal Judges Association, representing 1,100 life-term federal judges, has an called an emergency meeting that "could not wait" regarding Barr.[607][608] February 19: Assange's barrister alleged at Westminster Magistrates' Court that Rohrabacher had visited Assange at the Ecuadorian embassy in August 2017 and, on instructions from President Trump, offered a pardon if Assange said Russia had no role in the 2016 Democratic National Committee email leaks. White House Press Secretary Stephanie Grisham denied the allegations.[609] Rohrabacher had previously confirmed the August 16 meeting, saying he and Assange talked about "what might be necessary to get him out" and discussed a presidential pardon in exchange for information on the theft of DNC emails that were published by WikiLeaks before the 2016 presidential election.[610] February 20: Roger Stone sentenced to 40 months in prison, a $20,000 fine, and two years of supervised release.[611] February 25: Federal judge Amy Berman Jackson rebukes Trump regarding his comments on Stone jury.[612] February 28: D.C. Cir. rules 2–1 in favor of appeal overturning a lower court's decision requiring McGahn's testimony.[613][614][615][616] March[edit] This section needs to be updated. Please update this article to reflect recent events or newly available information. (March 2020) March 5: House lawyers announce appeal of February 28 Circuit court ruling.[617] Judge Reggie Walton calls Barr "unreliable" and that Barr's public statements about the Mueller report "distorted" and "misleading". Walton cited "inconsistencies" between Barr's statements and the public, partially redacted version of the report, saying Barr's "lack of candor" called "into question [his] credibility and, in turn, the department’s"; demands unredacted Mueller report for review.[618][619][620] March 6: Regarding the February 28 Circuit court ruling, House lawyers argue that blocking lawmakers from suing to obtain information from the executive branch would leave Congress with little choice but to "direct its sergeant at arms to arrest current and former high-level executive branch officials for failing to respond to subpoenas."[621][622] March 10: D.C. Cir. federal appeals court permits access by the House to grand jury Mueller probe evidence from the DoJ, including redactions as well as underlying interviews and memos. The ruling can be appealed to the full court or to the Supreme Court.[623][624][625] March 13: On appeal from the House, the full Court agrees to reconsider the McGahn Congressional subpoena case.[626] March 16: The charges against Concord Management and Consulting are dismissed with prejudice.[627][628] March 23: Barr was scheduled, on March 31, to testify before the House Judiciary Committee regarding three topics: overruling prosecutors on Roger Stone's recommended sentence, the arrangement for Giuliani to provide information on Ukraine, and the pulled nomination of Jessie K. Liu.[629][630] The GOP-majority Senate previously doesn't ask Barr to testify about the Justice Department's decision to reduce Stone's sentencing recommendation.[631][632] It was postponed indefinitely due to the coronavirus pandemic.[633] April[edit] April 3: Trump fires Inspector General of the Intelligence Community Michael Atkinson months after Atkinson delivered the whistleblower complaint to Congress that kicked-off the Trump–Ukraine scandal, as required by law. Atkinson states the reason Trump fired him "derives from my having faithfully discharged my legal obligations as an independent and impartial Inspector General."[634] April 21: A bipartisan Senate Intelligence Committee report reaffirms the U.S. intelligence community’s conclusions that Russia interfered in the 2016 presidential election with the goal of making Trump president. The report rejects Trump’s repeated claims that a "deep state" intelligence community was biased against him and that Kremlin assistance to his campaign was a “hoax,” perpetrated by Democrats. The committee found “specific intelligence reporting to support the assessment that Putin and the Russian Government demonstrated a preference for candidate Trump,” and that Vladimir Putin “approved and directed” aspects of the interference.[635][636][637][638][639][640] April 26: Trump tweets, then deletes, a series of Twitter attacks against journalists who received awards for their reporting on Trump/Russia and the Mueller probe.[641] April 28: Oral arguments in the McGahn case are heard before the full US Court of Appeals.[642] See also[edit] Wikisource has original text related to this article: Mueller Report Criminal charges brought in the Special Counsel investigation (2017–2019) Foreign interference in the 2020 United States elections Russian interference in the 2016 Brexit referendum Russian interference in the 2018 United States elections Trump–Ukraine scandal References[edit] ^ Abramson, Seth (November 13, 2018). Proof of Collusion: How Trump Betrayed America. Simon & Schuster. ISBN 978-1982116088. It crosses continents and decades and has swept into its vortex more than four hundred people, millions of pages of financial records, and scores of unanswered questions about the state of our democracy. Index for Proof of Collusion. ^ Dilanian, Ken; Lebedeva, Natasha; Jackson, Hallie (July 14, 2017). "Former Soviet Counterintelligence Officer at Meeting With Donald Trump Jr. and Russian Lawyer". NBC News. Retrieved January 10, 2020. ^ Cohen, Marshall; Kopan, Tal; Chan, Adam; Devine, Curt (July 15, 2017). "The new figure in the Trump-Russia controversy: Rinat Akhmetshin". CNN. ^ Miller, James (April 13, 2017). "Trump and Russia: All the Mogul's Men". Daily Beast. Retrieved October 25, 2019. ^ Polantz, Katelyn; Perez, Evan (March 30, 2018). "Source: Mueller pushed for Gates' help on collusion". CNN. ^ Stephanopoulos, George; Mosk, Matthew (March 5, 2018). "Russia Investigation Romance: Key witness George Papadopoulos marries Italian lawyer". ABC News. Retrieved July 9, 2018. ^ "Advisory Council". Center for the National Interest. Archived from the original on October 30, 2016. Retrieved July 24, 2019. ^ Polantz, Katelyn (January 2, 2019). "Supreme Court teed up to act on mystery Mueller-related grand jury case". CNN. Retrieved January 2, 2019. ^ Polantz, Katelyn; Robinson, Laura (January 9, 2019). "Law firm that represented Russian interests part of mystery Mueller subpoena case". CNN. Retrieved January 11, 2019. ^ Brufke, Juliegrace (January 3, 2019). "Jordan blasts Democrat for pursuing Trump impeachment on first day of new Congress". The Hill. Retrieved January 4, 2019. ^ a b c Bernstein, Leandra (January 3, 2019). "Corsi appears in court with lawsuit against Mueller, rips special counsel 'inquisition'". WJLA-TV. Retrieved January 7, 2019. ^ Breuninger, Kevin (December 10, 2018). "Conspiracy theorist Jerome Corsi sues special counsel Robert Mueller for $350 million, claims illegal leaks, rights violation". CNBC. Retrieved January 7, 2019. ^ Hsu, Spencer S. (January 4, 2019). "Federal grand jury working in Mueller probe is extended". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 4, 2019. ^ Tillman, Zoe (January 7, 2019). "A Judge Told The Defense In The Russian Troll Farm Case To "Knock It Off" With Attacks On Mueller's Office". BuzzFeed News. Retrieved January 7, 2019. ^ Barrett, Devlin; Zapotsky, Matt (January 8, 2019). "Russian lawyer at Trump Tower meeting charged in separate case". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 8, 2019. ^ Swaine, Jon (January 8, 2019). "Russian who attended Trump Tower meeting charged with obstruction of justice". The Guardian. Retrieved January 10, 2019. ^ Jansen, Bart (January 8, 2019). "Paul Manafort, President Trump's former campaign chief, argues to keep plea deal with Robert Mueller". USA TODAY. Retrieved January 8, 2019. ^ Tillman, Zoe (January 8, 2019). "Paul Manafort's Lawyers Tried To Redact A Court Filing About Whether Manafort Lied To Investigators. It Didn't Work". BuzzFeed News. Retrieved January 9, 2019. ^ LaFraniere, Sharon; Vogel, Kenneth P.; Haberman, Maggie (January 8, 2019). "Manafort Accused of Sharing Trump Polling Data With Russian Associate". The New York Times. Retrieved January 9, 2019. ^ a b Barnes, Robert; Barrett, Devlin; Leonnig, Carol D. (January 8, 2019). "Supreme Court rules against mystery corporation from 'Country A' fighting subpoena in Mueller investigation". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 8, 2019. ^ Alan Rappeport (January 10, 2019). "Mnuchin Defends Plan to Lift Sanctions on Russian Oligarch's Companies". The New York Times. Retrieved January 11, 2019. ^ Beavers, Olivia (January 10, 2019). "House Democrats clash with Mnuchin following sanctions briefing". The Hill. Retrieved January 11, 2019. ^ Hooks, Christopher; Spies, Mike (January 11, 2019). "Documents Show NRA and Republican Candidates Coordinated Ads in Key Senate Races". Mother Jones. Retrieved January 11, 2019. ^ Goldman, Adam; Schmidt, Michael S.; Fandos, Nicholas (January 11, 2019). "F.B.I. Opened Inquiry Into Whether Trump Was Secretly Working on Behalf of Russia". The New York Times. Retrieved January 11, 2019. ^ Stanage, Niall (January 11, 2019). "Exclusive: Trump team should be allowed to 'correct' final Mueller report, says Giuliani". The Hill. Retrieved January 11, 2019. ^ Miller, Greg (January 12, 2019). "Trump has concealed details of his face-to-face encounters with Putin from senior officials in administration". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 12, 2019. ^ "Full Interview: Trump responds to Russian asset allegations, border crisis" (Video). Justice with Judge Jeanine. Fox News. January 12, 2019. Retrieved January 3, 2020 – via YouTube. ^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n Muller III, Robert S. (March 2019). "Report On The Investigation Into Russian Interference In The 2016 Presidential Election Volume II" (PDF). Retrieved April 19, 2019. ^ Haberman, Maggie; LaFraniere, Sharon; Protess, Ben (January 14, 2019). "At Trump's Inauguration, $10,000 for Makeup and Lots of Room Service". The New York Times. Retrieved January 14, 2019. ^ Banco, Erin; Suebsaeng, Asawin; Ackerman, Spencer (January 14, 2019). "Mueller Probes an Event With Nunes, Flynn, and Foreign Officials at Trump's D.C. Hotel". The Daily Beast. Retrieved January 16, 2019. ^ Soylu, Ragip (January 18, 2017). "FM Çavuşoğlu meets Trump's top national security advisor". Daily Sabah. Retrieved January 16, 2019. ^ Layne, Nathan (January 15, 2019). Oatis, Jonathan (ed.). "Mueller Wants More Time With Cooperating Witness Gates: Filing". The New York Times. Reuters. Retrieved January 15, 2019. ^ Samuelsohn, Darren (January 15, 2019). "Mueller: Manafort worked behind scenes to stock Trump administration". Politico. Retrieved January 15, 2019. ^ Levine, Marianne; Samuelsohn, Darren; Gerstein, Josh (January 15, 2019). "Attorney general nominee asserts independence from Trump". Politico. Retrieved January 15, 2019. ^ a b c Polantz, Katelyn (June 7, 2019). "Mystery company off the hook from Mueller subpoena and contempt of court charge". CNN. Retrieved November 25, 2019. ^ Vogel, Kenneth P.; Goldstein, Matthew (January 17, 2019). "Skadden Arps Agrees to $4.6 Million Settlement in Ukraine Lobbying Case". The New York Times. Retrieved January 17, 2019. ^ Leopold, Jason; Cormier, Anthony (January 17, 2019). "President Trump Directed His Attorney Michael Cohen To Lie To Congress About The Moscow Tower Project". BuzzFeed News. Retrieved January 17, 2019. ^ Barrett, Devlin; Zapotsky, Matt; Demirjian, Karoun (January 18, 2019). "In a rare move, Mueller's office denies BuzzFeed report that Trump told Cohen to lie about Moscow project". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 18, 2019. ^ Donald J. Trump [@@realDonaldTrump] (January 18, 2019). "Kevin Corke, @FoxNews "Don't forget, Michael Cohen has already been convicted of perjury and fraud, and as recently as this week, the Wall Street Journal has suggested that he may have stolen tens of thousands of dollars...." Lying to reduce his jail time! Watch father-in-law!" (Tweet). Retrieved January 3, 2020 – via Twitter. ^ Todd, Chuck (January 20, 2019). "Meet the Press - January 20, 2019". NBC News (Transcript). Meet the Press. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Mazzetti, Mark; Haberman, Maggie; Schmidt, Michael S. (January 20, 2019). "Moscow Skyscraper Talks Continued Through 'the Day I Won,' Trump Is Said to Acknowledge". The New York Times. Retrieved January 3, 2020. ^ Haberman, Maggie (January 21, 2019). "Giuliani Says His Moscow Trump Tower Comments Were 'Hypothetical'". The New York Times. Retrieved November 8, 2019. ^ Mark Sherman (January 22, 2019). "Supreme Court releases censored appeal by foreign government". Associated Press. Retrieved January 24, 2019. ^ Mike Balsamo (January 23, 2019). "Ex-Trump lawyer Cohen delaying testimony to Congress". Associated Press. Retrieved January 24, 2019. ^ Gloria Borger; Pamela Brown; Jeremy Herb (January 24, 2019). "Michael Cohen subpoenaed by Senate Intelligence Committee". CNN.com. Retrieved January 25, 2019. ^ "Roger Stone Arrested on Obstruction Charges in Mueller Investigation". Time. Retrieved January 25, 2019. ^ Kocieniewski, David. "Trump Associate Roger Stone Arrested in Florida as Part of Special Counsel Probe". Bloomberg.com. Retrieved January 25, 2019. ^ Wang, Christine (January 28, 2019). "Robert Mueller's investigation is close to being completed, acting AG Matthew Whitaker says". CNBC.com. Retrieved January 28, 2019. ^ Samuelsohn, Darren (January 28, 2019). "Manafort's Feb. 8 sentencing canceled". Politico. ^ Swaine, Jon (January 30, 2019). "Russians leaked Mueller investigation evidence online, prosecutors say". The Guardian. Retrieved January 30, 2019. ^ Johnson, Carrie (February 1, 2019). "Political Consultant Roger Stone Makes Uncharacteristically Silent Court Appearance". NPR.org. Retrieved February 9, 2019. ^ Tucker, Eric; Day, Chad (February 1, 2019). "Judge in Roger Stone case says she's considering gag order". Associated Press. Retrieved February 9, 2019. ^ LaFraniere, Sharon; Vogel, Kenneth P.; Shane, Scott (February 10, 2019). "In Closed Hearing, a Clue About 'the Heart' of Mueller's Russia Inquiry". The New York Times. ^ Haberman, Maggie; Protess, Ben (February 4, 2019). "Trump Inaugural Committee Ordered to Hand Over Documents to Federal Investigators". The New York Times. Retrieved February 5, 2019. ^ Orden, Erica; Alesci, Cristina. "New York federal prosecutors seek interviews with Trump Organization executives". CNN. ^ Sommerfeldt, Chris (February 5, 2019). "Manhattan feds reportedly looking to question Trump Organization executives as part of criminal inquiries". New York Daily News. Retrieved February 9, 2019. ^ Loop, Emma; Cormier, Anthony; Leopold, Jason; Kozyreva, Tanya; Templeton, John (April 17, 2019). "A Lobbyist At The Trump Tower Meeting Received Half A Million Dollars In Suspicious Payments". BuzzFeed News. Retrieved November 1, 2019. ^ "Federal prosecutors subpoena Trump's inaugural committee". Associated Press. February 5, 2019. Retrieved February 5, 2019. ^ "House Intelligence Committee votes to send documents to Mueller". NBC News. ^ Kirby, Jen (February 8, 2019). "6 takeaways from acting Attorney General Matthew Whitaker's hearing". Vox.com. Retrieved February 9, 2019. ^ Blake, Aaron (February 8, 2019). "What we learned from the Matthew G. Whitaker hearing". The Washington Post. Retrieved February 9, 2019. ^ Herb, Jeremy; Perez, Evan. "Michael Cohen postpones congressional testimony for a third time". CNN. ^ Polantz, Katelyn (February 14, 2019). "Judge voids Paul Manafort plea deal, says he 'intentionally' lied to the FBI, special counsel and grand jury". CNN. Retrieved February 14, 2019. ^ Levin, Bess (February 14, 2019). "William Barr's Son-in-Law Just Landed a Job Advising Trump on "Legal Issues"; Tyler McGaughey's work will "intersect" with the Russia investigation". VanityFair.com. Retrieved February 20, 2019. ^ Shortell, David; Jarrett, Laura; Brown, Pamela (February 13, 2019). "Daughter and son-in-law of AG nominee leaving the Justice Department". CNN. Retrieved February 20, 2019. ^ "Prosecutors may be forced to name Flynn in lobbying case". Associated Press. February 13, 2019. ^ Muller III, Robert S. (March 2019). "Report On The Investigation Into Russian Interference In The 2016 Presidential Election Volume I" (PDF). Retrieved April 19, 2019. ^ Benner, Katie; Fandos, Nicholas; Kelly, Kate (February 14, 2019). "Senate Confirms William Barr as Attorney General". The New York Times. Retrieved January 23, 2020. ^ Brown, Pamela; Herb, Jeremy; Polantz, Katelyn; Collins, Kaitlan (May 17, 2019). "Flynn contacted GOP Mueller critic while cooperating with special counsel". CNN. Retrieved January 23, 2020. ^ Chad Day; Eric Tucker (February 15, 2019). "Judge limits public comments in Trump confidant Stone's case". Associated Press. Retrieved February 18, 2019. ^ White House spokeswoman confirms special counsel interview. Associated Press. February 15, 2019. Accessed February 16, 2019. ^ Jim Mustian (February 15, 2019). "NJ attorney general subpoenas Trump's inaugural committee". Associated Press. Retrieved February 18, 2019. ^ Cadwalladr, Carole (February 17, 2019). "Mueller questions Cambridge Analytica director Brittany Kaiser". The Guardian. Retrieved February 17, 2019. ^ a b Breuninger, Kevin; Mangan, Dan (February 20, 2019). "Ex-Trump lawyer Michael Cohen gets prison surrender date delayed two months to May 6". CNBC. Retrieved May 16, 2019. ^ Ballhaus, Rebecca (February 20, 2019). "Michael Cohen to testify publicly before the House Oversight Committee on Feb. 27". The Wall Street Journal. ^ Santos, Nina dos (February 21, 2019). "Senate investigators pursue Moscow-based former Trump associate". Cnn.com. Retrieved March 14, 2019. ^ Jeremy Herb; Gloria Borger; Manu Raju. "Michael Cohen apologizes to Senate panel for lying to Congress". CNN. ^ Gerstein, Josh (February 26, 2019). "Mueller scores big win as court rejects challenge to his appointment". Politico. Retrieved February 27, 2019. ^ United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit (February 26, 2019). "Appeal from the United States District Court for the District of Columbia (No. 1:18-gj-00034)" (PDF). Politico. Retrieved February 27, 2019. ^ Baker, Peter; Fandos, Nicholas (February 27, 2019). "Michael Cohen Accuses Trump of Expansive Pattern of Lies and Criminality". The New York Times. Retrieved February 28, 2019. ^ Christal Hayes; Kevin Johnson; Eliza Collins (January 10, 2019). "Former Trump lawyer Michael Cohen to testify before Congress in February before heading to prison". USA Today. Retrieved January 11, 2019. ^ a b "House Intel Committee plans to bring in Trump Organization CFO Allen Weisselberg". Axios. ^ Gibson, Jake (March 7, 2019). "Mueller team wants to withhold 3.2 million 'sensitive' docs from indicted Russian company". Fox News. ^ "List: 80 names receiving Judiciary panel letters". CNN. ^ Samuelsohn, Darren (February 21, 2019). "Manafort's Virginia sentencing set for March 8", Politico. ^ LaFraniere, Sharon (March 7, 2019). "Paul Manafort Is Sentenced to Less Than 4 Years in 1 of 2 Cases Against Him". The New York Times. ISSN 0362-4331. Retrieved March 8, 2019. ^ Balluck, Kyle (March 13, 2019). "Flynn asks for another delay in his sentencing". The Hill. ^ LaFraniere, Sharon (March 13, 2019). "Paul Manafort Sentenced to 3.5 More Years in Prison". The New York Times. ^ Rashbaum, William K. (March 13, 2019). "New York Charges Manafort With 16 Crimes. If He's Convicted, Trump Can't Pardon Him". The New York Times. ^ "Feds Raided Trump Fundraiser's Office Looking for Ties to Foreign Nationals: Report". The Daily Beast. March 18, 2019. Retrieved March 19, 2019. ^ Faturechi, Robert; Elliot, Justin (March 18, 2019). "Federal Authorities Raided Trump Fundraiser's Office in Money Laundering Probe; A sealed search warrant obtained by ProPublica shows federal agents scoured Elliott Broidy's office for documents related to China, Saudi Arabia and a Miami Beach club promoter". ProPublica.org. Retrieved March 18, 2019. ^ Swaine, Jon (March 19, 2019). "Mueller suspected Trump lawyer may have been acting as foreign agent". The Guardian. Retrieved March 19, 2019. ^ Hill.TV Staff (March 20, 2019). "Senior Ukrainian official says he's opened probe into US election interference". The Hill. Retrieved October 15, 2019. ^ Hill.TV Staff (March 20, 2019). "Top Ukrainian justice official says US ambassador gave him a do not prosecute list". The Hill. Retrieved October 15, 2019. ^ Breuninger, Kevin (March 22, 2019). "Robert Mueller submits special counsel's Russia probe report to Attorney General William Barr". CNBC. Retrieved March 22, 2019. ^ Higgins, Tucker (March 22, 2019). "AG Barr says he may be able to provide lawmakers with details of Mueller report this weekend". CNBC. Retrieved March 22, 2019. ^ Ken Dilanian (December 10, 2019). "Barr thinks FBI may have acted in 'bad faith' in probing Trump campaign's links to Russia; "I think our nation was turned on its head for three years based on a bogus narrative," the attorney general said in an exclusive interview with Pete Williams". nbcnews.com. Retrieved December 10, 2019. ^ Axelrod, Tal (March 23, 2019). "Privacy group sues DOJ for public release of Mueller report". The Hill. Retrieved April 3, 2019. ^ Pramuk, Jacob; Kimball, Spencer (March 24, 2019). "Attorney General Barr to release Mueller Russia probe report findings". CNBC. Retrieved March 24, 2019. ^ "Timeline: Every big move in the Mueller investigation". Axios.com. March 24, 2019. Retrieved March 25, 2019. ^ Bertrand, Natasha (March 25, 2019). "New: The House Intel Committee is "working in parallel with other Committees to bring in senior officials from the DoJ, FBI and SCO to ensure that [we are] fully and currently informed about the SCO's investigation, including all counterintelligence information." Sater postponed.pic.twitter.com/nfCuxaHCUA". Twitter. ^ Galioto, Katie (March 25, 2019). "Mystery firm fighting Mueller won't get Supreme Court appeal". Politico. Retrieved March 27, 2019. ^ Samuelsohn, Darren (March 27, 2019). "Mueller grand jury 'continuing robustly,' prosecutor says". Politico. Retrieved March 27, 2019. ^ Betsy Woodruff (April 15, 2019). "Schiff and Nunes: Mueller 'Must Brief' Intel Committee—And Turn Over All His Materials". The Daily Beast. Retrieved April 16, 2019. ^ Basu, Zachary (April 15, 2019). "Adam Schiff, Devin Nunes demand Mueller brief House Intelligence Committee". Axios.com. Retrieved April 16, 2019. ^ Kyle Cheney (April 15, 2019). "Schiff, Nunes sent joint request for Mueller briefing". Politico. Retrieved April 16, 2019. ^ Tlaib, Rashida (March 27, 2019). "H.Res.257 - 116th Congress (2019-2020): Inquiring whether the House of Representatives should impeach Donald John Trump, President of the United States of America". Congress.gov. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ "Special Counsel Mueller's letter to Attorney General Barr". The Washington Post. May 1, 2019. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ Hsu, Spencer S.; Helderman, Rosalind S. (March 28, 2019). "Maria Butina, Russian who conspired to infiltrate NRA, to be sentenced April 26". The Washington Post. Retrieved March 28, 2019. ^ Higgins, Tucker (March 28, 2019). "Jared Kushner met with Senate Intelligence Committee". CNBC. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ Herb, Jeremy; Raju, Manu; Barrett, Ted. "Jared Kushner interviewed by Senate Intelligence Committee". CNN. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ a b "Breaking: Justice Department Agrees to Expedite EPIC's Request for Mueller Report". Electronic Privacy Information Center. April 2, 2019. Retrieved April 3, 2019. ^ Barrett, Devlin; Demirjian, Karoun (March 29, 2019). "Mueller report will be delivered by 'mid-April, if not sooner,' attorney general tells Congress". The Washington Post. Retrieved March 29, 2019. ^ Dawsey, Josh; Hanburger, Tom; Sonne, Paul; Helderman, Rosalind S.; Weiner, Richard (October 2, 2019). "Giuliani consulted on Ukraine with imprisoned Paul Manafort via a lawyer". The Washington Post. Retrieved October 14, 2019. ^ Gerstein, Josh (April 1, 2019). "Judge won't ID mystery company in Mueller grand jury fight". Politico. Retrieved April 2, 2019. ^ Thomsen, Jacqueline (April 3, 2019). "Privacy group says DOJ agreed to 'expedite' release of Mueller report". The Hill. Retrieved April 3, 2019. ^ Durkin, Erin (April 3, 2019). "Mueller report: House committee approves subpoenas for full version". The Guardian. Retrieved April 3, 2019. ^ Faler, Brian; Lorenzo, Aaron (April 3, 2019). "House Democrats unleash bid for Trump's tax returns". Politico. Retrieved April 3, 2019. ^ Samuels, Brett (April 3, 2019). "Trump reacts to Dem request for tax returns: 'Is that all?'". The Hill. Retrieved April 3, 2019. ^ Fandos, Nicholas; Schmidt, Michael S.; Mazetti, Mark (April 3, 2019). "Some on Mueller's Team Say Report Was More Damaging Than Barr Revealed". The New York Times. Retrieved April 3, 2019. ^ Stein, Jeff; Dawsey, Josh (April 5, 2019). "Trump lawyer calls on Treasury to reject Democrats' demand for tax returns until Justice Dept. weighs in". The Washington Post. Retrieved April 6, 2019. ^ a b Samuelsohn, Darren (April 9, 2019). "Judge denies request for speedy release of Mueller report". Politico. Retrieved April 10, 2019. ^ "Court documents" (PDF). games-cdn.washingtonpost.com. 2018. Retrieved September 9, 2019. ^ Jackman, Tom; Hsu, Spencer S. (April 5, 2019). "Appeals court in D.C. rules judges may not create exceptions to grand-jury secrecy rules". The Washington Post. Retrieved April 12, 2019. ^ Bertr, Natasha. "Senate Intelligence Committee summons mysterious British security consultant". Politico. Retrieved June 5, 2019. ^ Kurtz, Howard; Giuliani, Rudy (April 7, 2019). "Giuliani slams Mueller leak". Fox News. MediaBuzz. Retrieved January 23, 2020. ^ Chalfant, Morgan (April 8, 2019). "Prosecutors say lobbyist ensnared in Mueller probe deserves leniency". The Hill. Retrieved April 8, 2019. ^ Day, Chad (April 8, 2019). "Lobbyist who cooperated in Russia probe asks for probation". Associated Press. Retrieved April 10, 2019. ^ Falconer, Rebecca (April 8, 2019). "FBI confirms Comey was a witness in Mueller investigation". Axios. Retrieved April 10, 2019. ^ Re, Gregg (April 8, 2019). "Nunes files $150M lawsuit against McClatchy, alleging conspiracy to derail Clinton, Russia probes". Fox News. Retrieved April 10, 2019. ^ "Fact check: Devin Nunes' lawsuit against The Bee is frivolous". fresnobee.com. April 10, 2019. Retrieved April 12, 2019. ^ Concha, Joe (April 9, 2019). "Nunes sues newspaper chain, alleges 'character assassination'". The Hill. Retrieved April 12, 2019. ^ Cheney, Kyle; Desiderio, Andrew (April 9, 2019). "Barr: Mueller turned down offer to review Russia probe findings". Politico. Retrieved April 9, 2019. ^ Banco, Erin (April 9, 2019). "Bill Barr: I'm Not Giving Congress Full Mueller Report". Daily Beast. Retrieved April 9, 2019. ^ Rappeport, Alan (April 9, 2019). "Mnuchin Says White House and Treasury Discussed Trump Tax Return Request". The New York Times. Retrieved April 10, 2019. ^ Stein, Jeff; Paletta, Damian (April 10, 2019). "Treasury says it will miss Democrats' deadline for turning over Trump tax returns, casts skepticism over request". The Washington Post. Retrieved April 10, 2019. ^ Herb, Jeremy (April 10, 2019). "Barr: Mueller did not ask for conclusion on obstruction of justice". CNN. Retrieved April 10, 2019. ^ "Trump Hush Money Probe 'Gathered Evidence From Hope Hicks' and Others Close to President". The Daily Beast. April 10, 2019. Retrieved April 10, 2019. ^ Hong, Nicole; Ballhaus, Rebecca; O'Brien, Rebecca Davis (April 10, 2019). "Hush-Money Probe Gathered Evidence From Trump's Inner Circle". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved April 10, 2019. ^ Axelrod, Tal (April 11, 2019). "Gaetz introduces 'PENCIL' resolution to oust Schiff from House Intel". The Hill. Retrieved April 11, 2019. ^ a b c d Thomsen, Jacqueline (April 11, 2019). "Ex-Obama counsel indicted for false statements, concealing Ukraine work". The Hill. Retrieved April 11, 2019. ^ a b c d Helderman, Rosalind S.; Hamburger, Tom; Hsu, Spencer S. (April 11, 2019). "Gregory Craig, former Obama White House counsel, charged with making false statements related to Ukraine work in latest Mueller fallout". The Washington Post. Retrieved April 11, 2019. ^ Hsu, Spencer S. (April 12, 2019). "W. Samuel Patten sentenced to probation after steering Ukrainian money to Trump inaugural". The Washington Post. Retrieved April 12, 2019. ^ Kranish, Michael (April 12, 2019). "Inside the Russian effort to target Sanders supporters — and help elect Trump". The Washington Post. Retrieved April 12, 2019. ^ "Ex-Obama White House aide denies guilt in lobbying case". Politico. Associated Press. April 12, 2019. Retrieved April 12, 2019. ^ Polantz, Katelyn (April 12, 2019). "Greg Craig pleads not guilty, released on personal recognizance". CNN. Retrieved April 12, 2019. ^ Day, Chad; Balsamo, Michael (April 13, 2019). "Trump confidant Roger Stone seeks full Mueller report". Associated Press. Retrieved April 13, 2019. ^ Stein, Jeff (April 13, 2019). "House Democrats give IRS hard deadline of April 23 to turn over Trump tax returns, say administration's concerns 'lack merit'". The Washington Post. Retrieved April 13, 2019. ^ Flitter, Emily; Enrich, David (April 15, 2019). "Deutsche Bank Is Subpoenaed for Trump Records by House Democrats". The New York Times. Retrieved April 15, 2019. ^ a b Mazetti, Mark; Haberman, Maggie; Fandos, Nocholas; Benner, Katie; Schmidt, Michael S. (April 17, 2019). "White House and Justice Dept. Officials Discussed Mueller Report Before Release". The New York Times. Retrieved April 17, 2019. ^ Andrew Ackerman; Lalita Clozel (April 17, 2019). "House Democrats Subpoenaed Nine Banks in Trump Finance Probe". Wsj.com. Retrieved April 18, 2019. ^ Austin Weinstein; Billy House (April 17, 2019). "Democrats Subpoena Nine Banks in Probe of Trump Finances". Bloomberg.com. Retrieved April 18, 2019. ^ "Democrats prepared to subpoena Justice Department for all of Mueller's findings as soon as Friday". Salon.com. April 17, 2019. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ Bennett, John T.; Bennett, John T. (April 17, 2019). "White House braces for Mueller report as obstruction questions linger". Roll Call. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ Thomsen, Jacqueline (April 17, 2019). "DOJ plans to let some lawmakers view Mueller report 'without certain redactions'". The Hill. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ Garcia, Eric (April 18, 2019). "Dems plan Monday call on Mueller report: 'Congress will not be silent'". The Hill. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ Beavers, Olivia (April 19, 2019). "Judiciary chairman issues subpoena for full Mueller report". The Hill. Retrieved April 19, 2019. ^ Cook, Nancy (April 19, 2019). "Trump campaign punishes Don McGahn's law firm". Politico. Retrieved April 19, 2019. ^ Desiderio, Andrew (April 22, 2019). "Democrats subpoena ex-White House counsel Don McGahn". Politico. Retrieved April 22, 2019. ^ Bade, Richard (April 22, 2019). "House Democratic leaders say no immediate plans to open impeachment proceedings after Mueller report". The Washington Post. Retrieved April 22, 2019. ^ David A. Fahrenthold; Rachael Bade; John Wagner (April 22, 2019). "Trump sues in bid to block congressional subpoena of financial records". WashingtonPost.com. Retrieved April 24, 2019. ^ Dylan Scott (April 22, 2019). "Trump sues House Democrats to stop them from getting his financial records; The president's legal argument is that Congress does not have an unlimited right to investigate the executive branch". Vox.com. Retrieved April 24, 2019. ^ Lorenzo, Aaron; Guida, Victoria (April 23, 2019). "IRS blows deadline to hand over Trump tax returns". Politico. Retrieved April 23, 2019. ^ Davison, Laura; Talev, Margaret. "Trump Falsely Says Law Prevents Him Releasing Tax Returns Under Audit". Bloomberg News. Retrieved April 9, 2019. ^ Rummler, Orion (April 10, 2019). "IRS commissioner: No rule against releasing Trump's tax returns while under audit". Axios.com. Retrieved April 11, 2019. ^ Hamburger, Tom (April 23, 2019). "House panel moves to hold former White House official in contempt after he obeys Trump administration's instruction not to testify". The Washington Post. Retrieved April 23, 2019. ^ "Manafort Transferred to Federal Prison in Wayne County". Wnep.com. April 23, 2019. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ Baker, Stephanie; Bedwell, Helena (April 24, 2019). "Georgian Businessman Offers More Texts With Cohen to Rebut Mueller Footnote". Bloomberg LP. Retrieved April 25, 2019. ^ Neidig, Harper (April 24, 2019). "Facebook expects $3B-$5B fine over Cambridge Analytica". The Hill. Retrieved April 24, 2019. ^ Neidig, Harper (April 25, 2019). "Canada accuses Facebook of breaking privacy laws". The Hill. Retrieved April 25, 2019. ^ Spencer S. Hsu; Rosalind S. Helderman (April 26, 2019). "Maria Butina, Russian who conspired to infiltrate conservative U.S. political groups, sentenced to 18 months". The Washington Post. ^ Robles, Frances (April 26, 2019). "Russian Hackers Were 'In a Position' to Alter Florida Voter Rolls, Rubio Confirms". The New York Times. Retrieved April 27, 2019. ^ "Mueller: Barr's summary of report did not capture 'context, nature, and substance' of Russia probe". USA TODAY. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ "Read AG William Barr's written testimony before Senate Judiciary Committee". ABC News. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ a b Chalfant, Morgan; Beavers, Olivia (May 2, 2019). "Democrats blast Barr for missing hearing". The Hill. Retrieved May 2, 2019. ^ Felicia Sonmez (May 5, 2019). "In reversal, Trump says Mueller 'should not testify' before Congress". The Washington Post. Retrieved May 6, 2019. ^ "Trump Objects to Mueller Testifying Before". The New York Times. May 5, 2019. Retrieved May 6, 2019. ^ Kyle Cheney; Andrew Desiderio (May 6, 2019). "DOJ moves to fend off Barr contempt vote; The House Judiciary Committee earlier Monday took formal steps to hold the attorney general in contempt for defying a subpoena". Politico. Retrieved May 6, 2019. ^ Paletta, Damian; Stein, Jeff (May 6, 2019). "Mnuchin rejects Democrats' demand to hand over Trump's tax returns, all but ensuring legal battle". The Washington Post. Retrieved May 6, 2019. ^ Mnuchin, Steven T. (May 6, 2019). "Treasury May 6 Response to Chairman Neal Regarding Tax Return Request" (PDF). U.S. Department of the Treasury. Retrieved May 6, 2019. ^ Katelyn Polantz (May 7, 2019). "Exclusive: Mueller fought release of Comey memos to prevent Trump and others from changing stories". CNN. Retrieved May 8, 2019. ^ "Dems vote to hold AG in contempt as Trump asserts privilege over full Mueller report". ABC News. ^ Fandos, Nicholas (May 8, 2019). "House Panel Approves Contempt for Barr After Trump Claims Privilege Over Full Mueller Report". The New York Times. ^ "Trump asserts executive privilege over Mueller report; House panel holds Barr in contempt". Washington Post. ^ Desiderio, Rew; Cheney, Kyle. "Barr held in contempt by House Judiciary". Politico. ^ Stephen Collinson; Laura Jarrett; Veronica Stracqualursi (May 8, 2019). "Trump invokes executive privilege over Mueller report". CNN. Retrieved May 15, 2019. ^ "House Panel Approves Contempt for Barr After Trump Claims Privilege Over Full Mueller Report". The New York Times. May 8, 2019. Retrieved May 9, 2019. ^ Jonathan Swan; Alayna Treene; David Nather (May 8, 2019). "Scoop: Senate Intel subpoenas Trump Jr. over Russia matters". Axios.com. Retrieved May 9, 2019. ^ Dan Mangan; Brian Schwartz; Kevin Breuninger (May 8, 2019). "Senate Intelligence Committee subpoenas Donald Trump Jr. to answer questions about prior claim to have limited role in Trump Tower Moscow deal". CNBC. Retrieved May 9, 2019. ^ Mark Mazzetti; Maggie Haberman (May 8, 2019). "Donald Trump Jr. Is Subpoenaed to Testify to Senate Panel on Russia Contacts". The New York Times. Retrieved May 9, 2019. ^ Vogel, Kenneth P.; Montague, Zach (May 9, 2019). "Rudy Giuliani Plans Ukraine Trip to Push for Inquiries That Could Help Trump". The New York Times. Retrieved October 15, 2019. ^ Michael S. Schmidt (May 10, 2019). "White House Asked McGahn to Declare Trump Never Obstructed Justice". The New York Times. Retrieved May 13, 2019. ^ Fandos, Nicholas (May 10, 2019). "House Ways and Means Chairman Subpoenas Trump Tax Returns" – via NYTimes.com. ^ Chuck Todd; Mark Murray; Carrie Dann. "Team Trump wants wants another foreign government's help for 2020; First Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter". nbcnews.com. Retrieved October 3, 2019. ^ Vogel, Kenneth P. (May 9, 2019). "Rudy Giuliani Plans Ukraine Trip to Push for Inquiries That Could Help Trump" – via NYTimes.com. ^ Vogel, Kenneth P. (May 11, 2019). "Rudy Giuliani Cancels His Trip to Ukraine, Blaming Democrats' 'Spin'". The New York Times. Retrieved October 15, 2019. ^ Balsamo, Michael (May 14, 2019). "AP source: Barr launches new look at origins of Russia probe". Associated Press. ^ "U.S. Attorney to review Russia probe". ^ Laura Jarrett (May 14, 2019). "Top federal prosecutor in Connecticut to review origins of Russia probe". CNN. Retrieved October 2, 2019. ^ Cohen, Marshall (May 14, 2019). "California man who unwittingly helped Russian meddling released from federal custody". CNN. Retrieved January 6, 2020. ^ "Rick Gates continues to cooperate in 'several ongoing' investigations and is not ready for sentencing". The Washington Post. ^ Spencer S. Hsu (May 13, 2019). "U.S. confirms Rick Gates's cooperation in pending Roger Stone, Gregory Craig trials". WashingtonPost.com. Retrieved May 15, 2019. ^ "Judge sets May 14 hearing in Trump bid to block Congress demand on..." Reuters. April 23, 2019. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ "Committee Postpones Subpoena Deadline for Trump Financial Records Until After Court Rules". The Washington Post. Retrieved May 1, 2019. ^ "Judge Signals Skepticism About Trump's Bid to Block Subpoena for Financial Records". nytimes.com. May 14, 2019. Retrieved May 15, 2019. ^ "Gov. DeSantis: Russians hacked voting databases in two Florida counties; The GOP governor said the incidents took place in 2016 and no election results were compromised". Associated Press. May 14, 2019. Retrieved May 15, 2019 – via nbcnews.com. ^ Brendan Farrington (May 14, 2019). "DeSantis: Russians accessed 2 Florida voting databases". apnews.com. Retrieved May 15, 2019. ^ Miles Parks (May 14, 2019). "Florida Governor Says Russian Hackers Breached 2 Counties In 2016". NPR.org. Retrieved May 16, 2019. ^ "Donald Trump Jr. Strikes Deal for 'Limited' Interview With Intelligence Committee". nytimes.com. May 14, 2019. Retrieved May 16, 2019. ^ Haberman, Maggie; Fandos, Nicholas (May 15, 2019). "White House Again Rejects Democrats' Requests for Documents in Corruption Inquiry". The New York Times. ^ "Document: White House Letter to Judiciary Committee Regarding Obstruction of Justice". Lawfare. May 15, 2019. ^ Gurman, Sadie (May 16, 2019). "Barr Says He Isn't Blocking Mueller's Testimony to Congress". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved May 16, 2019. ^ Leonnig, Carol D.; Helderman, Rosalind S.; Zapotosky, Matt; Hsu, Spencer S. (May 16, 2019). "Judge orders public release of what Michael Flynn said in call to Russian ambassador". The Washington Post. Retrieved July 18, 2019. ^ Rubin, Richard (May 17, 2019). "Mnuchin Defies Subpoena for President Trump's Tax Returns". The Wall Street Journal. ^ NAME on Twitter@justinamash (May 18, 2019). "Here are my principal conclusions" (Tweet) – via Twitter. ^ Aliya Semper Ewing (May 19, 2019). "Rep. Justin Amash Becomes the 1st Republican Congressman to Call for Trump's Impeachment". theroot.com. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ "Justin Amash, Michigan congressman, becomes first GOP lawmaker to call for impeachment". cbsnews.com. May 19, 2019. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ "Deutsche Bank Staff Saw Suspicious Activity in Trump and Kushner Accounts". nytimes.com. May 19, 2019. ^ David Morgan (May 19, 2019). Daniel Wallis; Clarence Fernandez; Keith Weir (eds.). "Deutsche Bank staff flagged Trump, Kushner transactions for watchdog: NYTimes". Reuters.com. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ Arno Schuetze; Tom Sims (May 20, 2019). Riham Alkousaa (ed.). "Deutsche Bank denies report it prevented Trump transactions being flagged". Reuters.com. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ Richard Engel; Kate Benyon-Tinker; Kennett Werner (May 20, 2019). "Russian documents reveal desire to sow racial discord — and violence — in the U.S.; The revelations come as U.S. intelligence agencies have warned of probable Russian meddling in the 2020 election". nbcnews.com. Retrieved May 21, 2019. ^ Charlie Savage (May 20, 2019). "Accountants Must Turn Over Trump's Financial Records, Lower-Court Judge Rules; President Trump lost an early test of his strategy of stonewalling all oversight demands for information by Congress, but the ruling is just the first step in what could be a lengthy process". nytimes.com. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ "Judge Rules Against Trump In Subpoena Fight As White House Blocks McGahn Testimony". NPR.org. ^ "Judge rules against Trump in fight over president's financial records". Washington Post. ^ Vivian Ho Sabrina Siddiqui; Erin Durkin (May 21, 2019). "Judge backs House subpoena of Trump's financial records – as it happened" – via theguardian.com. ^ Katelyn Polantz. "Judge orders Trump accounting firm to hand over records to Congress". CNN. ^ Andrew Desiderio; Natasha Bertrand; Darren Samuelsohn (May 21, 2019). "Cohen: Trump's attorney urged false testimony; President Donald Trump's former fixer also said Jay Sekulow dangled a pardon to 'shut down' the Russia probe". Politico.com. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ Tom Hamburger; Ellen Nakashima; Karoun Demirjian (May 20, 2019). "Cohen told lawmakers Trump attorney Jay Sekulow encouraged him to falsely claim Moscow project ended in January 2016". washingtonpost.com. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ Josh Dawsey; Rachael Bade; Carol D. Leonnig (May 21, 2019). "House panel subpoenas Trump's former top staffer, aide to McGahn". washingtonpost.com. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ Mary Clare Jalonick; Lisa Mascaro (May 21, 2019). "Democratic impeachment calls swell as McGahn defies subpoena". apnews.com. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ Savage, Charlie; Fandos, Nicholas (May 20, 2019). "Trump's Secrecy Fight Escalates as Judge Rules for Congress in Early Test" – via NYTimes.com. ^ "Trump blocks former counsel McGahn from testifying to Congress". ABC News. ^ "White House blocks former counsel McGahn from testifying to Congress". Washington Post. ^ Jeff Stein; Josh Dawsey (May 21, 2019). "Confidential draft IRS memo says tax returns must be given to Congress unless president invokes executive privilege". washingtonpost.com. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ "I.R.S. Memo Undercuts Mnuchin on Withholding Trump's Tax Returns". nytimes.com. May 21, 2019. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ Erin Banco (May 21, 2019). "Rex Tillerson Secretly Meets With House Foreign Affairs Committee to Talk Trump; The former secretary of state talked with lawmakers about his time with the president and the frictions he had with the president's son-in-law". thedailybeast.com. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ Bart Jansen (May 22, 2019). "In compromise, Justice Department will reveal intelligence files from Mueller probe to House committee". USA Today. Retrieved May 22, 2019 – via MSN.com. ^ Fandos, Nicholas (May 22, 2019). "Justice Dept. Says It Will Share Some Mueller-Related Intelligence With House Committee" – via NYTimes.com. ^ "Justice Department and House intelligence panel strike deal for Mueller materials". Washington Post. ^ Shahien Nasiripour; David Voreacos (May 22, 2019). "Michael Cohen Filings Show 950 Messages With Russian Oligarch's Cousin". bloomberg.com. Retrieved May 22, 2019. ^ Flitter, Emily; McKinley, Jesse; Enrich, David; Fandos, Nicholas (May 22, 2019). "Trump's Financial Secrets Move Closer to Disclosure". NYTimes.com. ^ Dan Mangan; Kevin Breuninger (May 22, 2019). "Judge says Deutsche Bank, Capital One can give Trump financial records to House Democrats". CNBC. ^ "Trump gives Barr power to declassify intelligence related to Russia probe". Washington Post. ^ Mangan, Dan (May 29, 2019). "Special counsel Robert Mueller: 'If we had had confidence that' President Trump 'clearly did not commit a crime, we would have said so'". CNBC. ^ "Justice Department does not comply with court order to release transcripts of Michael Flynn's conversations with Russian ambassador". The Washington Post. May 31, 2019. ^ a b Dukakis, Ali (May 31, 2019). "Ex-Roger Stone aide appears before grand jury Friday after year-long subpoena fight". ABC News. Retrieved June 14, 2019. ^ Bertrand, Natasha (July 9, 2019). "Trump dossier author Steele gets 16-hour DOJ grilling; The interview was contentious at first, according to two people familiar with the matter, but investigators ultimately found his testimony credible and even surprising". Politico. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Goldman, Adam; Savage, Charlie; Rosenberg, Matthew (July 9, 2019). "Justice Dept. Watchdog Is Preparing to Deliver Verdict on the Russia Investigation". The New York Times. Archived from the original on November 12, 2019. Retrieved July 15, 2019. ^ a b Beavers, Olivia (June 3, 2019). "Judiciary Democrats announce series of hearings on Mueller report". The Hill. Retrieved June 3, 2019. ^ Cheney, Kyle; Desiderio, Andrew (June 4, 2019). "White House instructs Hicks, Donaldson to defy Dem subpoenas". Politico. Retrieved June 25, 2019. ^ Polantz, Katelyn (June 5, 2019). "Judge now says DOJ doesn't have to release Kislyak-Flynn transcripts". CNN. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Samuelsohn, Darren; Gerstein, Josh (June 6, 2019). "Michael Flynn fires legal team with sentencing looming on federal charges". Politico. Retrieved June 14, 2019. ^ Arciga, Julia (June 6, 2019). "LISTEN: Trump Lawyer John Dowd's Voicemail to Michael Flynn's Attorney Released". The Daily Beast. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Kevin Breuninger; Dan Mangan (June 12, 2019). "Michael Flynn hires new lawyer, Sidney Powell, who had urged him to withdraw guilty plea in Mueller case". CNBC. ^ Jeremy Herb (June 13, 2019). "House Intel panel subpoenas Gates, Flynn". CNN. Retrieved June 14, 2019. ^ "Transcript: ABC News' George Stephanopoulos' exclusive interview with President Trump". ABC News. June 16, 2019. Retrieved September 25, 2019. ^ Kaitlan Collins; Kevin Liptak (June 19, 2019). "She stopped returning some of Trump's calls. Now Hope Hicks has testified behind closed doors". CNN. Retrieved June 25, 2019. ^ Shabad, Rebecca; Moe, Alex (June 24, 2019). "Cummings demands details on 2017 Trump-Putin meeting; The House Oversight Committee chairman has asked whether the president violated the President Records Act by destroying and confiscating documents containing details about that sitdown". NBC News. Retrieved June 25, 2019. ^ Falconer, Rebecca (June 24, 2019). "House Democrats reach deal for ex-White House aide to testify on Trump". Axios. Retrieved June 25, 2019. ^ Samuelsohn, Darren; Bertrand, Natasha; Gerstein, Josh (June 24, 2019). "Flynn's sentencing delayed again so new lawyer can study up". Politico. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Bade, Rachael; Helderman, Rosalind; Leonnig, Carol (July 8, 2019). "White House blocks key Mueller witness from answering more than 200 questions from House investigators". The Washington Post. Retrieved July 10, 2019. ^ Fandos, Nicholas; Benner, Katie (July 9, 2019). "Justice Dept. Tells Mueller Deputies Not to Testify, Scrambling an Agreement". The New York Times. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Cheney, Kyle; Desiderio, Rew (July 9, 2019). "House Dems set to subpoena Kushner, Sessions and 10 other Mueller witnesses". Politico. ^ Lowell, Hugo (July 9, 2019). "Democrats consider issuing new subpoenas to current and former Trump officials". The Daily Telegraph. United Kingdom. ISSN 0307-1235. Retrieved August 21, 2019. ^ Barakat, Matthew (July 15, 2019). "Trial of former Flynn business partner begins in Virginia". The Washington Post. Associated Press. Retrieved July 16, 2019. ^ Cohen, Marshall; Guerrero, Kay (July 16, 2019). "Ex-Ecuadorian president confirms Assange meddled in US election from London embassy" (Contains autoplaying video). CNN. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Sukhov, Oleg (July 19, 2019). "Court cancels earlier ruling that Ukrainian officials interfered in US election". Kyiv Post. Retrieved September 27, 2019. ^ Santucci, John; Mosk, Matthew (July 18, 2019). "Trump administration invokes privilege again, blocks intel committee from classified Mueller docs, sources say". ABC News. ABC News Internet Ventures. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Durkin, Erin (July 23, 2019). "Nadler challenger targets him on Trump impeachment". Politico.com. Retrieved November 19, 2019. The report presents very substantial evidence that the president is guilty of high crimes and misdemeanors and we have to present or let Mueller present those facts to the American people and then see where we go from there, because the administration must be held accountable and no president can be — can be above the law. ^ Sullivan, Kate (July 21, 2019). "'Very substantial evidence' Trump is 'guilty of high crimes and misdemeanors,' House Judiciary Chair says" (Contains autoplaying video). CNN. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ "Ahead of Mueller hearings, top Democrats call Trump 'unindicted co-conspirator' and accuse him of 'high crimes and misdemeanors'". The Washington Post. July 21, 2019. Retrieved July 29, 2019. ^ a b Weiner, Rachel (July 23, 2019). "Michael Flynn's former business partner convicted of illegal lobbying". The Washington Post. Retrieved July 23, 2019. ^ Weiner, Rachel (July 18, 2019). "Without testimony from Michael Flynn, judge is skeptical of case against ex-business partner". The Washington Post. Retrieved July 24, 2019. ^ Beauchamp, Zach (July 24, 2019). "5 losers and 0 winners from Robert Mueller's testimony to the House of Representatives". Vox.com. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ "Full transcript: Mueller testimony before House Judiciary, Intelligence committees". nbcnews.com. July 25, 2019. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Mariotti, Renato (July 25, 2019). "Actually, Robert Mueller Was Awesome". Politico Magazine. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Carney, Jordain (July 24, 2019). "GOP blocks election security bills after Mueller testimony". thehill.com. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Barrett, Ted; Collier, Kevin (July 25, 2019). "2020 election security: GOP senators block election security legislation hours after Mueller warns of Russian interference" (Contains autoplaying video). CNN. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Carney, Jordain (July 25, 2019). "McConnell blocks two election security bills". The Hill. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Desiderio, Andrew (July 25, 2019). "House Dems authorize subpoenas for senior White House aides' official communications". Politico. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Farrington, Dana (July 25, 2019). "READ: Senate Intelligence Report On Russian Interference In The 2016 Election" (Contains an embed from DocumentCloud). National Public Radio. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Lucas, Ryan (July 25, 2019). "Senate Intel Committee Unveils Election Security Report In Wake Of Mueller Hearings". All Things Considered. National Public Radio. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Basu, Zachary; Uchill, Joe (July 25, 2019). "Senate Intel releases 1st volume of report on 2016 Russian interference" (Contains a document embed from DocumentCloud). Axios. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Chalfant, Morgan; Miller, Maggie (July 25, 2019). "Senate Intel finds 'extensive' Russian election interference going back to 2014". The Hill. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Dennis, Steven T. (July 25, 2019). "Senate Probe Finds 'Extensive' Russian Meddling in U.S. Election". Bloomberg. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Zoe Tillman (September 25, 2019). "5 Moments In Donald Trump's Phone Call To Ukraine That Could Fuel The Impeachment Investigation; "There's a lot of talk about Biden's son ... so whatever you can do with the Attorney General would be great."". buzzfeednews.com. Retrieved September 25, 2019. ^ Basu, Zachary (October 2, 2019). "WaPo: Pence national security adviser was on Trump-Ukraine phone call". Axios.com. Retrieved October 4, 2019. ^ Horowitz, Jason; Pérez-Peña, Richard (October 2, 2019). "Pompeo Confirms He Listened to Trump's Call to Ukraine President". The New York Times. ^ "White House official directed hold on Ukraine aid shortly after Trump's July 25 call with Zelensky". Washington Post. ^ Stolberg, Sheryl Gay (December 22, 2019). "Democrats, Citing White House Emails, Renew Calls for Impeachment Witnesses" – via NYTimes.com. ^ "Newly released emails provide details in White House pause of Ukraine aid". NBC News. ^ Sara Murray; Katelyn Polantz; Tammy Kupperman. "Effort to freeze Ukraine aid began about 90 minutes after call between Trump and Zelensky". CNN. ^ "Schumer cites "explosive" email to call for witnesses at impeachment trial". cbsnews.com. ^ Bose, Nandita; Pamuk, Humeyra (December 22, 2019). "Battle lines harden over Trump impeachment trial witnesses". Reuters. Retrieved February 6, 2020. ^ Bajak, Frank (September 27, 2019). "Why Trump asked Ukraine's president about 'CrowdStrike'". The Washington Post. Associated Press. Retrieved September 29, 2019. I would like to find out what happened with this whole situation with Ukraine, they say CrowdStrike. I guess you have one of your wealthy people. The server, they say Ukraine has it. ^ Sanger, David E.; Edmondson, Catie (July 26, 2019). "Russia Targeted Election Systems in All 50 States, Report Finds". The New York Times. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ "Russians probably targeted election systems in all 50 states, Senate panel's report says". The Washington Post. July 25, 2019. Retrieved July 27, 2019. ^ Cheney, Kyle; Gerstein, Josh (July 26, 2019). "Judiciary Committee asks a judge to share Mueller's secret grand jury evidence". Politico.com. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Fandos, Nicholas; Savage, Charlie (July 26, 2019). "Raising Prospect of Impeaching Trump, House Seeks Mueller's Grand Jury Secrets". The New York Times. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Fandos, Nicholas; Savage, Charlie (July 26, 2019). "House panel asks court to enforce Mueller-related subpoenas, a step toward possible impeachment". The Washington Post. Retrieved July 27, 2019. ^ Lowell, Hugo (July 27, 2019). "Prospect of Trump impeachment grows as Democrats seek grand jury evidence". United Kingdom: Daily Telegraph. ISSN 0307-1235. Retrieved August 21, 2019. ^ Philp, Catherine (October 2, 2019). "Donald Trump impeachment: President called Boris Johnson for help to discredit Mueller inquiry". The Times. Retrieved October 2, 2019. ^ Gerstein, Josh (July 30, 2019). "Judge dismisses DNC suit against Trump campaign, Russia over email hack". Politico. Retrieved March 3, 2020. ^ Helderman, Rosalind S.; Barrett, Devlin; Zapotosky, Matt; Hamburger, Tom; Dawsey, John; Davis, Aaron; Gearan, Anne; Crites, Alice (November 26, 2019). "A wealthy Venezuelan hosted Giuliani as he pursued Ukraine campaign. Then Giuliani lobbied the Justice Department on his behalf". The Washington Post. Retrieved November 26, 2019. ^ Samuels, Brett (August 6, 2019). "Judge dismisses one of two charges against former Obama White House counsel". The Hill. Retrieved August 6, 2019. ^ Jackson, Amy Berman (August 6, 2019). "United States of America v. Gregory B. Craig, Crim. Action No. 19-0125 (ABJ), Memorandum Opinion and Order" (PDF). The Washington Post. Retrieved August 6, 2019. ^ Beavers, Olivia (August 6, 2019). "Peter Strzok, key figure in Russia probe, sues FBI, DOJ over firing". The Hill. Retrieved August 6, 2019. ^ Alex Moe; Mike Memoli (August 7, 2019). "House panel sues to force testimony from former Trump White House counsel; Don McGahn is a key player in what Democrats believe is one of the clearest cases of obstruction of justice outlined in the Mueller report: Trump's directive that he fire the special counsel". nbcnews.com. Retrieved August 7, 2019. ^ Katherine Faulders; Benjamin Siegel (August 7, 2019). "House Democrats file lawsuit to enforce subpoena for McGahn testimony". abcnews.go.com. Retrieved August 8, 2019. ^ Nicholas Fandos; Charlie Savage (August 7, 2019). "Pondering Impeachment, House Sues Don McGahn, Ex-White House Counsel, for Testimony; The Judiciary Committee hopes a federal judge will strike down the White House's "absolute immunity" claims, clearing the way for testimony from key witnesses to the special counsel". nytimes.com. Retrieved August 8, 2019. ^ Zapotosky, Matt (August 8, 2019). "Andrew McCabe sues FBI over firing, alleges plot by Trump to oust those disloyal to the president". The Washington Post. Retrieved August 8, 2019. ^ Greg Walters (August 8, 2019). "Trump's Favorite Bank Just Forked Over a Pile of Documents to Democrats". news.vice.com. Retrieved August 9, 2019. ^ Audrey McNamara (August 8, 2019). "PAPER TRAIL: Major American Banks Give Congress Docs on Russians Who May Be Linked to Trump: WSJ". thedailybeast.com. Retrieved August 9, 2019. ^ Ryan Deffenbaugh (August 8, 2019). "Banks hand over docs to Congress, NY investigators in Trump inquiries". crainsnewyork.com. Crain Communications. Retrieved August 9, 2019. ^ Andrew Desiderio (August 8, 2019). "Nadler: 'This is formal impeachment proceedings'". Politico.com. Retrieved August 21, 2019. ^ Federal Bureau of Investigation (November 22, 2016 – May 15, 2017). "FBI 302 reports on interviews with Bruce Ohr". Retrieved November 27, 2019 – via Politico. ^ Gerstein, Josh (August 8, 2019). "FBI releases Bruce Ohr interview reports". Retrieved November 27, 2019. ^ "Read the whistleblower complaint regarding President Trump's communications with Ukrainian President Volodymyr Zelensky". The Washington Post. September 26, 2019. Retrieved October 4, 2019. ^ Barrett, Devlin; Zapotosky, Matt; Dawsey, Josh; Harris, Shane; Leonnig, Carol D.; Demirjian, Karoun; DeYoung, Karen; Hudson, John; Nakashima, Ellen; Parker, Ashley (September 26, 2019). "Whistleblower claimed that Trump abused his office and that White House officials tried to cover it up". The Washington Post. Retrieved October 4, 2019. ^ Vogel, Kenneth P.; Schmidt, Michael S.; Fandos, Nicolas; Haberman, Maggie (October 3, 2019). "rump Envoys Pushed Ukraine to Commit to Investigations". The New York Times. Retrieved October 3, 2019. ^ Faulders, Ketherine; Finnegan, Conor (October 3, 2019). "'Crazy to withhold security assistance' to Ukraine for political campaign: Top US diplomat". ABC News. Retrieved October 3, 2019. ^ Bade, Rachael (August 15, 2019). "House Democrats subpoena former Trump campaign manager Lewandowski and ex-White House official Dearborn". The Washington Post. Retrieved August 15, 2019. ^ Kaitlan Collins (August 15, 2019). "WH officials look at executive privilege for Lewandowski, who never worked at the White House". CNN. Retrieved August 17, 2019. ^ LaFraniere, Sharon (August 15, 2019). "Trial Opens for Former Obama Aide Accused of Lying About Foreign Lobbying". Retrieved August 15, 2019. ^ Allan Smith (August 22, 2019). "Giuliani says State Dept. aided his effort to press Ukraine on Trump opponents; Giuliani pressed for investigations into former Vice President Joe Biden and the release of damaging information on Paul Manafort". nbcnews.com. Retrieved August 23, 2019. ^ Mike Memoli; Alex Moe; Carol E. Lee (August 26, 2019). "House Judiciary Committee subpoenas former White House aide Rob Porter; The former staff secretary's close proximity to President Donald Trump could be crucial to the Democrats' investigation of possible obstruction of justice in the Mueller probe". nbcnews.com. Retrieved August 26, 2019. ^ Sharon LaFraniere. "Gregory Craig Acquitted on Charge of Lying to Justice Department". The New York Times. A. G. Sulzberger. Retrieved September 9, 2019. ^ "House lays out its impeachment probe". NBC News. ^ "Read the full text of the House Judiciary resolution outlining impeachment probe". NBC News. ^ a b c Manu Raju; Jeremy Herb (September 9, 2019). "House panel says Flynn failed to comply with subpoena". CNN. Retrieved September 11, 2019. ^ a b c Kyle Cheney; Andrew Desiderio (September 9, 2019). "Adam Schiff lashes Michael Flynn for refusing to cooperate". politico.com. Retrieved September 11, 2019. ^ "House committees launch probe of Trump, Giuliani and Ukraine". Reuters. September 19, 2019. Archived from the original on December 14, 2019. ^ Dan Mangan; Kevin Breuninger (September 9, 2019). "Three House committees investigate Trump, Giuliani pressure on Ukraine to hurt Biden's campaign". cnbc.com. Retrieved September 10, 2019. ^ Jim Sciutto (September 9, 2019). "Exclusive: US extracted top spy from inside Russia in 2017". CNN. Retrieved September 11, 2019. ^ Julian E. Barnes; Adam Goldman; David E. Sanger (September 9, 2019). "Exclusive: US extracted top spy from inside Russia in 2017". NYT. Retrieved September 11, 2019. ^ Ken Dilanian; Tatyana Chistikova (September 10, 2019). "Possible Russian spy for CIA now living in Washington area". NBCNews.com. Retrieved September 11, 2019. ^ "House Judiciary Committee Inches Toward Impeachment". nytimes.com. September 12, 2019. Retrieved September 12, 2019. ^ Rebecca Shabad; Alex Moe (September 12, 2019). "Impeachment inquiry ramps up as Judiciary panel adopts procedural guidelines; The House committee passed a resolution Thursday that sets the outlines for future impeachment investigation hearings". nbcnews.com. Retrieved September 16, 2019. ^ "House Democrats step up Trump impeachment inquiry". BBC.com. September 12, 2019. Retrieved September 16, 2019. ^ Ella Nilsen (September 12, 2019). "Democrats formally launch an impeachment investigation — even though some say it's already happening; The House Judiciary Committee just approved something that could or could not be an impeachment inquiry, depending on who you ask". Vox.com. Retrieved September 16, 2019. ^ Marshall Cohen. "Judge grills prosecutors and considers tossing guilty verdicts in Mueller-tied lobbying case". CNN. ^ a b "Trump pressed Ukrainian leader to investigate Biden's son, according to people familiar with the matter". Washington Post. ^ a b Kramer, Andrew E. (September 20, 2019). "Ukraine Pressured on U.S. Political Investigations" – via NYTimes.com. ^ a b Cullison, Alan; Ballhaus, Rebecca; Volz, Dustin. "WSJ News Exclusive | Trump Repeatedly Pressed Ukraine President to Investigate Biden's Son". The Wall Street Journal. ^ a b Zachary Cohen and David Shortell. "Trump pressured Ukraine's President to investigate Biden's son". CNN. ^ Pamela Brown, Jeremy Herb and Manu Raju. "White House tells Lewandowski not to answer questions and asserts immunity for Dearborn and Porter". CNN. ^ "Trump orders two ex-White House aides not to testify at House hearing on Tuesday". September 17, 2019 – via reuters.com. ^ Fandos, Nicholas (September 16, 2019). "Lewandowski Cleared for Limited Testimony in House Inquiry, as White House Blocks Others" – via NYTimes.com. ^ Haberman, Maggie; Fandos, Nicholas (September 17, 2019). "Key Moments From Corey Lewandowski's Testimony Before Congress" – via NYTimes.com. ^ "Lewandowski, House Democrats spar at 1st impeachment hearing". AP NEWS. September 18, 2019. ^ Desiderio, Rew; Cheney, Kyle. "Dems see Lewandowski's combativeness as Trump impeachment fuel". POLITICO. ^ "'You're not going to stonewall me!': Democrats press Lewandowski at fiery Hill hearing". NBC News. ^ Sonmez, Felicia. "In turnaround, McConnell backs $250 million in election security funding". Washington Post. ^ Levine, Marianne. "McConnell backs election security amendment after facing criticism". POLITICO. ^ LeBlanc, Paul (September 19, 2019). "Rudy Giuliani denies asking Ukraine to investigate Biden -- before admitting it". CNN. Retrieved October 15, 2019. ^ Budryk, Zack (September 23, 2019). "Flynn pleads the Fifth, rejecting House Intel appearance: report". The Hill. Retrieved September 26, 2019. ^ Scarborough, Rowan (September 23, 2019). "Michael Flynn pleads Fifth, refuses to be 'paraded, harassed or disparaged' by Adam Schiff". The Washington Examiner. Retrieved September 26, 2019. ^ Tucker, Emma (January 29, 2020). "House Foreign Affairs Chairman: Bolton Urged Me to Probe Yovanovitch's Removal in September Call". The Daily Beast. Retrieved January 30, 2020. ^ Weiner, Rachel (September 24, 2019). "Judge overturns conviction of Michael Flynn's former business partner". The Washington Post. Retrieved September 27, 2019. ^ Bade, Rachel; DeBonis, Mike; Demirjian, Karoun (September 24, 2019). "Pelosi announces impeachment inquiry, says Trump's courting of foreign political help is a 'betrayal of national security'". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ Cheney, Kyle. "Whistleblower says White House tried to 'lock down' Ukraine call". POLITICO. ^ Timm, Jane C. (September 25, 2019). "Trump promotes conspiracy theory: Clinton's deleted emails are in Ukraine". NBC News. Retrieved October 15, 2019. ^ Nguyen, Tina (October 10, 2019). ""They Read the Headline and Just Ran With It": How MAGA Media Built the Ukraine Story That's Become Trump's Last Line of Defense". Vanity Fair. Retrieved October 12, 2019. ^ Blake, Aaron (September 25, 2019). "The full, rough transcript of Trump's call with Ukraine's president, annotated". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ Rupar, Aaron (September 26, 2019). "Joseph Maguire's congressional testimony: key takeaways". Vox. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ Barrett, Devlin; Zapotosky, Matt; Dawsey, Josh; Harris, Shane; Leonnig, Carol D.; Demirjian, Karoun; DeYoung, Karen; Hudson, John; Nakashima, Ellen; Parker, Ashley (September 26, 2019). "Whistleblower claimed that Trump abused his office and that White House officials tried to cover it up". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ Tim Mak (September 27, 2019). "NRA Was 'Foreign Asset' To Russia Ahead of 2016, New Senate Report Reveals". npr.org. Retrieved September 28, 2019. ^ Spencer Ackerman (September 27, 2019). "Russians Used Greed to 'Capture' NRA, Senator Alleges in New Report; When the NRA visited Moscow in 2015, it wasn't just to strengthen ties to Putin allies. A new Senate report says it was about making money, too". thedailybeast.com. Retrieved September 28, 2019. ^ a b "Wyden Unveils Report on NRA Ties to Russia, Findings Show NRA Misled Public About 2015 Moscow Trip". United States Senate Committee on Finance (Press release). September 27, 2019. Retrieved September 28, 2019. ^ Hamburger, Tom (September 27, 2019). "NRA may have violated tax laws with 2015 trip to Russia, according to report by Senate Democrats". The Washington Post. Retrieved September 28, 2019. ^ Hughes, Siobhan; Duehren, Andrew. "Democrats Set Rapid Timetable for Trump Impeachment Probe". WSJ. Retrieved September 30, 2019. ^ Lowell, Hugo (September 29, 2019). "Democrats decide on rapid timetable for Trump impeachment inquiry". The Telegraph. ISSN 0307-1235. Retrieved September 30, 2019. ^ Cheney, Kyle; Desiderio, Rew; Caygle, Heather. "Democrats look to narrow impeachment focus to Trump-Ukraine scandal". POLITICO. Retrieved September 30, 2019. ^ Cheney, Kyle. "Democrats subpoena Pompeo as part of impeachment inquiry". msn.com. Retrieved September 30, 2019. ^ Kessler, Glenn (October 8, 2019). "The GOP theory that Ukraine 'set up' Trump". The Washington Post. Retrieved October 14, 2019. ^ Grassley, Charles E.; Johnson, Ron (September 27, 2019). "Grassley, Johnson Renew Inquiry into DOJ Actions on Reported Election Meddling". United States Senate. Retrieved October 14, 2019. ^ Giuffrida, Angela (October 2, 2019). "US attorney general 'met Italian officials to discuss Russiagate'". The Guardian. Retrieved October 16, 2019. ^ a b Harlan, Chico; Pitrelli, Stefano (October 10, 2019). "The professor, the prime minister and the attorney general: Italy gets caught up in an unproven theory of Trump's allies". The Washington Post. Retrieved October 16, 2019. ^ Nadeau, Barbie Latza (October 5, 2019). "Barr Went to Rome to Hear a Secret Tape From Joseph Mifsud, the Professor Who Helped Ignite the Russia Probe". Daily Beast. Retrieved October 16, 2019. ^ a b Fandos, Nicholas (September 30, 2019). "House Subpoenas Giuliani, Trump's Lawyer, for Ukraine Records". The New York Times. ISSN 0362-4331. Retrieved September 30, 2019. ^ Andrew Desiderio (September 30, 2019). "Trump may have lied to Mueller, House Democrats say; Dems believe the special counsel's grand-jury materials could aid their Ukraine investigation, according to a court filing". Politico.com. Retrieved October 1, 2019. ^ David Shortell (October 1, 2019). "Justice Department told to produce 500 pages of interview memos from Mueller investigation". CNN.com. Retrieved October 1, 2019. ^ Horowitz, Jason (October 2, 2019). "First Barr, Now Pompeo: Italy Is Hub of Impeachment Intrigue for Trump Officials". The New York Times. Retrieved October 16, 2019. ^ "Read Secretary of State Mike Pompeo's letter to the chairman of the House Foreign Affairs Committee". The Washington Post. October 1, 2019. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ DeYoung, Karen; Dawsey, Josh; Demerjian, Karoum; Hudson, John (October 1, 2019). "Impeachment inquiry erupts into battle between executive, legislative branches". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ Graham, Lindsel (October 2, 2019). "Letter to Prime Ministers Scott Morrison, Giuseppe Conte, and Boris Johnson" (PDF). United States Senate. Retrieved October 15, 2019. ^ a b Mazetti, Mark; Goldman, Adam; Benner, Katie; Horowitz, Jason; Barnes, Julian (October 6, 2019). "Barr and a Top Prosecutor Cast a Wide Net in Reviewing the Russia Inquiry". The New York Times. Retrieved October 15, 2019. ^ Joe Hockey [@JoeHockey] (October 3, 2019). "Australia's response to Senator Lindsey Graham [image of letter]" (Tweet). Retrieved October 15, 2019 – via Twitter. ^ Landay, Jonathan; Hosenball, Mark; Zengerle, Patricia; Lambert, Lisa (October 2, 2019). Berkrot, Bill; Gregorio, David; Brown, Tom; Osterman, Cynthia (eds.). "Democrats say Trump administration used misinformation to attack U.S. diplomat". Reuters. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of Kurt Volker, former U.S. Special Representative for Ukraine Negotiations". The Washington Post. November 6, 2019. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ Demirjian, Karoun; Bade, Rachael; Dawsey, Josh; Hudson, John (October 3, 2019). "Trump's ex-envoy says Ukrainians gave Giuliani misinformation on the Bidens". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ DeYoung, Karen; Demirjian, Karuon; Itkowitz, Colby; Miller, Greg; Eilperin, Juliet; Bade, Rachael; Dawsey, Josh (October 5, 2019). "Pompeo says he sent response to House investigators, but subpoenaed documents remain undelivered". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ Foran, Clare; Fox, Lauren; Herb, Jeremy; Cohen, Zachary (October 4, 2019). "Inspector general provided intel committee docs on how he corroborated whistleblower complaint". CNN. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ Fahrenthold, David A.; Marimow, Ann E. (October 7, 2019). "Federal judge rules Trump must turn over his tax returns to Manhattan DA, but Trump has appealed". The Washington Post. Retrieved October 7, 2019. ^ Cheney, Kyle (October 7, 2019). "Judge tosses a Trump lawsuit to keep his taxes secret". Politico. Retrieved October 7, 2019. ^ a b c d e f g h Stevens, Harry; Keating, Dan; Uhrmacher, Kevin; Alcantara, Chris (January 24, 2020). "What's coming up in Senate impeachment trial proceedings". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Daugherty, Alex; Hall, Kevin G. (October 7, 2019). "Florida businessmen with Giuliani, Ukraine ties won't comply with impeachment inquiry". Miami Herald. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ McCabe, David (October 8, 2019). "G.O.P.-Led Senate Panel Affirms Russia Attacked Election, and Urges Action". The New York Times. Retrieved October 9, 2019. ^ Cipollone, Pat A. (October 8, 2019). "Letter from Pat Cipollone to Representatives Nancy Pelosi, Eliot Engel, Adam Schiff, and Elija Cummings" (PDF). White House. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Nilsen, Ella (October 8, 2019). "Read: The White House letter refusing to comply with Democrats' impeachment inquiry". Vox. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ a b c Mazzetti, Mark; Sullivan, Eileen; Goldman, Adam; Rashbaum, William K.; Fandos, Nicholas; Benner, Katie; Vogel, Kenneth P.; Haberman, Maggie; Conger, Kate; Montague, Zach; Beachy, Susan (October 24, 2019). "2 Giuliani Associates Arrested With One-Way Tickets at U.S. Airport". The New York Times. Retrieved January 27, 2020. ^ Indictment, United States v. Parnas, et al. 1:19-CRIM-725 (PDF) – via The New York Times ^ Lefebvre, Ben (October 23, 2019). "Democrats eyeing Ukraine oligarch in probe of Giuliani associates' campaign contributions". Mother Jones. Retrieved January 27, 2020. ^ a b DeHaven, James (October 10, 2019). "Giuliani associates accused of trying to buy influence with top Nevada GOP candidates". Reno Gazette Journal. Retrieved January 27, 2020. ^ Corn, David (January 24, 2020). "The Main Trump Super-PAC Is Covering Up Its Own Role in the Impeachment Scandal". Mother Jones. Retrieved January 27, 2020. ^ Eaton, Joshua (October 11, 2019). "PAC would return contribution tied to Trump impeachment probe — if it only could". Roll Call. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ Joseph, Cameron (October 10, 2019). "Kevin McCarthy Is Donating the Cash He Took From Rudy Giuliani's Indicted Pals". Vice. Retrieved January 27, 2020. ^ Tully-McManus, Katherine; Bowman, Bridget (October 10, 2019). "Former Rep. Pete Sessions met with indicted Giuliani associates, accepted donations". Roll Call. Retrieved January 27, 2020. ^ a b Hudson, John; Demirjian, Karoum; Bade, Rachael; Sonne, Paul (October 11, 2019). "Ousted ambassador Marie Yovanovitch tells Congress Trump pressured State Dept. to remove her". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ DeYoung, Karen (October 10, 2019). "Senior adviser to Pompeo resigns". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ a b Desiderio, Andrew; Cheney, Kyle (October 1, 2019). "Ex-Pompeo adviser tells Congress he resigned over Trump's attacks on Yovanovitch". Politico. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "Testimony of former U.S. Ambassador to Ukraine Marie "Masha" Yovanovitch". The Washington Post. November 4, 2019. Retrieved January 26, 2018. ^ LaFraniere, Sharon; Fandos, Nicholas; Kramer, Andrew E. (October 11, 2019). "Ukraine Envoy Says She Was Told Trump Wanted Her Out Over Lack of Trust" – via NYTimes.com. ^ Jalonick, Mary Clare; Lee, Matthew; Fram, Alan (October 11, 2019). "Former envoy defies Trump, testifies he pushed to oust her". Associated Press. ^ Fahrenthold, David A.; Marimow, Ann E. (October 11, 2019). "Trump renews claim that he is immune from criminal investigation in effort to block Manhattan DA probe". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ Raju, Manu; Herb, Jeremy (October 14, 2019). "Lawyer: Giuliani associate 'being cooperative' with House impeachment probe". CNN. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of Fiona Hill, former top Russia adviser to the White House". The Washington Post. November 8, 2019. Retrieved January 27, 2020. ^ Borger, Julian (October 14, 2019). "Fiona Hill: British-born Russia expert drawn into impeachment storm". The Guardian. Retrieved January 27, 2020. ^ "Pence, Giuliani defy demands by Congress for documents". ABC News. ^ Andrews, Rebecca Ballhaus and Natalie. "Pence, Giuliani Say They Won't Give Congress Documents in Trump Impeachment Inquiry". WSJ. ^ Weiland, Noah (October 15, 2019). "The Trump Impeachment Inquiry: What Happened Today" – via NYTimes.com. ^ "Pence refuses House request to provide documents related to Ukraine call". NBC News. ^ Michael Warren; Evan Perez. "Giuliani and a key federal agency defy House Democrats' impeachment subpoena". CNN. ^ "Bloomberg - Are you a robot?". bloomberg.com. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of George Kent, deputy assistant secretary of state". The Washington Post. November 7, 2019. Retrieved January 27, 2020. ^ Fandos, Nicholas; Vogel, Kenneth P.; Shear, Michael D.; Cochrane, Emily; Stolberg, Sheryl Gay (October 15, 2019). "Senior State Dept. Ukraine Expert Says White House Sidelined Him". The New York Times. Retrieved January 27, 2020. ^ "Testimony of former Senior Adviser to the Secretary of State Ambassador P. Michael McKinley". The Washington Post. November 12, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Hudson, John; Demirjian, Karoun (October 17, 2019). "Mulvaney confirms Ukraine aid withheld in part to force probe of Democrats". The Washington Post. Retrieved October 17, 2019. Did he also mention to me in the past the corruption related to the DNC server? Absolutely, no question about that. But that’s it, that’s why we held up the money. ^ The White House (October 17, 2019). "Mick Mulvaney Defends Withholding Military Aid to Ukraine Pending Investigation". C-SPAN (Video). Retrieved October 17, 2019. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of Gordon Sondland, U.S. Ambassador to the E.U." The Washington Post. November 6, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Fandos, Nicholas; Schmidt, Michael S. (October 17, 2019). "Gordon Sondland, E.U. Envoy, Testifies Trump Delegated Ukraine Policy to Giuliani". The New York Times. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ CBS News; Associated Press (October 21, 2019). "Elijah Cummings, esteemed longtime Baltimore congressman, has died at 68". CBS News. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Wagner, John; Itkowitz, Colby; Brice-Saddler, Michael (October 18, 2019). "Rick Perry won't comply with subpoena in impeachment inquiry". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Burnison, Melissa F. (October 18, 2019). "Letter from Assistant Secretary Melissa F. Burnison to Chairman Adam Schiff, Chairman Eliot L. Engel, and Chairman Carolyn B. Maloney" (PDF). Retrieved January 28, 2020 – via The Washington Post. ^ Desidero, Andrew; Emma, Caitlin (October 21, 2019). "Dems delay key impeachment witnesses for Cummings memorials". Politico. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of Ambassador William B. Taylor, senior U.S. diplomat in Ukraine". The Washington Post. November 6, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Bade, Rachel; Gearan, Anne; Demirjan, Karoun; DeBonis, Mike (October 22, 2019). "Trump made Ukraine aid contingent on public pledge to investigate Bidens and 2016 election, U.S. envoy says he was told". The Washington Post. Retrieved October 28, 2019. ^ Wu, Nicholas; Jansen, Bart (October 22, 2019). "Key takeaways from Ukraine diplomat Bill Taylor's 'explosive' opening statement". USA Today. Retrieved October 24, 2019. ^ Faulders, Katherine (October 22, 2019). "Top US diplomat in Ukraine tells Congress investigating Bidens and election interference tied to aid money". ABC News. Retrieved October 24, 2019. ^ a b Wagner, John; Sonmez, Felicia; Itkowitz, Colby (October 23, 2019). "Cooper testifies after five-hour delay caused by House Republicans barging into secure room". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of Laura Cooper, Deputy Assistant Secretary of Defense for Russia, Ukraine, Eurasia". The Washington Post. November 11, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "Maria Butina: Russian agent deported from US to Moscow". BBC News. October 26, 2019. Retrieved October 26, 2019. ^ "Russian 'agent' Maria Butina to be released from US prison". The Straits Times. Singapore. Agence France-Presse. October 23, 2019. Retrieved October 23, 2019. ^ Hsu, Spencer S. (October 25, 2019). "U.S. judge orders Mueller grand jury materials released to House Judiciary Committee in impeachment inquiry". The Washington Post. Retrieved October 25, 2019. ^ Gambino, Lauren (October 25, 2019). "Blow to Trump as DoJ ordered to turn over evidence from Mueller grand jury". The Guardian. Retrieved October 26, 2019. Even in cases of presidential impeachment, a House resolution has never, in fact, been required to begin an impeachment inquiry. ^ a b Fram, Alan (October 25, 2019). "House investigators subpoena 3 more administration officials". Associated Press. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Hawkins, Derek; Hamburger, Tom (October 25, 2019). "Former top Trump aide asks court to rule on whether he must testify in impeachment inquiry". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of Philip Reeker, acting assistant secretary of state for European and Eurasian affairs". The Washington Post. November 26, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Fandos, Nicholas; LaFraniere, Sharon (October 26, 2019). "Official Says Attempts to Rally Top State Officials Behind Ukraine Ambassador Failed". The New York Times. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Hamburger, Tom (October 27, 2019). "Bolton's former deputy fails to show up for Hill deposition as he seeks court ruling to resolve dispute over testifying". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "READ: Ukraine Expert Lt. Col. Alexander Vindman's Opening Statement". NPR.org. Retrieved October 29, 2019. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of Lieutenant Colonel Alexander S. Vindman, White House Ukraine expert". The Washington Post. November 11, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ McCarthy, Tom (October 29, 2019). "Alexander Vindman's Trump-Ukraine testimony: five key takeaways". The Guardian. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Polantz, Katelyn. "Appeals court temporarily stops House from getting grand jury secrets for impeachment inquiry". CNN. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of Catherine Croft, State Department Ukraine specialist". The Washington Post. November 11, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Tully-McManus, Katherine (October 30, 2019). "Catherine Croft impeachment testimony revives Bob Livingston's spotlight". Roll Call. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Simonova, Masha (November 16, 2019). "Summary of Christopher Anderson's Deposition Testimony". Lawfare. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of Timothy Morrison, senior director for Europe and Russia, National Security Council". The Washington Post. November 16, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Ward, Alex (October 31, 2019). "The White House's top Ukraine official confirms there was a quid pro quo". Vox. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Fandos, Nicholas; Stolberg, Sheryl Gay (October 31, 2019). "A Divided House Endorses Impeachment Inquiry Into Trump". The New York Times. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ a b Hsu, Spencer S.; Marimow, Ann E. (October 31, 2019). "John Bolton's former deputy asks judge to resolve conflicting demands for House impeachment testimony". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Engel, Steven A. (November 1, 2019). "Exclusion of Agency Counsel from Congressional Depositions in the Impeachment Context" (PDF). United States Department of Justice. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Shaub, Jonathan (November 15, 2019). "Executive Privilege Should Have No Power When It Comes to an Impeachment". The Atlantic. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Hynes, Shaylyn (November 1, 2019). "DOE Responds to House Democrats Invitation for Closed Door, Star Chamber Deposition". United States Department of Energy (Press Release). Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Jason Leopold; Zoe Tillman; Ellie Hall; Emma Loop; Anthony Cormier (November 3, 2019). "The Mueller Report's Secret Memos". BuzzFeed News. Retrieved November 4, 2019. ^ Katelyn Polantz. "Mueller interview notes obtained by CNN show Trump's push for stolen emails". CNN. ^ Depree, Jamie (November 5, 2019). "White House officials defy subpoenas, refuse to testify about Ukraine". WHBQ-TV. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Ballhaus, Rebecca; Tau, Byron (November 4, 2019). "White House Officials Fail to Appear for Impeachment Inquiry Testimony". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Paul, Deanna; Helderman, Rosalind S.; Hamburger, Tom; Dawsey, Josh (November 4, 2019). "Giuliani associate Lev Parnas is willing to comply with House impeachment inquiry, his attorney says". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Ashraf Khalil (November 5, 2019). "Jury selection begins in trial of Trump crony Roger Stone". Associated Press. Retrieved November 5, 2019. ^ "Roger Stone complains of food poisoning, leaves jury selection in his trial". NBC News. ^ Duster, Chandelis (November 5, 2019). "National Security Council official defies request to testify Tuesday in impeachment probe". CNN. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Brufke, Juliegrace (November 5, 2019). "Two more White House officials skip impeachment depositions". The Hill. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Hsu, Spencer S.; Weiner, Rachel; Barrett, Devlin (November 6, 2019). "Prosecutor says Roger Stone lied 'because the truth looked bad for Donald Trump'". The Washington Post. Retrieved November 6, 2019. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of David Hale, undersecretary of state for political affairs". The Washington Post. November 18, 2019. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Lee, Matthew; Jalonick, Mary Clare (November 6, 2019). "State Dept. undersecretary testifies in impeachment inquiry". Associated Press. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Marcos, Christina (December 1, 2019). "How Democrats' missing witnesses could fill in the Ukraine story". The Hill. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Lillis, Mike; Beavers, Olivia (November 6, 2019). "Top State Department official arrives to testify in impeachment probe". The Hill. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ LaFraniere, Sharon (November 7, 2019). "Witness in Stone Trial Says Political Operative Misrepresented Him". The New York Times. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of Jennifer Williams, special adviser to the vice president for Europe and Russia". The Washington Post. November 16, 2019. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Ordñez, Franco; Liasson, Mara; Grisales, Claudia (November 7, 2019). "Aide From Pence Office Testifies In Impeachment Probe". NPR. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ a b Frazin, Rachel (November 8, 2019). "Bolton's lawyer says his client knows about 'many relevant meetings on Ukraine'". The Hill. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ "The Latest: Steve Bannon testifies in Roger Stone trial". Associated Press. November 8, 2019. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Lynch, Sarah N.; Lambert, Lisa (November 8, 2019). Osterman, Cynthia; Dunham, Will (eds.). "Bannon delivers damaging testimony in trial of longtime Trump adviser Stone". Reuters. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ "The Roger Stone Trial: What's Left of the Mueller Investigation". Lawfare. November 11, 2019. ^ Barber, C. Ryan (November 11, 2019). "Mick Mulvaney Plans His Own Bid Confronting Impeachment Testimony". The National Law Review. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Kelly, Caroline; Acosta, Jim; Herb, Jeremy (November 8, 2019). "Mick Mulvaney refuses to comply with House subpoena and doesn't show up for impeachment deposition". CNN. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Dukakis, Ali; Bruggeman, Lucien (November 12, 2019). "Ex-Trump campaign aide testifies in Roger Stone trial, describes 'brainstorming' sessions about WikiLeaks". ABC News. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Hsu, Spencer S.; Weiner, Rachel; Zapotosky, Matt (November 12, 2019). "Roger Stone trial: Former top Trump official details campaign's dealings on WikiLeaks, and suggests Trump was in the know". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ a b c Republican Staff of the Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence; Committee on Oversight and Reform; Committee on Foreign Affairs (November 12, 2019). "Memorandum: Key points of evidence from the Democrats' closed-door "impeachment inquiry"". Retrieved November 27, 2019 – via Politico. ^ a b Bertrand, Natasha; Cheney, Kyle (November 12, 2019). "'I'm on a mission to testify': Dem Ukraine activist eager for impeachment cameo". Politico. Retrieved November 27, 2019. ^ Hsu, Spencer S.; Weiner, Rachel; Marimow, Ann E. (November 13, 2019). "Roger Stone trial: Closing arguments finished, jury set to return Thursday for instructions". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ "Diplomats Bill Taylor and George Kent Impeachment Inquiry Testimony". C-SPAN. November 13, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Hsu, Spencer S.; Weiner, Rachel; Zapotosky, Matt (November 15, 2019). "Roger Stone guilty on all counts of lying to Congress, witness tampering". Washington Post. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ "Roger Stone Guilty of Witness Tampering, Lying to Congress". The Hollywood Reporter. Associated Press. November 15, 2019. Retrieved January 24, 2020. ^ Mangan, Kevin; Breuninger, Dan (November 15, 2019). "Trump ally Roger Stone found guilty of lying to Congress, witness tampering". CNBC. Retrieved November 15, 2019. ^ "Impeachment Hearing with Former Ukraine Ambassador Marie Yovanovitch". C-SPAN. November 15, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of David Holmes, embassy staffer in Kyiv". The Washington Post. November 18, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Fandos, Nicholas (November 15, 2019). "Embassy Official Confirms Trump Asked About Ukraine Investigation". The New York Times. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "Read: White House releases rough transcript of first call between President Trump and President Zelensky of Ukraine". The Washington Post. November 15, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Dawsey, Josh (November 15, 2019). "Rough transcript of call shows Ukraine leader wanted Trump to attend inauguration". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "Full transcript of testimony of Mark Sandy, deputy associate director for national security programs, Office of Management and Budget". The Washington Post. November 26, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Desidero, Andrew (November 16, 2019). "White House budget official appears for testimony on Ukraine aid hold amid impeachment inquiry". Politico. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Polantz, Katelyn; Herb, Jeremy (November 18, 2019). "House investigating whether Trump lied to Mueller" (Contains autoplaying video of the news). CNN. Retrieved November 19, 2019. ^ Barakat, Matthew (November 18, 2019). "House lawyer says committee investigating whether Trump lied". AP News. ^ a b c Gerstein, Josh; Samuelsohn, Darren (November 18, 2019). "Judges suggest court shouldn't solve dispute over Mueller's evidence; Democrats want access to the secret grand jury information Robert Mueller relied on during his Russia probe". Politico. Retrieved November 18, 2019. ^ Swan, Betsy; Banco, Erin (November 18, 2019). "Paul Erickson, Russian Agent Maria Butina's Boyfriend, Pleads Guilty to Fraud". Daily Beast. Retrieved November 18, 2019. ^ Owens, Annie L.; Geltzer, Joshua A.; Wayne, Seth (November 19, 2019). "Plaintiff's notice of request for expedited ruling". Politico. Retrieved November 25, 2019. ^ Samuelsohn, Darren (November 19, 2019). "Judge will rule by Nov. 25 in Don McGahn subpoena fight". Politico. Retrieved November 24, 2019. ^ "Impeachment Hearing with Lieutenant Colonel Vindman and Jennifer Williams". C-SPAN. November 19, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "Impeachment Hearing with Ambassador Kurt Volker and National Security Aide Tim Morrison". C-SPAN. November 19, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Kim, Lucian (November 27, 2019). "The View From Moscow On The Trump Impeachment Inquiry". NPR. Retrieved January 23, 2020. ^ "Impeachment Inquiry Hearing with E.U. Ambassador Gordon Sondland". C-SPAN. November 20, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "Impeachment Inquiry Hearing with Laura Cooper and David Hale". C-SPAN. November 20, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Polantz, Katelyn; Perez, Evan (November 22, 2019). "Exclusive: Former FBI lawyer under investigation after allegedly altering document in 2016 Russia probe". CNN. Retrieved November 22, 2019. ^ Barrett, Devlin; Nakashima, Ellen; Zapotosky, Matt (November 21, 2019). "Justice Dept. inspector general's draft Russia report finds FBI lawyer may have altered document". The Washington Post. Retrieved November 21, 2019. ^ Nakashima, Ellen. "Justice Dept. watchdog finds political bias did not taint top officials running the FBI's Russia probe but documents errors". Washington Post. ^ "Impeachment Hearing with Fiona Hill and David Holmes". C-SPAN. November 21, 2019. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Miller, Greg (November 21, 2019). "Impeachment witness warns that conspiracy theories advance Russia's agenda as they divide Americans". The Washington Post. Retrieved November 25, 2019. ^ Tau, Byron. "Judge Rejects White House Claims of Immunity for Close Aides". WSJ. ^ Nadler, Jerrold (November 26, 2019). "Letter from Chairman Jerrold Nadler to President Donald J. Trump" (PDF). United States House of Representatives. Retrieved January 25, 2020. ^ Breuninger, Kevin (November 26, 2019). "House Judiciary Committee invites Trump to its first impeachment hearing on Dec. 4". CNBC. Retrieved January 25, 2020. ^ a b O'Reilly, Andrew (November 28, 2019). "Federal appeals court to hear arguments in former WH counsel McGahn's subpoena case". Fox News. ^ "Appeals court puts brief hold on McGahn testimony order". NBC News. ^ Nadler, Jerrold (November 29, 2019). "Letter from Chairman Jerrold Nadler to President Donald J. Trump" (PDF). United States House of Representatives. Retrieved January 25, 2020. ^ Shabad, Rebecca (November 29, 2019). "Nadler gives White House deadline for deciding on impeachment hearing participation". CBS News. Retrieved January 25, 2020. ^ House, Billy (December 1, 2019). "Trump Declines to Participate in House Impeachment Hearing". Bloomberg LP. Retrieved January 25, 2020. ^ Lillis, Mike (December 2, 2019). "Impeachment inquiry enters critical new phase". The Hill. Retrieved December 3, 2019. ^ "House Intelligence Committee to vote on Trump impeachment report". NBC News. ^ Brigham, Bob. "Intel Chairman Adam Schiff announces Tuesday vote on impeachment inquiry report on Donald Trump". rawstory.com. ^ "Judge denies DOJ request for stay on Don McGahn testimony". POLITICO. ^ Nunes, Devin; Jordan, Jim; McCaul, Michael T. (December 2, 2019). "Report of evidence in the democrat's impeachment inquiry in the house of representatives" (PDF). U.S. House of Representatives. Retrieved December 3, 2019. ^ "READ: Republican Report On The Impeachment Inquiry". NPR. December 2, 2019. Retrieved December 3, 2019. ^ House Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence (December 2019). "The Trump-Ukraine Impeachment Inquiry" (PDF). U.S. House of Representatives. Retrieved December 3, 2019. ^ Demirjian, Karoun; Bade, Rachael; Kim, Seung Min (December 3, 2019). "House Democrats release report charging that Trump abused his office as impeachment inquiry enters new phase". The Washington Post. Retrieved December 3, 2019. ^ "California CEO and Seven Others Charged in Multi-Million Dollar Conduit Campaign Contribution Case". U.S. Department of Justice. December 3, 2019. Retrieved December 8, 2019. ^ Hsu, Spencer S.; Zapotosky, Matt (December 3, 2019). "Key Mueller witness, major Clinton and Trump donor charged with funneling $3.5 million in illegal contributions". The Washington Post. Retrieved December 8, 2019. ^ Kirkpatrick, David D.; Vogel, Kenneth P. (December 5, 2019). "Indictment Details How Emirates Sought Influence in 2016 Campaign". The New York Times. Retrieved December 8, 2019. ^ Zapotosky, Matt; Barrett, Devlin (December 4, 2019). "Barr's handpicked prosecutor tells inspector general he can't back right-wing theory that Russia case was U.S. intelligence setup". Washington Post. ^ Cheney, Kyle; Desiderio, Andrew (December 4, 2019). "Dems signal Mueller-related impeachment charges as witnesses assail Trump". Politico. Retrieved January 3, 2020. ^ Itkowitz, Colby; Sonmez, Felicia; Wagner, John. "Pelosi asks committee chairs to proceed with articles of impeachment". The Washington Post. ^ Cipollone, Pat (December 6, 2019). "Letter from Pat A. Cipollone to Chairman Jerrold Nadler" (PDF). White House. Retrieved January 25, 2020. ^ Megrian, Chris (December 6, 2019). "Trump refuses to participate in House impeachment proceedings". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved January 25, 2020. ^ Matt Zapotosky; Devlin Barrett (December 10, 2019). "Attorney general sharpens attacks on FBI's Russia probe". The Washington Post. Retrieved December 10, 2019. ^ "The Impeachment Inquiry into President Donald J. Trump: Presentations from the House Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence and House Judiciary Committee | U.S. House of Representatives Judiciary Committee". United States House of Representatives. ^ Fandos, Nicholas (December 9, 2019). "Democrats Signal Abuse of Power and Obstruction of Congress Charges Against Trump" – via NYTimes.com. ^ Lisa Mascaro; Mary Clare Jalonick (December 9, 2019). "Democrats poised to unveil 2 impeachment articles vs. Trump". apnews.com. Retrieved December 9, 2019. ^ Fandos, Nicholas (December 10, 2019). "Trump 'Ignored and Injured' the National Interest, Democrats Charge in Impeachment Articles" – via NYTimes.com. ^ Wagner, John; Epstein, Kayla; Brice-Saddler, Michael (December 10, 2019). "House Democrats unveil two articles of impeachment against Trump; White House predicts 'full exoneration' in GOP-led Senate". The Washington Post. ^ Barrett, Devlin; Dawsey, Josh; Zapotosky, Matt; Wagner, John (December 10, 2019). "Trump lashes out at FBI director in wake of Justice Department inspector general's report". The Washington Post. ^ Forgey, Quint (December 19, 2019). "Trump scolds his FBI director after release of DOJ's Russia probe report". Politico. ^ Montague, Zach (December 10, 2019). "Judge Hears Final Arguments in Case Over Impeachment Subpoenas". The New York Times. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ "Inspector general: FBI should have reassessed whether to continue investigating former Trump campaign adviser Carter Page". Washington Post. ^ Brice-Saddler, Michael; Itkowitz, Colby; Wagner, John; Viebeck, Elist (December 11, 2019). "House Judiciary debates articles of impeachment against Trump". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ Shear, Michael D. (December 12, 2019). "mpeachment Highlights: Judiciary Committee Finished Debate and Recessed for Vote Friday Morning". The New York Times. Retrieved January 26, 2020. ^ Meg Wagner; Mike Hayes; Zoe Sottile; Veronica Rocha (December 13, 2019). "Live updates: Trump impeachment". CNN. ^ Higgins, Tucker (December 13, 2019). "Supreme Court will hear three cases over Trump's financial records". CNBC. ^ Hsu, Spencer S. "Michael Flynn's sentencing set for Jan. 28 after judge rejects his attacks on FBI, Justice Department". Washington Post. ^ Polantz, Katelyn. "House says it still needs Mueller grand jury details for impeachment proceedings". CNN. ^ Singman, Brooke (December 17, 2019). "Ex-Trump campaign official Rick Gates sentenced to 45 days in jail, probation in Mueller probe". Fox News. ^ Segers, Grace; Becket, Stefan; Quinn, Melissa (December 18, 2019). "House Committee approves rules for impeachment vote". CBS News. Retrieved January 26, 2019. ^ "Divided U.S. House impeaches Donald Trump in historic vote". December 19, 2019 – via reuters.com. ^ Sneed, Tierney (December 19, 2019). "DOJ Tries To Use House's Impeachment Vote Against It In McGahn Case". Talking Points Memo. ^ "House counsel suggests Trump could be impeached again". POLITICO. ^ Zilbermints, Regina (December 30, 2019). "Judge tosses suit over impeachment testimony of former Bolton aide". TheHill. ^ a b Carol E. Lee (February 14, 2020). "Justice Department opens inquiry into FBI interview at heart of Flynn's guilty plea; AG Barr has asked a U.S. attorney to lead the inquiry. Flynn pleaded guilty to making false statements during the interview, but wants to withdraw his plea". nbcnews.com. Retrieved February 18, 2020. ^ Marimow, Ann E.; Marimow, Ann E.; Barnes, Robert. "Appeals court grapples with wading into political fight over grand jury materials, McGahn testimony". The Washington Post. ^ Kovensky, Josh (January 3, 2020). "New Mueller Docs Tie Manafort More Closely To Ukraine Pressure Campaign". Talking Points Memo. ^ Johnson, Kevin (January 7, 2020). "Feds recommend prison sentence of up to six months for ex-Trump national security adviser Michael Flynn". USA Today. ^ Gerstein, Josh (January 14, 2020). "Michael Flynn seeking to withdraw guilty plea". Politico. ^ Williams, Kevin (January 15, 2020). "House votes to send Trump impeachment articles to Senate for trial". CNBC. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Wagner, John; Sonnez, Felicia; Itkowitz, Colby (January 15, 2020). "House managers deliver impeachment articles to Senate; McConnell's office says Senate will formally accept them Thursday". The Washington Post. Retrieved January 25, 2020. ^ "Day in Impeachment: Senate Issues a Summons to President Trump". The New York Times. January 17, 2020. Retrieved January 28, 2020. ^ Samuelsohn, Darren (January 16, 2020). "Flynn sentencing delayed amid bid to withdraw guilty plea". Politico. ^ Lucas, Ryan (February 6, 2020). "Attorney General Barr Issues New Rules For Politically Sensitive Investigations". ^ Benner, Katie (February 5, 2020). "Investigations Into 2020 Candidates Must Be Cleared by Top Justice Dept. Officials". The New York Times. ^ Eric Tucker (February 5, 2020). "FBI director warns of ongoing Russian 'information warfare'". apnews.com. Retrieved February 7, 2020. ^ Mascaro, Lisa; Clare Jalonick, Mary (February 5, 2020). "Not guilty: Trump acquitted of both impeachment charges". The Mercury News. Archived from the original on February 5, 2020. Retrieved February 5, 2020. ^ Cheney, Kyle; Desiderio, Andrew; Breshnahan, John (February 5, 2020). "Trump acquitted on impeachment charges, ending gravest threat to his presidency". Politico. Retrieved February 5, 2020. ^ Nicholas, Peter (February 13, 2020). "John Kelly Finally Lets Loose on Trump". The Atlantic. ^ Wise, Justin (February 12, 2020). "Trump adviser denies Vindman ouster was retaliation: 'We are not a banana republic'". The Hill. ^ Baker, Peter; Haberman, Maggie; Hakim, Danny; Schmidt, Michael S. (February 7, 2020). "Trump Fires Impeachment Witnesses Gordon Sondland and Alexander Vindman in Post-Acquittal Purge". The New York Times. ^ Gerstein, Josh (February 10, 2020). "Judge cancels Michael Flynn sentencing". Politico. ^ Basu, Zachary (February 11, 2020). "Prosecutors recommend Roger Stone serve 7–9 years in prison". Axios. ^ Levine, Marianne (February 10, 2020). "Schumer asks inspectors general to investigate whistleblower retaliation after Vindman firing". Politico. ^ Mascaro, Lisa (February 10, 2020). "Schumer wants to protect whistleblowers amid Trump payback". AP News. ^ Cohen, Zachary; LeBlanc, Paul (February 10, 2020). "Schumer calls on 74 inspectors general to investigate witness retaliation after Vindman ouster". CNN. ^ Carey, Jordain (February 11, 2020). "Senate GOP blocks three election security bills". The Hill. ^ Lynch, Sarah N. (February 11, 2020). "Prosecutors quit as Justice Department seeks shorter sentence for Trump ally". Reuters. ^ Chiu, Allyson (February 12, 2020). "Trump defends Roger Stone, attacks judge Amy Berman Jackson and prosecutors". The Washington Post. ^ Sullivan, Eileen; Shear, Michael D. (February 14, 2020). "Trump Praises Barr for Rejecting Punishment Recommended for Stone". The New York Times. ^ Swan, Jonathan; Basu, Zachary (February 12, 2020). "Scoop: Trump pulls nomination for former U.S. attorney for D.C. to Treasury post". Axios. ^ Zapotosky, Matt; Barrett, Devlin; Marimow, Ann E.; Hsu, Spencer S. (February 11, 2020). "Prosecutors quit amid escalating Justice Dept. fight over Roger Stone's prison term". The Washington Post. ^ Lee, Carol E.; Dilanian, Ken; Alexander, Peter (February 11, 2020). "Barr takes control of legal matters of interest to Trump, including Stone sentencing". NBC News. ^ Collins, Kaitlan (February 12, 2020). "Decision to pull Liu's nomination directly linked to her oversight of Stone and McCabe cases". CNN. ^ Balsamo, Michael; Tucker, Eric (February 12, 2020). "Trial team quits Roger Stone case in dispute over sentence". AP News. ^ Clark, Dartunorro; Kosnar, Michael; Gregorian, Dareh; Winter, Tom (February 11, 2020). "All four Roger Stone prosecutors resign from case after DOJ backpedals on sentencing recommendation". NBC News. ^ Shortell, David; Perez, Evan; Polantz, Katelyn; Collins, Kaitlan; Herb, Jeremy (February 12, 2020). "All 4 federal prosecutors quit Stone case after DOJ overrules prosecutors on sentencing request". CNN. ^ "Prosecutors quit amid escalating Justice Dept. fight over Roger Stone's prison term". The Washington Post. February 11, 2020. ^ Polantz, Katelyn (February 12, 2020). "Judge denies Roger Stone's request for a new trial". CNN. ^ Alexander, Peter; Gregorian, Dareh (February 13, 2020). "Jessie Liu, ex-U.S. attorney who oversaw Roger Stone case, resigns from Trump administration". NBC News. ^ Collins, Kaitlan (February 13, 2020). "First on CNN: Jessie Liu resigns from Treasury after pulled nomination". CNN. ^ Zapotosky, Matt; Dawsey, Josh; Barrett, Devlin; Hsu, Spencer. "Trump-Barr divide worsens as the president bucks a request to stop tweeting, and the Justice Dept. declines to charge ex-FBI official McCabe". Washington Post. Retrieved February 16, 2020. ^ Evan Perez, David Shortell, and Katelyn Polantz (February 14, 2020). "Barr privately ordered re-examination of Michael Flynn's case, US officials say". CNN.com. Retrieved February 18, 2020.CS1 maint: uses authors parameter (link) ^ Savage, Charlie; Goldman, Adam; Apuzzo, Matt (February 14, 2020). "Barr Installs Outside Prosecutor to Review Case Against Michael Flynn, Ex-Trump Adviser". The New York Times. ^ Jarrett, Laura (February 17, 2020). "More than 2,000 former prosecutors and other DOJ officials call on Attorney General Bill Barr to resign". CNN. ^ Levin, Bess (February 18, 2020). "Federal Judges Call Emergency Meeting Re: What the Hell to Do With Trump and Barr". Vanity Fair. ^ "Trump's attack on Judge Amy Berman Jackson prompts emergency meeting of federal judges". The Washington Post. ^ Bowcott, Owen and Julian Borger (February 19, 2020). "Donald Trump 'offered Julian Assange a pardon if he denied Russia link to hack'". The Guardian. Retrieved February 19, 2020. ^ Mai-Duc, Christine (August 17, 2017). "Rohrabacher on meeting with WikiLeaks' Assange: We talked about 'what might be necessary to get him out'". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved February 20, 2020. ^ Stahl, Jeremy (February 20, 2020). "Roger Stone Sentenced to More than Three Years for "Covering Up" for Trump". Slate. Retrieved February 20, 2020. ^ Samuelsohn, Darren; Gerstein, Josh (February 25, 2020). "Federal judge rebukes Trump over Roger Stone jury comments". Politico. ^ Samuelsohn, Darren; Gerstein, Josh (February 28, 2020). "Trump wins appeal to block McGahn testimony". Politico. ^ "Court rules congress cannot sue to force executive branch officials to testify". The New York Times. ^ Mangan, Dan (February 28, 2020). "Former Trump White House lawyer Donald McGahn does not have to testify to House, appeals court rules". CNBC. ^ "Summary: House Has No Standing to Compel McGahn's Testimony, D.C. Circuit Rules". March 6, 2020. Retrieved March 12, 2020. ^ Sneed, Tierney (March 5, 2020). "House To Seek Full Circuit Review Of McGahn Ruling As DOJ Cites It In Other Subpoena Cases". Talking Points Memo. ^ "Federal Judge Says He Needs to Review Every Mueller Report Redaction Because Barr Can't Be Trusted; Judge Reggie Walton slammed the attorney general's "misleading," "calculated" attempt to spin the report in Trump's favor". March 5, 2020. ^ Savage, Charlie (March 5, 2020). "Judge Calls Barr's Handling of Mueller Report 'Distorted' and 'Misleading'". The New York Times. ^ "Judge cites Barr's 'misleading' statements in ordering review of Mueller report redaction". The Washington Post. ^ Cheney, Kyle (March 6, 2020). "Judiciary Committee says McGahn ruling leaves only extreme options — such as arrests — to get White House info". Politico. ^ "House Democrats request appeal asking court to enforce subpoena for former Trump White House counsel Donald McGahn". The Washington Post. ^ Savage, Charlie (March 10, 2020). "House Can See Mueller's Secret Grand Jury Evidence, Appeals Court Rules". The New York Times. ^ "Justice Department must disclose secret Mueller grand jury evidence to Congress, appeals court finds". The Washington Post. ^ Gerstein, Josh; Cheney, Kyle (March 10, 2020). "Democrats should get Mueller evidence, judges rule". Politico. ^ Polantz, Katelyn (March 13, 2020). "Full DC federal appeals court to hear McGahn and border wall cases in major separation-of-powers showdown". CNN. ^ Naham, Matt (March 16, 2020). "Office Led by AG Barr's Former Aide Moves to Dismiss Mueller's Case Against Russian Troll Farm Defendant". Law and Crime. ^ Gerstein, Josh (March 16, 2020). "Justice Department drops plans for trial over Russian interference in 2016 U.S. election". Politico. ^ Cheney, Kyle (February 12, 2020). "Attorney General William Barr to testify before House Judiciary Committee". Politico. ^ Herb, Jeremy; Raju, Manu (February 12, 2020). "Democrats say Barr to testify before Congress in March". CNN. ^ Knutson, Jacob (February 12, 2020). "Lindsey Graham won't ask Bill Barr to testify about Stone sentencing". Axios. ^ Desiderio, Andrew (February 12, 2020). "Lindsey Graham shuts down calls to investigate DOJ's Roger Stone reversal". Politico. ^ Cheney, Kyle (March 23, 2020). "House Judiciary Committee postpones March 31 Barr hearing". Politico. ^ Zack Beauchamp (April 8, 2020). "Trump's coronavirus purge; By firing one inspector general and quietly demoting another, Trump has declared war on the very idea of oversight". Vox. Retrieved April 8, 2020. ^ https://www.nytimes.com/2020/04/21/us/politics/russian-interference-senate-intelligence-report.html ^ https://www.axios.com/senate-inteligence-committee-russia-trump-b2f29fe2-4373-4cb5-9bc6-0f071a0be544.html ^ https://www.politico.com/news/2020/04/21/senate-intel-report-confirms-russia-aimed-to-help-trump-in-2016-198171 ^ https://abcnews.go.com/Politics/wireStory/senate-panel-backs-assessment-russia-interfered-2016-70266714 ^ https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/national-security/bipartisan-senate-report-says-2017-intel-assessment-about-russian-interference-n1188696 ^ https://www.wsj.com/articles/senate-report-affirms-u-s-intelligence-findings-on-2016-russian-interference-11587483408 ^ "With no coronavirus briefing, Trump airs grievances on Twitter". The Washington Post. ^ "Appeals court takes up Trump border wall and Donald McGahn subpoena cases". The Washington Post. Further reading[edit] This section is transcluded from Timeline of Russian interference in the 2016 United States elections. (edit | history) Abramson, Seth (September 3, 2019). Proof of Conspiracy: How Trump's International Collusion Is Threatening American Democracy. St. Martin's Press. ISBN 978-1250256713. https://static.macmillan.com/static/macmillan/proofofconspiracy/endnotes.pdf Benkler, Yochai; Faris, Robert; Roberts, Hal (October 15, 2018). Network Propaganda: Manipulation, Disinformation and Radicalization in American Politics. Oxford University Press. ISBN 978-0190923631. Bittman, Ladislav (1983). The KGB and Soviet Disinformation. Foreword by Roy Godson. Chait, Jonathan (July 9, 2018). "Will Trump Be Meeting With His Counterpart — Or His Handler? A plausible theory of mind-boggling collusion". The Daily Intelligencer. New York magazine. Retrieved August 24, 2018. Costa, Robert; Leonnig, Carol D.; Dawsey, Josh (December 2, 2017). "Inside the secretive nerve center of the Mueller investigation". The Washington Post. Demirjian, Karoun (December 8, 2016). "Republicans ready to launch wide-ranging probe of Russia, despite Trump's stance". Chicago Tribune, The Washington Post. DiResta, Renee; Shaffer, Kris; Ruppel, Becky; Sullivan, David; Matney, Robert; Fox, Ryan; Albright, Jonathan; Johnson, Ben (December 17, 2018). "The Tactics & Tropes of the Internet Research Agency" (PDF). New Knowledge – via Wikimedia Commons. Entous, Adam; Nakashima, Ellen; Jaffe, Greg (December 26, 2017). "Kremlin trolls burned across the Internet as Washington debated options." The Washington Post. Foer, Franklin (March 2018). "The Plot Against America". The Atlantic. Frank, Thomas (January 12, 2018). "Secret Money: How Trump Made Millions Selling Condos To Unknown Buyers". BuzzFeed News. Hamburger, Tom; Helderman, Rosalind S. (February 6, 2018). "Hero or hired gun? How a British former spy became a flash point in the Russia investigation." The Washington Post. Harding, Luke (November 16, 2017). Collusion: Secret Meetings, Dirty Money, and How Russia Helped Donald Trump Win. Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group. ISBN 978-0525520931. Harding, Luke (November 19, 2017). "The Hidden History of Trump's First Trip to Moscow". Collusion: Secret Meetings, Dirty Money, and How Russia Helped Donald Trump Win. Politico Magazine. Hettena, Seth (May 2018). Trump / Russia: A Definitive History. Melville House Publishing. ISBN 978-1612197395. Howard, Philip N.; Ganesh, Bharath; Liotsiou, Dimitra; Kelly, John; François, Camille (December 17, 2018). "The IRA, Social Media and Political Polarization in the United States, 2012-2018" (PDF). Computational Propaganda Research Project – via Wikimedia Commons. Jamieson, Kathleen Hall (October 3, 2018). Cyberwar: How Russian Hackers and Trolls Helped Elect a President; What We Don't, Can't, and Do Know. Oxford University Press. ISBN 978-0190915810. Lichtman, Allan J. (2017), The Case for Impeachment, Dey Street Books, ISBN 978-0062696823 Luce, Edward (November 3, 2017) The Big Read: Trump under siege from Mueller as he travels to Asia. Financial Times. McCain, John; Graham, Lindsey; Schumer, Chuck; Reed, Jack (December 11, 2016). "McCain, Graham, Schumer, Reed Joint Statement on Reports That Russia Interfered with the 2016 Election". United States Senate Committee on Armed Services. Nance, Malcolm (October 10, 2016). The Plot to Hack America: How Putin's Cyberspies and WikiLeaks Tried to Steal the 2016 Election. Skyhorse Publishing. Osnos, Evan; Remnick, David; Yaffa, Joshua. "Trump, Putin, and the New Cold War," (March 6, 2017), The New Yorker. Pacepa, Ion Mihai; Rychlak, Ronald J. (2013). Disinformation: Former Spy Chief Reveals Secret Strategies for Undermining Freedom, Attacking Religion, and Promoting Terrorism Pilipenko, Diana; Dessel, Talia (December 17, 2018). "Following the Money: Trump and Russia-Linked Transactions From the Campaign to the Presidential Inauguration". Center for American Progress. Porter, Tom (December 1, 2016). "US House of representatives backs proposal to counter global Russian subversion". International Business Times UK edition. Shane, Scott; Mazzetti, Mark (September 20, 2018). "The Plot to Subvert an Election", The New York Times Shultz, Richard H.; Godson, Roy (1984). Dezinformatsia: Active Measures in Soviet Strategy Strohm, Chris (December 1, 2016). "Russia Weaponized Social Media in U.S. Election, FireEye Says". Bloomberg News. Thompson, Nicholas; Vogelstein, Fred (February 12, 2018). "Inside the two years that shook Facebook–and the World." Wired. Toobin, Jeffrey (December 11, 2017). "Michael Flynn’s Guilty Plea Sends Donald Trump’s Lawyers Scrambling" The New Yorker. Unger, Craig (July 13, 2017). "Trump’s Russian Laundromat" The New Republic. Unger, Craig (2018). House of Trump, House of Putin: The Untold Story of Donald Trump and the Russian Mafia. Dutton. ISBN 978-1524743505. Watts, Clint (2018). Messing with the Enemy: Surviving in a Social Media World of Hackers, Terrorists, Russians, and Fake News. Harper. ISBN 978-0062795984. Weisburd, Andrew; Watts, Clint; Berger, J. M. (November 6, 2016). "Trolling for Trump: How Russia is Trying to Destroy Our Democracy". WarOnTheRocks.com. External links[edit] This section is transcluded from Timeline of Russian interference in the 2016 United States elections. (edit | history) Wikimedia Commons has media related to Russian interference in 2016 United States elections. Desjardins, Lisa (February 21, 2019) [June 7, 2018]. "The giant timeline of everything Russia, Trump and the investigations". PBS NewsHour. "Joint Statement from the Department Of Homeland Security and Office of the Director of National Intelligence on Election Security", October 7, 2016 Trump Investigations by the Associated Press Bill Moyers: Interactive Timeline: Everything We Know About Russia and President Trump Committee to Investigate Russia has five timelines. Data, Democracy and Dirty Tricks, March 19, 2018 Channel 4 Trump and Russia: A timeline of the investigation, USA Today Tracking the Russia investigations, CNN The Trump Russia Investigation, WhatTheFuckJustHappenedToday.com "The Russia investigation and Donald Trump: a timeline from on-the-record sources", PolitiFact Public Documents Clearinghouse: Congressional Russia Investigations, Just Security v t e Russian interference in the 2016 United States elections Events Democratic National Committee cyber attacks 2016 email leak Podesta emails Links between Trump associates and Russian officials Trump Tower meeting Steele dossier Timelines Topical before July 2016 July 2016–election day Transition Jan–Jun 2017 Jul–Dec 2017 Jan–Jun 2018 Jul–Dec 2018 2019–2020 Post-election Assessing Russian Activities and Intentions in Recent US Elections Countering America's Adversaries Through Sanctions Act Dismissal of James Comey Special Counsel investigation list of charges Mueller Report Barr letter DNC lawsuit Nunes memo 2018 interference 2020 foreign interference Related Operation Crossfire Hurricane Cyberwarfare by Russia Russian espionage in the United States The Plot to Hack America Trump: The Kremlin Candidate? Cyberwar: How Russian Hackers and Trolls Helped Elect a President v t e Special Counsel investigation (2017–2019) Scope Russian interference in the 2016 United States elections Dismissal of James Comey Links between Trump associates and Russian officials Steele dossier Timelines 2016 election interference (before July 2016) (July 2016–election day) (post-election transition) 2017 investigations Jan–Jun Jul–Dec 2018 investigations Jan–Jun Jul–Dec 2019–2020 investigations Personnel Robert Mueller Rod Rosenstein William Barr Legal teams Direct indictments (list of charges) At large Yevgeny Prigozhin Concord Management and Consulting Internet Research Agency (IRA) Fancy Bear Konstantin Kilimnik Pled not guilty Concord Management and Consulting Paul Manafort trials – found guilty Roger Stone - found guilty Pleaded guilty Michael Cohen Michael Flynn George Papadopoulos Rick Gates Alex van der Zwaan Criminal referrals Maria Butina Michael Cohen Greg Craig Sam Patten Outcome Barr letter Mueller Report Reactions to the Special Counsel investigation (2017–2019) Related Operation Crossfire Hurricane Carter Page Trump Tower meeting Rinat Akhmetshin Rob Goldstone Ike Kaveladze Jared Kushner Paul Manafort Donald Trump Jr. Natalia Veselnitskaya Democratic National Committee cyber attacks Guccifer 2.0 WikiLeaks Jerome Corsi Presidency of Donald Trump Special Counsel Independence and Integrity Act Russian interference in the 2018 United States elections Elena Khusyaynova v t e Presidency of Donald Trump Campaigns 2000 presidential campaign 2016 presidential campaign Make America Great Again rallies Republican primaries endorsements debates convention General election endorsements debates reactions Assassination attempt Never Trump movement Mitt Romney's anti-Trump speech Republican opposition Sexual misconduct allegations Access Hollywood recording Wiretapping allegations 2020 presidential campaign endorsements rallies Tenure Transition Inauguration speech Opinion polling 2017 2018 2019 Social media 2018 midterm elections Executive actions proclamations Executive clemency pardon of Joe Arpaio Travel bans reactions legal challenges protests replacement Family separation policy Migrant detentions Operation Faithful Patriot Stormy Daniels scandal Anonymous senior official op-ed Relations with Israel Jerusalem recognition Golan Heights recognition Peace plan North Korea crisis Singapore summit Hanoi summit DMZ summit 2019–20 Persian Gulf crisis Trump–Ukraine scandal Relations with Russia Helsinki summit Saudi Arabia arms deal Syria strikes 2017 2018 Taiwan call Withdrawal from the Iran deal Death of Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi Death of Qasem Soleimani Coronavirus pandemic Communication Timeline First 100 days 2017 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 2018 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 2019 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 2020 Q1 Q2 Trips 2017 2018 2019 2020 international Riyadh summit Singapore summit Helsinki summit Hanoi summit DMZ summit Policies Economy tax cuts tariffs China trade war Environment Paris Agreement withdrawal Foreign policy as candidate as President America First Immigration Racial views Social issues cannabis Personnel Cabinet formation Federal judges Gorsuch Kavanaugh Supreme Court candidates controversies Ambassadors Attorneys Economic advisors Withdrawn appointees Short-tenure appointees Dismissals and resignations Attorneys Yates Comey Tillerson McMaster Pruitt Controversies & impeachment Business projects in Russia Links with Russian officials Trump Tower meeting Steele dossier Crossfire Hurricane Classified information disclosures Russian election interference timeline until July 2016 July 2016–election day transition period Special Counsel investigation Mueller Report Barr letter Timeline transition period Jan–Jun 2017 Jul–Dec 2017 Jan–Jun 2018 Jul–Dec 2018 2019–2020 Impeachment efforts inquiry trial Opposition Lawsuits Protests timeline 2017 Women's March March for Science Impeachment March family separation policy protests Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Timeline_of_investigations_into_Trump_and_Russia_(2019–2020)&oldid=953792819" Categories: 2019 in the United States Contemporary history timelines Donald Trump-related lists Russian interference in the 2016 United States elections Timelines of current events 2019-related timelines Political timelines by year Political timelines of the 2020s by year Hidden categories: Twitter username not in Wikidata CS1 maint: uses authors parameter Articles with short description Use mdy dates from January 2020 Articles to be split from April 2020 All articles to be split Wikipedia articles in need of updating from March 2020 All Wikipedia articles in need of updating Commons category link is locally defined Navigation menu Personal tools Not logged in Talk Contributions Create account Log in Namespaces Article Talk Variants Views Read Edit View history More Search Navigation Main page Contents Featured content Current events Random article Donate to Wikipedia Wikipedia store Interaction Help About Wikipedia Community portal Recent changes Contact page Tools What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Wikidata item Cite this page Print/export Create a book Download as PDF Printable version Languages Add links This page was last edited on 29 April 2020, at 02:16 (UTC). Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view